SUPPLY  CHAIN  SECURITY:  SECURE  FREIGHT 
INITIATIVE  AND  THE  IMPLEMENTATION  OF 

100  PERCENT  SCANNING 

S.  HRG.  110–1227 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION 

AND MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, 

SAFETY, AND SECURITY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

JUNE  12,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

80–493 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  AND  MERCHANT 

MARINE  INFRASTRUCTURE,  SAFETY,  AND  SECURITY 

FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 12, 2008  ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................

WITNESSES 

Ahern,  Jayson,  Deputy  Commissioner,  U.S.  Customs  and  Border  Protection, 
U.S. Department of Homeland Security  .............................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Caldwell,  Stephen  L.,  Director,  Homeland  Security  and  Justice  Issues,  U.S. 
Government Accountability Office (GAO)  ..........................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Huizenga,  David,  Assistant  Deputy  Administrator,  Office  of  International 
Material  Protection  and  Cooperation,  Defense  Nuclear  Nonproliferation, 
National Nuclear Security Administration, U.S. Department of Energy  ........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

American Association of Exporters and Importers, prepared statement  ............
Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Maria Cantwell to: 

Stephen L. Caldwell  .........................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank.  R.  Lautenberg  to: 
Jayson Ahern  ....................................................................................................
David Huizenga  ................................................................................................
Robinson,  Catherine,  Associate  Director,  High  Technology  Trade  Policy  on 
behalf of the National Association of Manufacturers (NAM), prepared state-
ment 
......................................................................................................................
Stein,  Renee,  Chair,  and  Richard  M.  Belanger,  Counsel,  Business  Alliance 
for Customs Modernization, prepared statement  ..............................................

Page 
1 
1 

2 
5 

16 
18 

9 
11 

41 

55 

48 
52 

46 

45 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

SUPPLY  CHAIN  SECURITY:  SECURE  FREIGHT 
INITIATIVE  AND  THE  IMPLEMENTATION  OF 

100  PERCENT  SCANNING 

THURSDAY,  JUNE  12,  2008 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION AND 

MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, SAFETY, AND SECURITY,
COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:05  a.m.,  in 
room  SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lau-
tenberg, Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Good morning. I call the Surface Transpor-
tation  and  Merchant  Marine  Infrastructure,  Safety,  and  Security 
Subcommittee to order. 

Welcome.  We  thank  the  witnesses  for  being  here  and  all  of  you 
for  your  attention  to  this  very  serious  problem.  I  want  to  welcome 
everyone  to  today’s  hearing  as  we  continue  America’s  work  to  pro-
tect  our  families,  protect  our  communities,  protect  our  economy  by 
securing our ports and those containers that arrive there. 

Now,  my  home  state  of  New  Jersey  knows  about  the  importance 
of ports. The Port of New York and New Jersey is the largest port 
on the east coast and the second busiest container port in the coun-
try. It supports some 250,000 jobs and is responsible for generating 
$20 billion in economic activity. 

The 40-foot metal shipping containers, which have become stand-
ard for industry, were first used in the United States at Port New-
ark,  New  Jersey,  and  today  these  containers  have  transformed 
global  commerce.  They  save  manufacturers  and  shippers  time  by 
moving goods more efficiently and with less expense. 

But  after  9/11,  we  were  forced  to  see  these  containers  in  a  dif-
ferent  light,  as  a  way  for  terrorists  to  smuggle  weapons  or  them-
selves into our country. An attack on a U.S. port or even a foreign 
port  would  affect  our  economy,  not  to  mention  the  safety  of  sur-
rounding  communities.  To  prevent  that  from  happening  and  to 
keep our country safe, we need to know what is in these containers. 
The  Bush  Administration  has  long  believed  that  a  layered  ap-
proach  is  adequate  for  securing  our  ports.  I  would  consider  it  a 
modular  approach,  but  in  practice,  this  layered  approach  has  been 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

2 

more  like  a  piecemeal  one,  leaving  our  country  and  our  economy 
still vulnerable. 

After  the  9/11  attacks,  the  Federal  Government  installed  equip-
ment  to  scan  100  percent  of  passengers  and  baggage  boarding  a 
plane. It should not take another attack on our country for the Fed-
eral Government to secure our ports. 

To  that  end,  Congress  passed  a  law  last  year  requiring  that  by 
year  2012,  all  shipping  containers  coming  into  our  ports  should  be 
scanned  for  nuclear  weapons  and  radiation  before  they  reach  our 
shores.  It  is  my  understanding  that  today’s  administration  wit-
nesses  are  about  to  tell  us  that  July  2012,  the  deadline,  will  not 
be met. 

The  GAO  has  already  told  Congress  twice  this  year  that  the 
Bush  Administration’s  cargo  security  programs  are  riddled  with 
loopholes.  For  example,  we  still  do  not  have  minimum  standards 
for  container  security.  The  Department  of  Homeland  Security  still 
has  not  established  a  standard  lock  for  metal  shipping  containers, 
and  I  am  deeply  concerned  that  more  than  6  years  after  9/11,  the 
Bush  Administration  is  back  once  again  to  report  on  more  prob-
lems.  The  administration’s  approach  to  securing  our  ports  is  unac-
ceptable, and while they get the technology in place for 100 percent 
scanning, we also need to find additional ways to increase security 
at our ports. 

To  that  end,  I  will  soon  introduce  legislation  which  will  make 
real  improvements  to  our  port  security  programs  and  keep  our 
economy and families safe. 

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses  on  these  critical 
issues. I thank you for being here. I would ask that Jayson Ahern, 
who is the Deputy Commissioner for U.S. Customs and Border Pro-
tection, be the first to speak. Mr. Ahern has spent 32 years in pub-
lic  service,  and  I  want  to  thank  you  for  your  commitment  to  the 
country. 

We will, after that, hear from David Huizenga, Assistant Deputy 
Administrator  at  the  U.S.  Department  of  Energy.  At  the  Depart-
ment,  Mr.  Huizenga  is  responsible  for  the  Second  Line  of  Defense 
Program, which includes maritime security and the Megaports ini-
tiative. 

Stephen  Caldwell  is  the  Director  of  Maritime  Security  Issues  at 
the  U.S.  Government  Accountability  Office,  and  he  has  written 
GAO  reports  on  maritime  legislation  such  as  the  SAFE  Port  Act 
and the issues of port security and container security. 

So, once again, I thank each of you for joining us today, for shar-
ing  your  expertise  with  us.  Mr.  Ahern,  if  you  will,  please.  It  is  a 
5-minute rule, as you know. Please give us your testimony. 
STATEMENT OF JAYSON AHERN, DEPUTY COMMISSIONER, U.S. 
CUSTOMS AND BORDER PROTECTION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF 
HOMELAND SECURITY 
Mr. AHERN. Good morning Chairman Lautenberg, and thank you 
very much for this opportunity to discuss the Secure Freight Initia-
tive, or SFI, and the recently released report on the pilot ports. 

First  of  all,  I  want  to  apologize  to  you  and  the  rest  of  the  Com-
mittee and the staff for providing this report so late in the process 
and after the April deadline, but we wanted to make sure the infor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

3 

mation  we  provided  was  as  complete  and  as  thorough  as  possible 
and  we  wanted  to  include  the  reviews  of  our  trade  and  our  inter-
national partners as well. 

I  also  want  to  thank  the  Members  of  this  Committee  for  your 
strong  support  of  Customs  and  Border  Protection  as  we  work  to 
continue  to  provide  the  protection  our  nation  is  so  necessarily  in 
need  of.  This  Committee  has  been  instrumental  in  the  success  of 
CBP’s  cargo  security  strategy,  as  well  as  the  passage  of  the  SAFE 
Port Act, which in itself represents an impressive collaboration be-
tween  the  Congress  and  the  Administration  to  protect  our  nation. 
In  addition  to  requiring  the  SFI  ports,  the  SAFE  Port  Act  codi-
fied  a  number  of  CBP  supply  chain  security  programs,  specifically 
our  advance  information  requirements  and  automated  targeting 
systems,  the  Customs-Trade  Partnership  Against  Terrorism,  the 
Container  Security  Initiative,  and  the  use  of  nonintrusive  inspec-
tion  technology  to  scan  high-risk  shipments.  These  provisions  re-
flect  strong  support  for  our  current  layered  risk-based  approach  to 
maritime and cargo security. 

We continually point out that the layers of the strategy are inter-
dependent,  different  layers  focus  on  securing  different  parts  of  the 
supply  chain.  This  ensures  that  cargo  is  regularly  assessed  and 
that  security  does  not  rely  on  one  single  point  that  could  be  easily 
compromised.  Over  the  last  several  years,  we  have  dedicated  sig-
nificant resources to our cargo and port security programs and this 
has resulted in a strong risk management approach. 

I  am  concerned,  however,  that  while  we  continue  to  increase  re-
sources for an initiative like SFI, we may be neglecting other areas 
that  could  potentially  pose  a  greater  risk  to  the  country.  While  in-
creased  resources  for  programs  such  as  SFI  have  enhanced  our 
ability  to  address  maritime  container  security  vulnerabilities,  it  is 
important  to  recognize  that  100  percent  scanning  does  not  equal 
100 percent security. Risk management and security must be driv-
en by our informed judgment and totality of the risks. 

As  directed  by  the  Congress,  last  October  we  began  testing  the 
feasibility  of  scanning  100  percent  of  U.S.-bound  containers  in 
three  SFI  ports,  in  Honduras,  Pakistan,  and  the  United  Kingdom. 
From  October  to  May  of  this  year,  we  scanned  over  170,000  con-
tainers passing through these ports to the United States. 

Under  SFI,  an  integrated  scanning  system,  consisting  of  radi-
ation  portal  monitors  provided  by  the  Department  of  Energy  and 
nonintrusive  inspection  imaging  systems  provided  by  Customs  and 
Border  Protection,  scans  containers  as  they  move  through  the  for-
eign  ports.  The  data  from  the  SFI  systems  provide  additional  data 
points  that  are  used  in  conjunction  with  the  advance  manifest  in-
formation  such  as  the  24-hour  rule,  C–TPAT,  and  our  automated 
targeting  system  so  we  can  assess  the  totality  of  the  risk  in  each 
container coming to the United States. 

CBP  and  the  Department  of  Energy  are  true  partners,  and  my 
counterpart, Mr. Huizenga, as a trusted colleague in the Megaports 
program, has brought invaluable resources and institutional knowl-
edge to our effort. 

As our report will show, we learned important lessons, both posi-

tive and negative, from the pilots. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

4 

On  the  positive  side,  we  benefited  from  considerable  host  nation 
cooperation, low transshipment rates, as well as technology and in-
frastructure,  paid  for  primarily  by  the  U.S.  Government,  but  we 
also recognize that such accommodations and supportive conditions 
do not and will not exist in all ports shipping to the United States. 
The  pilots  also  demonstrated  that  integrated  imaging  and  radi-
ation  detection  equipment  can  produce  useful  data.  The  additional 
data  elements  gathered  at  the  foreign  ports  assist  Customs  and 
Border Protection officers in mitigating risk and resolving radiation 
alarms at a domestic seaport. This results in enhanced data collec-
tion and more effective trade facilitation. 

But  on  the  negative  side  or  the  side  that  presents  the  greatest 
challenges, even with favorable conditions, we found that deploying 
container  scanning  equipment  at  each  of  the  SFI  ports  has  pre-
sented certain operational, technical, logistical, financial, and diplo-
matic  challenges,  including  reconfiguring  port  layouts  to  accommo-
date  the  equipment  without  affecting  port  efficiency,  identifying 
who will incur the cost for operating and maintaining the scanning 
equipment,  concluding  agreements  with  partnering  nations  and 
terminal  operators,  and  staffing  implications  for  the  foreign  cus-
toms service and terminal operators. 

But  I  would  submit  the  most  important  and  challenging  issue 
facing  SFI  is  finding  an  effective  and  meaningful  way  to  scan 
transshipped  containers.  The  initial  pilots  demonstrated  that  tech-
nological and operational solutions are not yet available to capture 
transshipped  cargo  efficiently.  New  equipment  and  software  must 
be  developed  to  overcome  the  considerable  challenge  of  scanning 
containers  that  often  transit  through  ports  quickly  and  without 
necessarily  being  placed  on  trucks  or  passing  through  the  front 
gates.  So  while  additional  data  can  be  useful,  challenges  and  ex-
penses are significant even in these limited environments. 

As a result of what we have learned so far, Customs and Border 
Protection  will  focus  future  scanning  deployments  on  high-risk 
trade  corridors  since  they  pose  the  greatest  threats  to  the  United 
States,  prioritizing  these  deployments  in  a  way  which  will  maxi-
mize  the  security  benefit,  and  ensure  that  we  have  the  capacity  to 
integrate  the  additional  scan  data  into  our  risk-based  strategy. 
Considering the approximate 11.5 million containers in a maritime 
environment that enter the United States annually, it is imperative 
that resources remain focused on securing global commerce without 
interrupting  the  flow  of  legitimate  goods.  To  ensure  these  twin 
goals of trade facilitation and security, CBP will continue to employ 
a  layered  risk-based  approach  to  security.  Our  judgments  will  be 
based  on  the  totality  of  risk  we  face  from  potentially  dangerous 
goods and people entering our nation. 

Over  the  last  several  years,  we  have  devoted  much  discussion 
and effort to container security, but with our layered defense strat-
egy in place, we believe we must devote equal energy and resources 
to  other  potential  threats  to  U.S.  ports  and  other  areas  along  our 
borders in the supply chain. 

Thank  you  very  much  for  the  opportunity  and  I  look  forward  to 

dialogue on this issue with you today. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ahern follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

5 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAYSON AHERN, DEPUTY COMMISSIONER, U.S. CUSTOMS 

AND BORDER PROTECTION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 

Introduction 

Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  distinguished  Members  of 

the Subcommittee: 

Good  morning  and  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  discuss  the  Secure  Freight 
Initiative (SFI) and the recently released report on the initial pilot ports. I want to 
take this opportunity to apologize for submitting the report past the April deadline. 
We  wanted  to  ensure  that  the  report  was  as  robust  as  possible  and  have  worked 
hard  to  provide  a  comprehensive  assessment  of  the  progress  made  at  each  of  the 
seven locations, detail the challenges and successes, and outline the future strategy 
for the deployment of integrated scanning technology abroad. 

I  want  to  thank  the  Committee  for  its  strong  support  of  CBP.  This  Committee 
played  a  central  role  in  the  passage  of  the  Security  and  Accountability  for  Every 
Port (SAFE) Act of 2006, legislation that directed the Department of Homeland Se-
curity (DHS) to explore, on a pilot basis, the feasibility and potential benefits of an 
international  scanning  program  at  three  foreign  ports.  I  look  forward  to  reporting 
back  to  you  on  our  experiences  during  these  pilots  and  on  some  of  the  lessons  we 
have learned. 

I  would  also  like  to  take  the  opportunity  to  thank  the  foreign  governments  and 
customs  officials  that  have  partnered  with  us  throughout  this  process,  as  well  as 
the  port  and  terminal  operators  and  other  stakeholders  whose  support  and  collabo-
ration  was  indispensible.  The  SFI  pilots  have  benefited  from  host  nation  officials 
and  port  operators  willing  to  expend,  to  varying  degrees,  the  resources  associated 
with additional staffing, alarm response protocols, construction and other infrastruc-
ture upgrades. Importantly, this report also includes input from these industry and 
foreign government partners. 

Before  discussing  the  SFI  program,  I  must  note  that  the  success  of  CBP’s  cargo 
security strategy stems from a risk-based, layered enforcement approach. It includes 
advance information, sophisticated technology, and partnerships with the trade com-
munity  and  other  countries.  In  addition  to  requiring  the  SFI  pilots,  the  SAFE  Port 
Act supported the current layered, risk-based approach to maritime and cargo secu-
rity by codifying a number of supply chain security programs that DHS established 
following  the  September  11,  2001  terrorist  attacks  and  which  continue  today.  Spe-
cifically,  the  SAFE  Port  Act  codified  DHS’  advanced  information  requirements  and 
automated  analysis,  the  Customs-Trade  Partnership  Against  Terrorism  (C–TPAT), 
the Container Security Initiative (CSI), and the use of non-intrusive inspection (NII) 
technology to scan high-risk shipments. 

These  programs  form  the  backbone  of  CBP’s  risk-management,  layered  enforce-
ment strategy. To most effectively manage multiple threats to our country, we must 
direct  resources  to  areas  of  greatest  risk.  We  are  constantly  working  to  refine  this 
layered process by strengthening our tools and capabilities, working to maintain an 
appropriate  balance  between  the  wide  range  of  threats  we  face  and  allocating  our 
limited  resources  accordingly.  It  is  important  to  reiterate  that  the  layers  of  this 
strategy  are  interdependent  and  that  different  layers  secure  different  parts  of  the 
supply chain. This approach ensures that cargo is regularly assessed and that secu-
rity does not rely on any single point that could be compromised. 

Although there has been much discussion about maritime container security in re-
cent  years,  we  have  also  been—and  must  remain—focused  on  other  threats  to  our 
borders  and  to  other  components  of  the  supply  chain.  We  must  remain  vigilant  in 
securing  all  conveyances  and  in  screening  passengers  at  our  land  borders,  airports, 
railways,  and  small  vessel  terminals.  In  fact,  although  we  frequently  refer  to  the 
11.5  million  containers  arriving  by  sea,  there  are  an  equal  number  of  truck  con-
tainers arriving across our land borders with Canada and Mexico. 

While increased resources for programs such as SFI have enhanced our ability to 
address maritime container security vulnerabilities, it is important also to recognize 
that 100 percent scanning DOES NOT equal 100 percent security and that no single 
layer  or  tool  in  our  risk-based  approach  should  be  overemphasized  at  the  expense 
of  the  others.  The  strength  of  the  strategy  is  that  it  ensures  continuous  security  at 
multiple  nodes  in  the  supply  chain,  distributing  resources  so  that  focus  on  one 
threat does not overshadow other vulnerable areas that could also be exploited. 
The Secure Freight Initiative (SFI) 

Now  I’d  like  to  turn  my  attention  to  the  international  integrated  scanning  pro-

gram under the Secure Freight Initiative (SFI). 

Under SFI, an integrated scanning system, consisting of radiation portal monitors 
(RPM)  provided  by  DOE/National  Nuclear  Security  Administration  and  non-intru-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

6 

sive  inspection  (NII)  imaging  systems  provided  by  CBP,  is  used  to  scan  containers 
as they move through the pilot locations in the foreign ports. Through optical char-
acter  recognition  (OCR)  technology,  data  from  these  systems  is  integrated  and  pro-
vided  to  CBP  officers  who  can  use  it,  along  with  customary  data  sources,  to  deter-
mine  if  the  container  should  be  referred  to  the  host  nation  for  secondary  examina-
tion prior to being loaded onto a vessel destined for the United States. SFI provides 
additional  data  points  used  by  CBP  officers  in  conjunction  with  advanced  manifest 
data,  such  as  24-hour  rule  information,  Customs-Trade  Partnership  Against  Ter-
rorism  (C–TPAT)  information,  and  the  Automated  Targeting  System  (ATS)  to  iden-
tify  high  risk  containers  that  warrant  additional  scrutiny  prior  to  continuing  on 
through the global supply chain. 

Meeting  the  legislative  requirements  of  the  SAFE  Port  Act,  the  first  three  SFI 
ports  (Puerto  Cortes,  Honduras;  Port  Qasim,  Pakistan;  and  Southampton,  United 
Kingdom) became fully operational on October 12, 2007. Under SFI, DHS and DOE 
work to scan all U.S.-bound maritime containers; the total U.S.-bound container vol-
ume  at  these  three  ports  from  October  12,  2007  to  May  25,  2008  was  170,564  con-
tainers. Furthermore, CBP and DOE are working to pilot scanning equipment in ad-
ditional  complex  environments,  such  as  high-volume  and  transshipment  ports. 
These  additional  locations  include  certain  terminals  in  Hong  Kong  (which  is  now 
fully operational); Salalah, Oman and Port Busan, South Korea. 

With the three initial SFI pilot ports in Honduras, the United Kingdom, and Paki-
stan,  CBP  has  focused  its  efforts  on  exploring  methods  by  which  efficient  operation 
(defined  as  maximizing  the  security  benefit,  minimizing  disruptions  to  port  oper-
ations,  and  containing  costs)  could  be  achieved  within  the  deadline  prescribed  by 
law  (the  SAFE  Port  Act  and  the  9/11  Act).  The  SFI  deployments  in  Honduras,  the 
United  Kingdom,  and  Pakistan  indicate  that  scanning  U.S.-bound  maritime  con-
tainers is possible on a limited scale. 

However, SFI operations in these initial locations benefited from considerable host 
nation  cooperation,  low  transshipment  rates,  and  technology  and  infrastructure 
costs covered primarily by the United States Government—accommodating and sup-
portive conditions that do not exist in all ports shipping to the United States. 

As will be discussed in more detail, the data obtained by the scanning technology 
does have the potential to enhance targeting by providing two additional data points 
(RPM spectra and NII images) to the information and tools already available to CBP 
officers.  CBP  is  committed  to  a  realistic  and  responsible  approach  that  will  incor-
porate  these  scan  data  points  into  our  risk-based  methodology  in  places  where  the 
additional information would be of the most benefit to our targeters. 
SFI Challenges 

The  pilots  have  demonstrated  that  not  just  scanning  equipment,  but  a  combina-
tion of technology, processes, and collaboration is necessary to a successful scanning 
system; additional necessary factors include innovative solutions to operational hur-
dles, useful data that is collected, analyzed and primed to enhance targeting, a col-
laborative  approach  with  the  international  community  and  port  operators,  and  per-
haps  most  importantly,  responsible  and  practical  policies  informed  by  the  totality 
of the threats to which the U.S. remains vulnerable. 

The  continuation  of  operations  in  some  of  the  current  SFI  pilot  locations  will  af-
ford CBP the opportunity to further test possible solutions to the complex challenges 
posed by transshipment and high-volume ports. . While we continue to learn impor-
tant  lessons  in  these  initial  pilot  locations,  CBP  will  focus  future  scanning  deploy-
ments on high-risk trade corridors that represent the greatest threats to the United 
States. Prioritizing deployments in this way will maximize the security benefit that 
can  be  achieved  with  limited  departmental  funds  and  ensure  that  CBP  has  the  ca-
pacity  to  compile,  assess,  and  integrate  the  additional  scan  data  into  its  effective, 
functioning risk-based strategy. 

Thus  far,  the  deployment  of  container  scanning  equipment  at  each  of  the  SFI 
ports  has  presented  certain  operational,  technical,  logistical,  financial,  and  diplo-
matic  challenges  that  will  likely  continue  to  be  encountered,  to  varying  degrees,  as 
SFI deploys to additional locations. These challenges include: 

certain port environments; 

• Sustainability  of  the  scanning  equipment  in  extreme  weather  conditions  and 
• Varying costs of transferring the data back to the United States (National Tar-
• Re-configuring  port  layouts  to  accommodate  the  equipment  without  affecting 
• Developing local response protocols for adjudicating alarms; 

geting Center) in real-time, etc.; 

port efficiency; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

7 

• Addressing  health  and  safety  concerns  of  host  governments  and  respective 

trucking and labor unions; 

• Identifying who will incur the costs for operating and maintaining the scanning 

equipment; 

system; 

• Acquiring  necessary  trade  data  prior  to  processing  containers  through  the  SFI 

• Addressing data privacy concerns in regards to the scanning data; 
• Concluding agreements with partnering nations and terminal operators to docu-
ment  roles  and  responsibilities  regarding  issues  such  as:  ownership,  operation, 
and maintenance of the equipment; sharing of information; and import duty and 
tax considerations; 

• Staffing implications for both the foreign customs service and terminal operator; 
• Licensing requirements for the scanning technology; 
• Reaching  agreement  with  foreign  and  industry  partners  to  continue  scanning 

100 percent of U.S.-bound containers after the pilot ends; and 

• Discussing  the  potential  requirements  for  reciprocal  scanning  of  U.S.  exports. 
While these challenges are consistent at our pilot ports, the remedies must be spe-
cifically  tailored  to  the  unique  characteristics  of  each  port.  One  example  of  a  chal-
lenge requiring different fixes in each location was the different level of automation, 
with  paper-based  rather  than  computerized  systems,  in  some  of  the  initial  SFI 
ports. In many situations, containers can arrive at the port up to several days before 
they  are  loaded  on  vessels.  If  containers  arrive  more  than  one  day  before  lading, 
then  CBP  will  not  yet  have  the  container’s  corresponding  trade  information,  re-
ceived  under  the  24-hour  rule.  Without  information  about  what  is  in  the  container 
or whether it is U.S.-bound, resolving an RPM alarm or image anomaly is more dif-
ficult. CBP addressed this challenge in a variety of ways, including agreements with 
customs partners, terminal operators, and carriers for access to certain information 
(such  as  destination  and  commodity  descriptions  to  identify  U.S.-bound  containers) 
that assisted with the risk assessment process and adjudication of radiation alarms. 
Those  ports  that  lack  an  automated  system  will  provide  additional  challenges  for 
providing manifest and destination information to CBP. 

One  challenge  has  proven  particularly  difficult  to  overcome:  operating  these  sys-
tems  in  a  transshipment  port.  The  initial  SFI  pilots  have  demonstrated  that  tech-
nical and operation solutions are not yet available to capture transshipped cargo ef-
ficiently.  New  equipment  and  software  must  be  developed  to  address  the  consider-
able  challenge  of  scanning  containers  that  often  transit  through  ports  quickly  and 
without  necessarily  being  placed  on  trucks  or  passing  through  port  gates.  To  date, 
SFI  has  progressed  on  a  limited  scale  in  ports  that  take  advantage  of  the  natural 
chokepoints  of  entry  and  exit  gates  to  scan  containers.  This  approach  typically  pre-
vents  significant  impact  on  port  operations,  but  is  not  applicable  in  heavy  trans-
shipment  ports  where  containers  arrive  on  one  ship  and  depart  on  another  without 
entering  or  exiting  through  the  port  gates.  Because  of  shorter  dwell  times  for  con-
tainers,  space  constraints,  lack  of  immediate  availability  of  shipping  data,  and  the 
difficulty  of  identifying  chokepoints  within  busy  container  terminals,  capturing 
transshipped  cargo  without  seriously  impacting  port  operations  remains  a  signifi-
cant  challenge.  Solutions  to  this  challenge  will  depend  upon  the  specific  infrastruc-
ture  conditions  at  any  given  port,  technology  interface  issues,  and  the  development 
of  operational  procedures  in  concert  with  host  nation  and  port  officials.  Advances 
in  technology  that  require  a  smaller  physical  footprint  are  also  essential  to  any  fu-
ture large-scale implementation of SFI. 

The  initial  deployments  under  SFI  also  demonstrate  the  significant  costs  associ-
ated with procuring and deploying scanning technology and the supporting informa-
tion  technology  (IT)  infrastructure.  With  the  announcement  of  SFI  in  2006,  DHS 
and  DOE  each  committed  approximately  $30  million  toward  the  implementation  of 
SFI  at  the  initial  three  ports  and  the  installation  of  equipment  at  three  additional 
ports where integrated scanning is to be demonstrated on a limited scale. 

Costs to industry and foreign partners were minimized during the initial SFI pilot 
by the use of primarily U.S.-owned systems in SFI ports, as well as U.S.-funded up-
grades  to  terminal  operating  systems  (TOS)  and  enhancing  the  local  IT  infrastruc-
ture.  In  addition  to  costs  incurred  by  the  U.S.  Government  associated  with  SFI 
scanning, the terminal operators are also absorbing costs in the form of fuel for the 
trucks, time to run containers through the systems, and utilities. With the exception 
of  Puerto  Cortes,  terminal  operators  do  not  presently  assess  a  fee  to  recoup  their 
costs; however, they may begin to do this after the pilot phase. Additionally, our for-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

8 

eign  Customs  partners  are  absorbing  costs  associated  with  increased  staffing  levels 
including overtime, training, and personnel assigned to full-time operations. 

Although  DHS  and  DOE  funded  the  initial  phase  of  SFI  deployments,  the  equip-
ment,  IT,  and  personnel  costs  associated  with  expanding  the  program  to  cover  all 
U.S.  bound  traffic  from  the  more  than  700  different  ports  that  ship  to  the  United 
States—some  significantly  larger  and  more  complex  than  any  of  the  first  three  pi-
lots—means that the benefit of immediate widespread deployments must be weighed 
against  the  Department’s  funding  needs  to  address  other  homeland  security  prior-
ities. 

While RPM spectra and NII images can be useful additional data points for evalu-
ating the risk of U.S.-bound containers, the lack of universal solutions to make scan-
ning  cost-effective  and  efficient  in  every  port  underlies  the  Department’s  strategy 
to  focus  future  SFI  deployments  on  trade  corridors  that  present  the  highest  risk. 
Gathering scan data from these high risk corridors will provide additional informa-
tion,  consistent  with  the  Department’s  successful  layered  strategy,  for  CBP 
targeters,  enhancing  risk  assessments  in  the  most  vulnerable  areas  without  over-
whelming the Department’s budget, personnel resources, and ability to defeat other 
serious threats to the homeland. 
SFI Benefits 

While  highlighting  many  challenges,  the  SFI  pilots  have  also  produced  valuable 
and  positive  feedback.  SFI,  in  the  initial  three  ports,  has  demonstrated  the  oper-
ational  feasibility  of  integrating  various  scanning  technologies  and  transmitting 
large amounts of data in near-real time for review and analysis. SFI has also dem-
onstrated that scanning data associated with maritime containers at a port of lading 
can  be  integrated  into  CBP’s  ATS  and  reviewed  alongside  the  targeting  system’s 
risk  assessment  rule  sets.  This  information  can  be  successfully  integrated  by  elec-
tronically  linking  specific  container  identification  data  to  that  container’s  scanning 
data. To date, CBP has successfully integrated, transmitted, and received thousands 
of data files from the three operational ports. 

Additionally,  a  preliminary  analysis  of  the  potential  trade  facilitation  benefits  of 
SFI has been positive. Containers arriving in the United States accompanied by SFI 
data do not experience the same rate of examination at U.S. ports as containers that 
originate  from  non-SFI  locations.  As  well,  the  additional  data  elements  gathered  at 
the  foreign  port  assist  CBP  officers  in  more  quickly  and  efficiently  mitigating  risk 
and adjudicating radiation alarms occurring at a domestic seaport. 
SFI Potential Operation in Additional Ports 

As  noted  earlier,  the  implementation  of  SFI  in  Pakistan,  Honduras,  and  the 
United Kingdom, and the limited testing in the four other SFI locations, illustrates 
that the scanning of all U.S.-bound maritime containers in a foreign port is possible 
on a relatively contained scale. As DHS, in conjunction with the DOE and the DOS, 
develops a specific policy forward, we will prioritize our resources and efforts by fo-
cusing  on  specific  higher  risk  trade  corridors  where  the  most  security  benefit  can 
be realized. Based on preliminary results from the three pilot locations, and in light 
of  the  considerable  costs  and  challenges  associated  with  the  deployment  of  SFI/ICS 
systems,  this  high  risk  trade  corridor  approach  accords  with  the  current  risk-based 
strategy,  best  addresses  the  greatest  threats  to  the  United  States,  and  represents 
the  most  worthwhile  investment  of  limited  available  resources  for  the  scanning  of 
cargo containers at foreign ports. 

The  issue  of  container  security  has  precipitated  much  discussion  and  effort  over 
the last several years, but the Department has also been, and must remain, attuned 
to  other  threats  to  U.S.  ports  and  other  potentially  vulnerable  components  of  the 
supply chain. DHS and Congress have dedicated significant resources and efforts to 
our cargo and port security programs which have been instrumental in the develop-
ment  of  the  robust  layered  and  risk-management  approach  currently  in  place.  We 
are  always  eager  to  enhance  these  layers  and  even  further  refine  our  targeting  to 
ensure  that  we  focus  on  those  goods  and  people  that  represent  a  threat  to  our  na-
tion.  I’m  concerned,  however,  that  while  we  continue  to  increase  resources  specifi-
cally  for  container  security  initiatives,  like  SFI,  we  could  be  neglecting  other  areas 
of concern that potentially pose greater risk and vulnerability to the country. Again, 
a risk management approach to security has to be driven by our informed judgment 
about the totality of potential risks to the country, not just risks to a single vector. 
Furthermore,  traffic  congestion  brought  upon  by  the  movement  of  shipping  con-
tainers is a threat to the global economy. The United States is especially vulnerable 
since over 90 percent of its imports and exports move via sea container. As a nation, 
and  as  a  global  trading  partner,  we  must  prioritize  our  security  efforts  to  embrace 
the principle ‘‘to facilitate the movement of commerce’’, and align security programs 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

9 

with  those  efforts  that  enhance  cargo  flow  through  the  supply  chain  in  a  trans-
parent and accountable process. In this way, transportation providers may be more 
effective  and  efficient  in  protecting  our  prosperity  and  those  of  other  trading  part-
ners. 

Thank  you  again  for  this  opportunity  to  testify.  I  look  forward  to  having  a  dia-

logue with this Subcommittee on the merits and future of container scanning. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much, Mr. Ahern. 
Now, do you pronounce your name Huizenga or Huizenga? 
Mr. HUIZENGA. The former, Mr. Chairman. Huizenga. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes, the hockey team owner and that kind 

of thing? 

Mr.  HUIZENGA.  Yes.  I  am  not  sure  if  I  am  a  distant  relative  of 

Uncle Wayne. It is not clear. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. It is worth the search. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. HUIZENGA. We could start a rumor I guess. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Welcome  and  we  invite  you  to  give  your 

testimony. 

STATEMENT OF DAVID HUIZENGA, ASSISTANT DEPUTY 

ADMINISTRATOR, OFFICE OF INTERNATIONAL MATERIAL 

PROTECTION AND COOPERATION, DEFENSE NUCLEAR 
NONPROLIFERATION, NATIONAL NUCLEAR SECURITY 

ADMINISTRATION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY 

Mr. HUIZENGA. Thank you, Chairman Lautenberg, for the oppor-
tunity  to  be  here  today,  along  with  Deputy  Commissioner  Ahern 
and the General Accounting Office to address this important issue. 
I  am  here  to  discuss  the  Department  of  Energy’s  role  in  the  Se-
cure  Freight  Initiative,  which  is  a  partnership  with  the  Depart-
ment  of  Homeland  Security’s  Customs  and  Border  Protection  and 
the State Department. I will highlight recent progress in our efforts 
to  thwart  nuclear  terrorism,  as  well  as  discuss  key  challenges  to 
accelerating  and  expanding  radiation  scanning  of  U.S.-bound  con-
tainers  at  foreign  seaports,  as  required  by  the  SAFE  Port  and 
9/11 Acts. 

For  the  last  15  years,  my  office  has  focused  on  securing  nuclear 
materials  and  weapons  at  well  over  100  facilities  in  Russia  and 
other states of the former Soviet Union. This is the first line of de-
fense  in  a  strategy  to  deny  terrorists  access  to  fissile  materials,  or 
the  essentials  elements  of  a  nuclear  weapon.  We  are  scheduled  to 
complete  the  vast  majority  of  the  security  upgrades  at  these  facili-
ties by the end of 2008. 

As a natural complement to these efforts, in 1998 we established 
the Second Line of Defense Program, or the SLD program. As part 
of the defense-in-depth strategy to protect the U.S. homeland from 
attack  by  a  nuclear  or  radiological  device,  the  SLD  program  pro-
vides  equipment  and  training  to  foreign  authorities  to  help  them 
detect,  deter,  and  interdict  illicit  trafficking  in  nuclear  and  other 
radioactive  materials.  To  date,  we  have  installed  over  1,000  radi-
ation  portal  monitors  at  over  160  sites,  including  vehicle,  rail  and 
pedestrian border crossings, airports and seaports. 

The  Second  Line  of  Defense’s  Megaports  Initiative  was  launched 
in 2003 to address the possibility of nuclear trafficking in the glob-
al  maritime  shipping  system.  Megaports  is  focused  on  radiation 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

10 

scanning  of  containerized  cargo,  including  imports,  exports,  and 
transshipments,  regardless  of  the  destination  of  the  cargo.  Based 
on  research  and  modeling  that  takes  into  account  both  shipping 
volume  and  regional  threat,  Megaports  has  identified  approxi-
mately  75  ports  of  interest  to  be  equipped  by  2013,  which  would 
constitute  over  50  percent  of  the  global  shipping  traffic.  We  have 
made  strong  progress  toward  this  goal.  We  are  operational  in  12 
ports  and  in  various  phases  of  implementation  and  engagement  in 
27 others. 

For  several  years,  the  Megaports  program  has  partnered  with 
CBP  on  its  Container  Security  Initiative,  which  led  naturally  to 
working together on the Secure Freight Initiative. In support of the 
SFI,  we  provided  radiation  detection  equipment,  optical  character 
recognition  technology,  integrated  software  and  communications 
systems,  as  well  as  training  and  maintenance  to  support  the  host 
and U.S. Government officials at the SFI ports. 

So  what  have  we  learned  from  the  SFI  work  and  where  do  we 

go from here? 

I believe that the SFI pilots have demonstrated that 100 percent 
scanning  of  U.S.-bound  containers  is  possible,  albeit  on  a  limited 
scale.  For  example,  we  have  been  able  to  integrate  the  radiation 
scanning equipment with the nonintrusive imaging equipment pro-
vided  by  CBP,  thus  providing  a  more  powerful  tool  for  detecting 
shielded  nuclear  materials  by  allowing  us  to  look  for  anomalies  in 
the  container,  as  well  as  for  a  radiation  alarm.  We  have  been  able 
to  transmit  large  amounts  of  data  on  U.S.-bound  containers  to  the 
local  CSI  representatives  and  to  CBP  in  the  U.S.  for  analysis  and 
have  provided  this  and  other  data  to  the  host  governments.  We 
also  used  the  pilot  effort  in  Southampton  in  the  U.K.  to  dem-
onstrate  the  usefulness  of  an  advanced  spectroscopic  portal  as  a 
secondary  inspection  tool.  All  of  this  has  been  accomplished  with-
out seriously impacting port operations. 

Nonetheless, certain key challenges have been identified through 
the pilot port effort. From a technology and operational perspective, 
the  most  fundamental  challenge  is  to  find  a  way  to  capture  trans-
shipped  cargo  without  seriously  impacting  port  operations.  Since 
transshipped containers do not pass through any entry or exit gate, 
there is no clear choke point at which the radiation portal monitors 
and the imaging equipment can be deployed. The operators of large 
transshipment ports have been consistent in pointing out the oper-
ational difficulty of scanning such cargo. 

In an attempt to overcome this hurdle, we have been working on 
several  innovative  approaches  to  scan  transshipped  cargo  through 
the  use  of  straddle  carriers  as  mobile  radiation  detection  devices, 
and  working  with  CBP  and  DNDO,  on  an  investigation  of  crane- 
mounted detectors. While we are not there yet and the testing con-
tinues,  some  of  these  technologies  appear  to  hold  promise.  I  would 
point out, though, that while a solution to transshipped containers 
may  be  in  the  works  for  radiation  detection,  it  is  unclear  if  such 
solutions  are  applicable  for  the  imaging  component  of  SFI  in  the 
near term. 

The  second  obvious  challenge  is  cost.  Even  if  the  technology  is 
developed  to  effectively  scan  100  percent  of  the  U.S.-bound  con-
tainers  with  both  imaging  and  detection  systems,  it  may  not  nec-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

11 

essarily  be  a  cost-effective  risk  management  strategy  to  equip  the 
700-plus ports that ship directly to the United States. To maximize 
our  efforts  to  successfully  combat  nuclear  terrorism,  we  believe  we 
must  strive  for  an  effective  layered  strategy  that  addresses  mul-
tiple  threats  and  risks.  We  cannot  neglect  our  other  priority  areas 
of  concern,  for  example,  the  First  Line  of  Defense,  by  putting  all 
of  our  resources  into  the  latter,  into  the  Second  Line  of  Defense. 
In an attempt to address this issue, we have developed cost-shar-
ing  arrangements  with  several  SLD  and  Megaports  host  partner 
nations. We also are discussing various models with private indus-
try  and  encouraging  them  to  integrate  scanning  into  their  future 
port operations. We intend to work closely with CBP and the State 
Department  to  promote  a  risk-based  approach  to  guide  implemen-
tation priorities. 

Another  challenge  identified  through  the  pilot  port  effort  con-
cerns  data  sharing.  One  of  our  lessons  learned  has  been  the  dif-
ficulty of overcoming laws that prohibit such sharing of information 
or,  alternatively,  the  lack  of  a  legal  framework  that  will  allow  us 
to negotiate such data sharing. These issues must be addressed on 
a case-by-case basis as they are a point of sensitivity with our part-
ners. 

This  leads,  of  course,  to  the  final  challenge  and  that  is  the  need 
to  ensure  host  nation  and  terminal  operator  buy-in.  None  of  these 
programs  overseas  will  be  successful  without  their  direct  support. 
In  summary,  the  concept  of  scanning  100  percent  of  U.S.- 

bound—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Please conclude as—— 
Mr.  HUIZENGA.—containers  overseas  has  proven  to  be  viable  in 
some  ports,  and  we  believe  that  in  light  of  the  lessons  learned,  a 
balanced  risk-based  approach  to  the  deployment  of  the  systems  is 
the best use of available resources. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Huizenga follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID HUIZENGA,  ASSISTANT DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR, 
OFFICE OF INTERNATIONAL MATERIAL PROTECTION AND COOPERATION,  DEFENSE 
NUCLEAR NONPROLIFERATION,  NATIONAL NUCLEAR SECURITY ADMINISTRATION, 
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY 

Introduction 

Thank  you  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  other  distin-
guished  Members  of  the  Subcommittee.  I  am  the  Assistant  Deputy  Administrator 
for  the  Department  of  Energy—(DOE)  National  Nuclear  Security  Administration’s 
(NNSA) Office of International Material Protection and Cooperation (IMPC). My of-
fice is one of six program offices within the Office of Defense Nuclear Nonprolifera-
tion (DNN). The collective mission of DNN is to detect, prevent, and reverse the pro-
liferation  of  weapons  of  mass  destruction.  Our  programs  are  structured  in  support 
of  multiple  layers  of  defense  against  nuclear  terrorism  and  state-sponsored  nuclear 
proliferation. This multi-layered approach is intended to identify and address poten-
tial  vulnerabilities  within  the  international  nonproliferation  regime,  to  limit  terror-
ists’  access  to  deadly  weapons  and  material,  and  to  prevent  the  illicit  trafficking  of 
dangerous materials that could be used in a nuclear or radiological weapon. 

Today,  I  will  be  discussing  NNSA’s  Megaports  Initiative  and  our  role  in  the  Se-
cure  Freight  Initiative  (SFI).  I  would  like  to  highlight  recent  progress  made  under 
SFI  and  Megaports.  I  will  also  address  some  of  the  positive  lessons  learned  from 
the  SFI  Pilot  deployments  and  key  hurdles  that  we  will  have  to  overcome  in  order 
to accelerate and expand the radiation scanning of U.S.-bound containers at foreign 
seaports as required by the Safe Port and 9/11 Implementation Acts. In short, build-
ing  on  decades  of  experience  securing  nuclear  materials  in  DOE’s  nuclear  weapons 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

12 

complex, NNSA is supplying radiation detection equipment and relevant training to 
the  SFI  ports  to  scan  containers  for  the  presence  of  nuclear  and  other  radioactive 
materials  that  could  be  used  by  terrorists  to  fabricate  a  nuclear  or  radiological  dis-
persal device. 

In  summary,  we  have  learned  a  lot  from  SFI  pilot  implementation.  The  SFI  de-
ployments  in  Honduras,  the  United  Kingdom,  and  Pakistan  indicate  that  scanning 
U.S.-bound maritime containers is possible on a limited scale. We have proven that 
we can effectively integrate data from radiation detection equipment and non-intru-
sive imaging equipment to improve our overall detection capability, and that we can 
take  this  large  amount  of  data  and  transmit  it  near  real-time  to  the  United  States 
for analysis. While we have been successful at these three locations, transshipment 
continues  to  present  the  greatest  challenge  to  fully  implementing  the  100  percent 
scanning  requirements.  It  is  clear  that  obtaining  buy-in  from  the  foreign  govern-
ments  and  key  stakeholders  at  the  port  is  critical  to  success.  Overall,  the  concept 
of  scanning  U.S.-bound  containers  overseas  has  proven  to  be  viable  in  some  cases, 
but  we  continue  to  believe  that  a  risk-based  approach  to  deployment  of  these  sys-
tems is the best use of available resources. 

We know that the threat of nuclear terrorism is real. It is common knowledge that 
AlQa’ida’s  desire  to  develop  weapons  of  mass  destruction  goes  back  at  least  10 
years. But we also know that ongoing nuclear detection efforts have successfully re-
sulted  in  seizures  of  nuclear  and  radiological  materials—underscoring  the  impor-
tance  of  the  nuclear  detection  mission.  For  example,  in  2003,  Georgian  border 
guards,  using  U.S.-provided  portal  monitoring  equipment  at  the  Sadakhlo  border 
crossing  with  Armenia,  detected  and  seized  approximately  173  grams  of  highly  en-
riched  uranium  (HEU)  carried  by  an  Armenian  national.  Also,  in  late  2005,  a 
Megaports radiation portal monitor (RPM) picked up a neutron signal from a scrap 
metal container leaving Sri Lanka bound for India. The source of the signal turned 
out  to  be  an  extremely  small  commercial  neutron  source,  which  was  found  by  the 
Indian  authorities.  More  recently,  in  November  2007,  several  Cesium-137  sources 
were detected in a container of scrap metal leaving Honduras bound for a smelting 
facility  in  the  Far  East.  An  NNSA  team  assisted  the  Honduran  Government  with 
the  recovery  of  the  industrial  sources,  preventing  those  sources  from  reaching,  and 
possibly contaminating, the facility. These examples provide clear evidence that de-
tection  systems  are  effective  in  alerting  us  to  the  presence  of  very  small  quantities 
of radioactive material and therefore play an important role in our efforts to combat 
the threat of nuclear terrorism. 
Overview of the Material Protection Effort 

For  the  last  15  years,  the  IMPC  office  has  focused  on  securing  nuclear  materials 
and weapons at well over 100 research, storage and manufacturing facilities in Rus-
sia and other states of the Former Soviet Union. Our longstanding nonproliferation 
programs in international safeguards and export controls have existed for more than 
30  years,  but  the  dramatic  increase  in  our  efforts  to  secure  nuclear  material  took 
place  in  the  years  following  the  demise  of  the  Soviet  Union.  All  of  our  efforts  are 
centered  on  the  premise  that  confronting  the  threat  of  nuclear  terrorism  as  close 
to the source as possible, far from our borders, is the most effective means to reduce 
the risk of an attack. This focus on securing nuclear weapons and materials in-place 
is  the  first  line  of  defense  in  our  strategy  to  deny  terrorists  access  to  the  essential 
element  of  a  nuclear  weapon—fissile  material.  We  are  scheduled  to  complete  the 
vast majority of the nuclear security upgrades at these facilities by the end of 2008 
as  part  of  the  Bratislava  Agreement  between  President  George  W.  Bush  and  then- 
Russian President Vladimir Putin. 
Second Line of Defense (SLD) Program 

The Second Line of Defense (SLD) Program—the other mission area of my office— 
is  a  natural  complement  to  these  activities  and  supports  the  multi-layered  defense 
system  to  protect  the  U.S.  homeland  from  attack  by  a  nuclear  or  radiological  dis-
persal device. The mission of the SLD program is to strengthen the capability of for-
eign  governments  to  deter,  detect,  and  interdict  illicit  trafficking  in  nuclear  and 
other radioactive materials across international borders and through the global mar-
itime  shipping  system.  Under  this  program,  NNSA  works  collaboratively  with  for-
eign  partners  to  equip  border  crossings,  airports  and  seaports  with  radiation  detec-
tion equipment. SLD provides training in the use of the systems for appropriate law 
enforcement  officials  and  initial  system  sustainability  support  while  the  host  gov-
ernment  assumes  long-term  responsibility  for  the  system’s  operations  and  mainte-
nance.  To  date,  under  the  SLD  Program,  NNSA  has  installed  over  1,000  radiation 
portal  monitors  (RPMs)  at  over  160  sites.  The  SLD  Program  has  recently  awarded 
contracts to three teams at a value of up to $700 million for the equipment, design, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

13 

integration, and construction expertise to support the deployment of systems in ad-
ditional  locations.  The  SLD  program  is  divided  into  two  areas:  the  Core  Program 
and the Megaports Initiative. 

Under  our  Core  Program,  NNSA  focuses  primarily  on  partnerships  in  Russia, 
former  Soviet  states,  and  Eastern  Europe  to  install  radiation  detection  systems  at 
land  borders,  international  airports,  and  strategic  feeder  ports.  The  SLD  Core  Pro-
gram  started  in  1998  in  Russia.  Since  its  inception,  the  Core  Program  has  worked 
closely  with  the  Federal  Customs  Service  of  the  Russian  Federation  to  deploy  radi-
ation detection systems to international crossing points throughout Russia. With our 
Russian  colleagues,  we  have  committed  to  equip  all  border  crossings  in  Russia  (ap-
proximately 350 sites) by 2011. Russian Customs is a full partner in this effort and 
is  paying  to  equip  approximately  half  of  these  sites  themselves.  In  addition,  they 
will be assuming responsibility for the maintenance of all equipment deployed under 
this program by 2013. 
Megaports Initiative 

Building  on  the  experience  we  have  gained  by  equipping  20  seaports  in  Russia 
under the SLD Core Program, in 2003 we expanded the scope of the program to con-
sider  large  seaports  worldwide  with  the  establishment  of  the  Megaports  Initiative. 
This  effort  was  developed  in  response  to  the  concern  that  terrorists  and  states  of 
concern  might  use  the  global  maritime  shipping  network  to  smuggle  nuclear  or 
other radioactive materials to locations where terrorists could utilize those materials 
to  fabricate  or  detonate  a  nuclear  weapon  or  radiological  dispersal  device.  The  goal 
of the Megaports Initiative is to scan as much container traffic at a port as possible 
(including imports, exports, and transshipments) regardless of destination. 

We  began  with  a  focus  on  the  first  20  seaports  in  the  Department  of  Homeland 
Security’s Container Security Initiative (CSI), i.e., the ports shipping the largest vol-
umes  of  containerized  cargo  to  the  United  States.  Supported  by  consultations  with 
the Intelligence Community, private-sector specialists, and our national laboratories, 
we  later  added  a  threat  component  to  our  prioritization  strategy.  As  a  result,  we 
identified approximately 75 ports of interest (i.e., a little over 10 percent of the total 
number of container ports shipping directly to the United States) for the deployment 
of our systems. We update this list periodically based on new information. 

I  am  pleased  to  report  that  we  have  made  significant  progress  on  the  Megaports 
Initiative  over  the  last  5  years.  We  are  currently  operational  in  12  ports  (including 
the three ports selected as pilots under the Department of Homeland Security’s Se-
cure  Freight  Initiative  and  as  mandated  by  the  2006  SAFE  Port  Act).  We  are  at 
various  phases  of  implementation  and  testing  in  27  additional  ports.  We  expect  to 
complete  eleven  of  these  ports  by  the  end  of  this  Fiscal  Year.  We  are  finalizing 
agreements with a number of additional countries and continue to conduct outreach 
and planning activities with approximately 30 other major international seaports in 
anticipation of implementation in the future. Our goal is to equip approximately 75 
priority  ports  by  2013,  at  which  point  we  estimate  that  we  will  be  scanning  over 
50 percent of global shipping traffic. 
Support to Secure Freight Initiative 

NNSA has been partnering with the Department of Homeland Security’s Customs 
and  Border  Protection  (CBP)  for  several  years  on  its  container  security  initiatives. 
The synergy between the Megaports Initiative and the Container Security Initiative 
(CSI)  is  an  important  element  in  ensuring  the  security  of  U.S.-bound  containers— 
radiation  detection  equipment  provided  by  NNSA  under  the  Megaports  Initiative 
provides  an  additional  tool  that  enhances  risk  assessment  and  targeting  activities 
at foreign seaports in support of CSI. NNSA has participated with CBP on joint out-
reach  missions  and  has  signed  seven  agreements  jointly  with  CBP  and  our  inter-
national  partners  to  implement  both  Megaports  and  CSI.  Because  of  the  success  of 
the  Megaports  Initiative  and  our  ongoing  relationship  with  CBP,  partnering  on  the 
Secure Freight Initiative (SFI) mission was a natural fit. 

In support of SFI, NNSA has provided radiation detection equipment, and associ-
ated  optical  character  recognition  (OCR)  technology,  integrated  software  and  com-
munications systems, as well as training and maintenance support, to host and U.S. 
Government  officials  at  SFI  ports.  SFI  builds  upon  existing  port  security  measures 
by utilizing the OCR technology to integrate data from radiation detection and non- 
intrusive imaging equipment, along with data from secondary inspection equipment, 
thereby  providing  more  comprehensive  information  about  U.S.-bound  containers 
that strengthens existing risk assessment efforts. 
SFI Pilot Lessons Learned and Challenges to 100% Scanning 

Let  me  start  by  stating  that  the  SFI  pilots  have  demonstrated  that  100  percent 
scanning  of  U.S.-bound  containers  is  possible  on  a  limited  scale.  Operationally,  we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

14 

have  been  able  to  demonstrate  three  different  approaches  to  integrated  scanning  of 
the  U.S.-bound  containers  at  overseas  ports  that  provide  valuable  lessons  learned 
as  we  look  to  expand  scanning  efforts  to  additional  ports.  We  were  able  to  dem-
onstrate both the feasibility of transmitting large amounts of data in near-real time 
for review and analysis by CBP and the host nation, and the successful integration 
of  multiple  sets  of  data  by  electronically  linking  container  ID  number  to  scanning 
data through use of OCR technology. Coupling radiation scans with imaging efforts 
increases  our  chances  of  detecting  shielded  HEU,  because  the  image  allows  us  to 
look for anomalies within the contents of the shipping container that might indicate 
shielding  and  therefore  warrant  further  inspection.  Under  SFI,  we  have  dem-
onstrated  that  these  two  technologies  can  be  integrated  effectively  without  nega-
tively impacting the flow of commerce, albeit at relatively small ports. We were also 
able  to  take  advantage  of  the  SFI  pilot  project  in  Southampton  England,  to  dem-
onstrate the use of an advanced spectroscopic portal (ASP) as a secondary inspection 
tool  that  should  dramatically  improve  the  secondary  inspection  process  in  terms  of 
reliability, process time, and manpower requirements. Based on lessons learned and 
the  results  of  the  pilot  in  Southampton,  we  plan  to  deploy  ASPs  to  additional 
Megaports around the world for use in secondary inspections. 

Additionally, our partnership with CBP on SFI implementation has been success-
ful  and  the  roles  and  responsibilities  have  been  well  defined.  As  we  have  done  in 
our  cooperation  with  CBP  for  the  last  several  years,  we  continue  to  explore  ways 
to maximize use of NNSA and CBP resources, in order to streamline SFI implemen-
tation and avoid duplication of efforts. 

Nonetheless,  in  addition  to  the  positive  lessons  learned  from  the  SFI  pilot  ports, 
there  are  still  several  challenges  to  implementing  100  percent  scanning  of  all  U.S.- 
bound containers at overseas ports. We believe that scanning U.S.-bound containers 
overseas  is  possible  at  some  locations;  however,  scanning  every  U.S.-bound  con-
tainer  at  a  foreign  port  before  it  arrives  in  the  United  States  presents  significant 
operational,  technical,  cost,  and  diplomatic  challenges.  There  are  a  few  challenges, 
in particular, that I would like to focus on as these have the most direct impact on 
NNSA and the Megaports Initiative. 
Transshipment 

First,  while  the  operational  Megaports  and  the  SFI  pilot  ports  have  shown  that 
gate traffic can be easily captured by taking advantage of existing chokepoints into 
and  out  of  a  port,  transshipped  cargo  continues  to  present  a  significant  challenge 
for both SFI and Megaports implementation. Because of shorter dwell times for con-
tainers,  space  constraints,  availability  of  shipping  data,  and  the  difficulty  of  identi-
fying chokepoints within the container terminals, capturing transshipments without 
seriously impacting port operations requires new and creative solutions. 

From  a  technical  standpoint,  NNSA  has  been  innovative  in  its  approach  to  scan-
ning transshipped containers. The first mobile detection platform, a straddle carrier, 
was deployed at the Port of Freeport in the Bahamas in June 2006 using both plas-
tic  Polyvinyl  Toleune  (PVT)  for  primary  detection  and  a  spectroscopic  detector  for 
secondary  isotopic  identification.  NNSA,  working  in  conjunction  with  the  terminal 
operator, Hutchison Port Holdings, has successfully scanned over 730,000 containers 
at  Freeport  Container  Terminal.  We  will  soon  be  issuing  a  request  for  proposals  to 
provide  straddle  carriers  equipped  with  radiation  detectors  at  additional  trans-
shipment ports. 

NNSA  is  also  evaluating  a  new  mobile  platform  for  scanning  transshipped  con-
tainers  on  the  quay  at  the  Port  of  Salalah,  Oman.  The  mobile  system  will  increase 
the  number  of  transshipped  containers  that  can  be  scanned  as  well  as  improve  the 
effectiveness  and  efficiency  of  the  scanning  process  of  transshipped  containers  with 
the  same  efficiency  as  fixed  monitors.  Containers  will  be  scanned  using  the  Mobile 
Radiation Detection and Identification System (MRDIS)—utilizing a plastic PVT for 
primary  detection  and  a  second  MRDIS  unit  with  spectroscopic  detectors  for  sec-
ondary isotopic identification. 

NNSA is currently analyzing crane-based technology, which, if proven effective for 
the  radiation  detection  component,  would  improve  our  ability  to  scan  transshipped 
containers.  In  this  regard,  we  are  working  closely  with  our  colleagues  at  CBP  and 
at  the  Domestic  Nuclear  Detection  Office  (DNDO)  in  evaluating  private-sector  ef-
forts to develop a crane-based radiation detection system utilizing existing spreader- 
bar technology. We recently conducted a suite of tests on a spreader-bar in the Port 
of  Oakland,  California,  and  will  be  participating  in  CBP’s  upcoming  evaluation  of 
spreader-bar  systems  at  their  test  bed  at  the  Port  of  Tacoma,  WA.  We  anticipate 
conducting  additional  testing  and  analysis  on  the  effectiveness  of  these  systems  at 
one of our national laboratories later this summer. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

15 

While we are hopeful that these technologies will help address the transshipment 
issue for radiation scanning, it is currently unclear if it would be possible to pursue 
similar technological solutions to conduct the complementary non-intrusive imaging 
(NII) scan. In the near term, coupling radiation scans with NII operations at trans-
shipment ports is likely to continue to pose significant technological and operational 
challenges. 
Cost 

Moving  beyond  operational  and  technical  challenges,  there  is  also  a  significant 
cost  to  scanning  all  U.S.-bound  containers  before  they  reach  the  homeland.  Even  if 
technology is developed to effectively scan 100 percent of U.S.-bound containers with 
both  the  detection  and  imaging  systems  without  impacting  port  operations,  it  may 
not necessarily be a cost-effective risk management strategy to equip the 700+ ports 
that  ship  directly  to  the  United  States.  As  I  mentioned  earlier,  Megaports  and  SFI 
are  two  programs  that  support  a  multi-layered  approach  to  increasing  our  security 
against nuclear and radiological threats and defending the homeland from terrorist 
attacks.  We  need  to  ensure  that  we  continue  to  expand  nuclear  detection  and  con-
tainer security efforts overseas without neglecting other areas of concern that poten-
tially  pose  greater  risk  and  vulnerability  to  the  country.  For  example,  NNSA  also 
has  a  responsibility  to  apply  resources  and  efforts  to  broader  nonproliferation  pro-
grams  including  our  international  material  protection  program—securing  materials 
at  the  source—and  the  SLD  Core  Program.  We  must  strive  for  an  effective  layered 
strategy that addresses multiple threats and risks in order to reduce the likelihood 
that  dangerous  materials  will  fall  into  the  hands  of  terrorists.  NNSA  will  continue 
to  promote  the  use  of  a  risk-based  approach  to  guide  implementation  priorities  to 
scanning U.S.-bound containers. We will work closely with our interagency partners 
to  prioritize  countries  and  ports  as  we  move  ahead  with  the  Megaports  Initiative 
and  implementation  of  SFI,  as  this  approach  allows  us  to  utilize  our  resources  and 
funding in the most effective way. 

One  obvious  way  to  address  the  cost  of  overseas  scanning  is  to  encourage  cost- 
sharing  with  host  governments  and  with  private  industry.  Indeed  under  the 
Megaports  program,  we  are  finding  ways  to  do  this  where  we  provide  equipment 
and training and the host government is responsible for design, construction and in-
stallation  costs.  We  are  also  discussing  various  models  with  industry  and  encour-
aging  them  to  integrate  scanning  into  their  fundamental  port  operations.  Beyond 
purchasing  and  installing  radiation  detection  equipment,  an  integrated  scanning 
system  requires  effective  staffing  levels  to  assess  and  respond  to  radiation  alarms 
and  image  anomalies.  Our  host  nation  partners  (both  government  and  private  sec-
tor) will also have to absorb costs associated with increased staffing levels including 
overtime, training, and personnel assigned to full-time operations. 
Data Sharing 

Our partnership with the host government also relies on the exchange of informa-
tion, including scan and image data. One of the lessons learned during the SFI pilot 
phase  is  that  for  some  countries,  the  data  sharing  requirement  presents  a  signifi-
cant challenge, either because there are specific laws that prohibit or limit the pro-
vision  of  this  type  of  information  or  because  there  is  no  existing  legal  framework 
to  allow  it  to  happen.  These  concerns,  along  with  the  issue  of  reciprocal  provision 
of  information  on  cargo  leaving  the  U.S.,  will  need  to  be  addressed  if  we  continue 
to expand SFI. 

Information  exchange  is  also  an  important  element  of  the  Megaports  Initiative. 
Under  Megaports,  we  have  been  able  to  address  this  issue  by  limiting  the  informa-
tion  we  receive  to  data  on  detections  and  seizures  and  by  developing  specific  data- 
sharing  formats;  however,  it  is  important  to  note  that  data  under  Megaports  is  not 
received in real-time. It is provided to CSI if in-country and to the Embassy. 
Stakeholder Partnerships 

Which brings me to the last point . . . a critical aspect to implementation of scan-
ning  initiatives  is  host  nation  and  terminal  operator  buy-in.  I  cannot  underscore 
enough that SFI or Megaports Initiative implementation cannot be successful with-
out the partnership of the host nation, port authority, terminal operators, and other 
key  stakeholders  at  the  port.  We  have  been  very  successful  where  we  have  strong 
partnership  with  our  host  nation  partners.  Alternatively,  we  have  had  considerable 
implementation challenges where we have not. For that reason, we will continue to 
partner with CBP to conduct joint outreach missions in attempt to garner both host 
government and private-sector support for these critical initiatives. We believe that 
integrating  security  measures  into  the  design  and  business  practices  of  the  supply 
chain  will  improve  security  with  the  least  amount  of  disruption  to  legitimate  trade 
and  could  ultimately  reduce  costs  through  increased  efficiencies.  NNSA  will  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

16 

tinue to work closely with DHS, host nations, and the major marine terminal opera-
tors  to  develop  and  implement  strategies  for  increasing  container  security  without 
impacting port operations. 

All in all, the lessons learned during Phase I of SFI implementation have provided 
us with useful information on how to move ahead with our nuclear detection efforts 
in the future. However, there are many hurdles and significant costs associated with 
100  percent  scanning  of  U.S.-bound  containers  that  need  to  be  carefully  considered 
as we move forward with the SFI program. 
Conclusion 

In  summary,  NNSA  is  committed  to  continue  to  expand  our  Megaports  program 
to scan overseas containers independent of destination and partner with CBP in the 
SFI  efforts  to  scan  U.S.-bound  containers.  As  we  consider  the  expansion  of  SFI,  I 
believe  that  NNSA  and  CBP  should  continue  to  work  together  to  identify  the  ports 
at  which  we  would  like  to  work  by  applying  the  principles  of  risk-based 
prioritization, which include both volume and regional threat. We have both utilized 
such approaches successfully in the past. 

We  will  also  continue  to  work  with  DHS  and  the  private  sector  to  explore  new 
concepts of operation that will enable us to scan more containers and to investigate 
new technologies to scan transshipped containers without impacting port operations. 
We  will  continue  to  advocate  with  the  major  marine  terminal  operators  that 
partnering with NNSA and DHS on these container security initiatives makes good 
business sense. 

Finally, while NNSA will continue to support SFI implementation, the Megaports 
mission has proven to be an important element of our multi-layered defense strategy 
both from a nonproliferation and counter-terrorism perspective. Indeed, the program 
is  already  operational  in  12  ports  around  the  world  and  several  more  ports  should 
go  operational  this  year.  NNSA  will  continue  to  push  forward  with  the  Megaports 
Initiative to meet our goal of 75 Megaports by 2013. 

I want to thank Congress for their continued support of our program. I hope that 
the  information  that  I  have  provided  will  be  useful  to  the  Subcommittee  as  it  con-
siders the SFI pilot project and the future of SFI implementation. 

Thank you. I would be happy to answer any questions you may have. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
Mr. Caldwell? 

STATEMENT OF STEPHEN L. CALDWELL, DIRECTOR, 

HOMELAND SECURITY AND JUSTICE ISSUES, 

U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE (GAO) 

Mr. CALDWELL. Thank you very much, Chairman Lautenberg, for 

inviting me here to testify on our supply chain security work. 

My statement is based on about 5 years’ worth of work that GAO 
has  done  on  supply  chain  security.  Through  that  time,  we  have 
noted  that  DHS  has  made  progress  in  a  number  of  ways  in  devel-
oping these programs as part of its layered security strategy to pre-
vent WMD from entering the United States through containers. 

As  part  of  this  layered  strategy,  CBP’s  risk-based  approach  in-
cluded two facets, one using shipment information to detect anoma-
lies  that  might  indicate  that  a  container  is  a  high-risk  container 
and  only  then  applying  the  additional  scrutiny  of  scanning  such 
high-risk  containers.  This  risk-based  approach  was  an  attempt  to 
balance the need to improve security while also facilitating the free 
flow of trade. 

CBP’s strategy also pushed out the borders through various part-
nerships.  These  partnerships  were  bilateral  in  the  sense  that  we 
work  with  other  countries  through  CSI.  They  are  multilateral  in 
the  fact  that  we  work  through  multilateral  organizations  such  as 
the World Customs Organization, and there are also private sector 
partnerships  such  as  the  C–TPAT  program.  I  think  we  all  recog-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

nize  that  the  private  sector  actually  runs  most  of  the  port  infra-
structure. 

17 

And  we  have  reported  positively  on  many  of  the  outcomes  of 
these partnerships. There is good working relationships in many of 
the  CSI  ports  between  the  U.S.  and  the  host  nation.  There  is  a 
movement  toward,  if  not  the  achievement  yet,  of  an  international 
standardized  approach  to  supply  chain  security  through  the  World 
Customs Organization’s SAFE framework. And finally, there is the 
industry adoption of improved security standards. 

Now, to make these partnerships work, an important part of that 
was  the  shared  resource  burden.  It  was  shared  in  terms  of  CSI 
which was a program where we actually had U.S. staff out at these 
locations  at  these  ports,  but  the  host  nation  supplied  their  own 
equipment, as well as their own staff to help assist us in targeting 
and inspecting containers. 

The  current  approach  to  SFI  that  CBP  has  taken,  shares  some 
of the characteristics that I have already talked about. In terms of 
risk  management,  part  of  the  SFI  program  is  the  10  plus  2  secure 
filing,  and  this  has  been  developed  as  part  of  the  risk-based  strat-
egy  to  plug  some  of  the  holes  in  information  that  currently  exist 
in the 24-hour rule. 

In  terms  of  partnerships,  the  10  plus  2  program  has  also  been 
developed in partnership with industry and international organiza-
tions, and similarly the SFI pilot program has been developed with 
partnerships  in  the  sense  that  CBP  found  volunteer  ports  in  coun-
tries that were willing to participate. 

In  terms  of  resources,  again  there  was  some  sharing  of  the  re-
source  burden.  The  U.S.  Government  supplied  the  equipment  gen-
erally, whether it was DOE or CBP. The U.S. Government supplied 
some of our own staff, over there. But those countries and the port 
operators, we have to recognize, also supplied a substantial amount 
of resources as well. 

But  the  ultimate  purpose  of  the  SFI  pilot  was  not  to  continue 
this  layered  strategy  as  much  as  to  test  the  options  of  going  in  a 
different direction, 100 percent scanning. And now CBP awkwardly 
finds itself at a crossroad trying to maintain its existing risk-based 
strategy  at  the  same  time  Congress  is  asking  it,  in  some  ways,  to 
go in the opposite direction. 

Most  of  the  observers  believe  that  the  100  percent  scanning  ap-
proach  is  contrary  to  risk  management  in  that  it  applies  the  same 
assumption  of  risk  to  all  containers  before  any  analysis  is  done  of 
risk levels. 

In  addition,  the  100  percent  scanning  requirement  is  also  con-
trary  to  the  partnership  approach  that  has  been  used  so  far,  and 
there have been quite a lot of complaints about this from our part-
ners,  whether  they  be  international  organizations,  other  countries, 
or the private sector. 

Moreover, unlike some of the resource sharing that has occurred 
so  far,  there  seems  to  be  an  expectation  that  foreign  governments 
and  foreign  ports  will  be  picking  up  all  or  most  of  the  additional 
costs associated with this. So not surprisingly, foreign governments 
are  responding  that  the  flow  of  trade  is  going  to  be  harmed.  They 
are  talking  about  a  reciprocal  requirement  which  would  require 
that  the  U.S.  scan  all  of  its  outbound  containers.  Most  observers 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

18 

within  CBP  and  our  own  port  operators  have  raised  concerns  at 
least  to  us  in  terms  of  the  difficulties  that  would  be  involved  in 
that. 

Similarly,  some  of  the  officials  in  either  foreign  governments  or 
the  private  sector  question  the  value  of  some  of  the  existing  U.S. 
programs  like  CSI  and  C–TPAT.  If  everything  is  going  to  be 
scanned, they ask what is the point of the risk-based system? 

Given that the 100 percent requirement is in our view a marked 
departure  from  the  existing  strategy,  we  advise  to  proceed  with 
caution here. CBP needs to continue thoroughly evaluating the SFI 
program, laying out all the potential challenges and potential ways 
to overcome those challenges. 

And now that the CBP report to Congress is out, we at GAO will 
start  working  with  your  staff,  as  well  as  other  Committees,  to  re-
view  that  program  in  detail  and  provide  additional  information  on 
the way ahead. 

Thank you. I would be pleased to answer any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Caldwell follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEPHEN L. CALDWELL, DIRECTOR, HOMELAND SECURITY 

AND JUSTICE ISSUES, U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE (GAO) 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee: 
I  am  pleased  to  be  here  today  to  discuss  challenges  to  100  percent  scanning  of 
U.S.-bound  cargo  containers.  More  than  700  foreign  seaports  ship  cargo  containers 
to the United States and over 11 million oceangoing cargo containers arrived at U.S. 
seaports  last  year.  The  terrorist  attacks  of  2001  heightened  concerns  about  the  po-
tential vulnerability of U.S.-bound cargo containers to terrorist exploitation, and the 
prevention of such activity became a goal for the Federal Government. 

Within  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS),  U.S.  Customs  and  Border 
Protection  (CBP)  is  responsible  for  preventing  terrorists  and  weapons  of  mass  de-
struction  (WMD)  from  entering  the  United  States,  including  the  potential  WMD 
threat  posed  by  the  movement  of  oceangoing  cargo  containers.  As  it  performs  this 
mission,  CBP  maintains  two  overarching  and  sometimes  conflicting  goals—increas-
ing security while facilitating legitimate trade. To address these goals, CBP has de-
veloped  a  layered  security  strategy  that  includes  the  Container  Security  Initiative 
(CSI)  and  the  Customs-Trade  Partnership  Against  Terrorism  (C–TPAT).  The  CSI 
program, begun in 2002, aims to deter and detect the smuggling of WMD via cargo 
containers  before  they  reach  U.S.  seaports.  At  the  58  seaports  participating  in  the 
CSI  program  as  of  January  2008,  foreign  governments  allow  CBP  personnel  to  be 
stationed at the seaports and use intelligence and automated risk assessment infor-
mation to determine whether U.S.-bound shipments are at risk of containing WMD 
or other terrorist contraband—a process referred to as targeting. CBP personnel can 
then  request  that  host  government  customs  officials  scan  the  identified  high-risk 
cargo.1 CBP also operates C–TPAT, a voluntary partnership with the trade commu-
nity,  in  which  member  companies  commit  to  improving  the  security  of  their  supply 
chains  and  develop  security  profiles  that  outline  the  companies’  security  measures. 
Because of their cooperation, and after verification by CBP that such stronger meas-
ures  are  in  place,  C–TPAT  members  generally  are  subjected  to  reduced  levels  of 
CBP scrutiny of their shipments. 

To  further  address  container  security  concerns,  Congress  passed,  and  the  Presi-
dent  signed,  the  Security  and  Accountability  for  Every  (SAFE)  Port  Act  in  October 
2006,  which  includes  provisions  that  codified  CSI  and  C–TPAT,  both  of  which  had 
been  CBP  initiatives  but  not  previously  required  by  law.2 In  addition,  the  act  calls 
for  the  establishment  of  a  pilot  program  to  test  the  feasibility  of  scanning  100  per-
cent of U.S.-bound cargo containers and directs CBP to require transmission of addi-
tional  data  from  importers  and  cargo  carriers  for  improved  targeting  of  U.S.-bound 
cargo  containers.  CBP  is  implementing  these  requirements  as  part  of  its  Secure 

1 Examining cargo containers involves using radiation detection equipment or nonintrusive im-
aging  equipment,  which  may  include  X-ray  or  gamma  ray  technology,  or  both,  to  determine  if 
a cargo container poses a WMD risk. 

2 Pub. L. No. 109–347, 120 Stat. 1884. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

19 

Freight Initiative (SFI) program. The SAFE Port Act also requires that 100 percent 
of  U.S.-bound  cargo  containers  be  scanned  using  nonintrusive  imaging  equipment 
and  radiation  detection  equipment  at  foreign  seaports  as  soon  as  feasible.  The  SFI 
pilot  program  tests  the  feasibility  of  using  this  equipment  and  implementing  100 
percent scanning at seven foreign seaports. In August 2007, the Implementing Rec-
ommendations of the 9/11 Commission Act (9/11 Act) was enacted, which revised the 
SAFE  Port  Act  provision  on  100  percent  scanning  to  require  implementation  by 
2012,  with  possible  exceptions  for  seaports  for  which  DHS  certifies  that  specified 
conditions exist.3 

We have issued several reports over the past few years relating to cargo container 
security that include challenges that are also applicable to 100 percent scanning be-
cause of the similarities in the operations of the programs reviewed and their over-
all purpose to strengthen cargo security.4 This statement discusses these and other 
challenges  that  relate  to  the  continuation  of  the  SFI  pilot  program  and  the  longer- 
term  requirement  to  scan  100  percent  of  all  cargo  containers  bound  for  the  United 
States. 

The information in this testimony is based on GAO reports and testimonies issued 
from  July  2003  through  April  2008  addressing  cargo  container  security  operations 
and  programs,  as  well  as  ongoing  work  concerning  CBP’s  international  efforts  for 
the Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation; the Senate Com-
mittee  on  Homeland  Security  and  Governmental  Affairs  and  its  Permanent  Sub-
committee  on  Investigations;  and  the  House  Committee  on  Energy  and  Commerce, 
to be published later this year. For this ongoing work, we reviewed CBP documents, 
such  as  the  report  on  the  SFI  program  required  by  the  2006  DHS  Appropriations 
Act.5 We also reviewed documentation from the World Customs Organization (WCO) 
related  to  international  initiatives  for  enhancing  supply  chain  security.6 We  also 
analyzed documents from some of CBP’s international partners, which include Euro-
pean Commission comments on the SFI Pilot Seaport at Southampton, United King-
dom (UK); a position paper from the Association of German Port Operators; and re-
ports on 100 percent scanning issued by the World Shipping Council and the WCO. 
In addition, we reviewed available documentation, such as reports and international 
agreements,  related  to  CBP’s  work  in  the  international  trade  community.  We  also 
met  in  Washington,  D.C.,  with  CBP  officials  who  have  program  responsibilities  for 
international  affairs  and  trade,  as  well  as  with  representatives  from  the  European 
Commission,  the  WCO,  and  industry  representative  groups  to  discuss  multilateral 
and bilateral efforts to promote security of the supply chain—the flow of goods from 
manufacturer  to  retailer.  We  also  visited  six  CSI  seaports  located  overseas  to  meet 
with local customs officials, selecting the locations based on geographic and strategic 
significance,  container  volume  to  the  United  States,  the  dates  when  the  seaports 
began conducting CSI operations. Although the perspectives of the officials we spoke 
with cannot be generalized across the wider population of countries that participate 
in  the  CSI  or  C–TPAT  programs  or  that  ship  container  cargo  to  the  United  States, 
they  provided  us  with  an  overall  understanding  of  how  CSI  operations  were  con-
ducted,  as  well  as  views  on  scanning  100  percent  of  U.S.-bound  cargo  containers. 
We conducted our work from May 2006 to June 2008 in accordance with generally 
accepted government auditing standards. Those standards require that we plan and 
perform  the  audit  to  obtain  sufficient,  appropriate  evidence  to  provide  a  reasonable 
basis for our findings and conclusions based on our audit objectives. We believe that 
the  evidence  obtained  provides  a  reasonable  basis  for  our  findings  based  on  our 
audit objectives. 
Summary 

In our previous and ongoing work on maritime container security issues, we have 
identified  numerous  challenges  related  to  the  continuation  of  the  SFI  pilot  and  the 
longer-term  requirement  to  scan  100  percent  of  all  cargo  containers  bound  for  the 
United States. These challenges are in the following nine areas: 

• Workforce planning: Given the additional scanning equipment used—as well as 
the additional cargo containers to be scanned—the SFI pilot, as well as 100 per-
cent  scanning,  program  could  generate  an  increased  quantity  of  scan  data. 
Therefore,  CBP  could  face  even  greater  staffing  challenges  because  more  CBP 

3 Pub. L. No. 110–53, § 1701(a), 121, Stat. 266, 489–90 (amending 6 U.S.C. § 982(b)). 
4 See the end of this statement for a list of related GAO products. 
5 In  addition  to  this  report,  the  SAFE  Port  Act  also  required  that  CBP  produce  a  report  on 
lessons  learned  from  the  SFI  pilot  program;  however,  this  report  was  not  available  as  of  the 
time we prepared this statement. 

6 The WCO is an independent international organization whose mission is to enhance the effi-

ciency and effectiveness of customs administrations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

20 

officers will be required to review and analyze these data for participating sea-
ports.  Furthermore,  our  past  work  on  maritime  container  security  found  weak-
nesses in CBP’s workforce planning. 

• Host  nation  examination  practices:  While  the  SAFE  Port  and  9/11  Acts  require 
DHS to develop operational and equipment standards for the scanning systems 
used  for  100  percent  scanning,  CBP  does  not  systematically  collect  information 
on the efficacy of host government examination systems. 

• Measuring  performance:  While  the  intention  of  the  SFI  pilot  program  and  100 
percent scanning is to increase security for the United States, CBP has had on-
going  difficulties  in  defining  performance  measures  for  its  maritime  container 
security programs to indicate whether security is increased. 

• Resource  responsibilities:  It  is  unclear  who  will  pay  for  additional  resources— 
including  increased  staff,  equipment,  and  infrastructure—and  who  will  be  re-
sponsible  for  operating  and  maintaining  the  equipment  used  for  the  statutory 
requirement  to  scan  100  percent  of  U.S.-bound  cargo  containers  at  foreign  sea-
ports. Neither the SAFE Port Act nor the 9/11 Act specifies whether the Federal 
Government will bear the cost of scanning 100 percent of U.S.-bound cargo con-
tainers. 
• Logistics: Scanning equipment is sometimes placed miles from where cargo con-
tainers are stored, which could add to the time and cost requirements for scan-
ning  these  containers,  and  transshipment  cargo  containers—containers  moved 
from one vessel to another—are only available for scanning for a comparatively 
short period of time and may be difficult to access. 
• Technology  and  infrastructure:  Issues,  such  as  environmental  conditions  that 
damage  equipment  and  cause  delay,  limited  bandwidth  capacity  of  local  infra-
structure, and compatibility with older equipment have presented difficulties in 
the SFI pilot program. 
• Use  and  ownership  of  data:  While  the  SAFE  Port  Act  specifies  that  scan  data 
produced  in  the  SFI  pilot  program  should  be  available  for  review  by  U.S.  offi-
cials,  legal  restrictions  in  foreign  countries  may  make  it  difficult  to  share  this 
information with CBP. In some cases, transferring such information to U.S. offi-
cials could require new international agreements. 
• Consistency  with  risk  management:  International  partners  state  that  100  per-
cent scanning is inconsistent with widely accepted risk management principles, 
and  some  CBP  international  partners  have  stated  that  the  requirement  could 
potentially reduce the security of the supply chain by diverting scarce resources 
away from other essential security measures. 
• Reciprocity  and  trade  concerns:  Foreign  governments  could  call  for  reciprocity 
of  100  percent  scanning,  requiring  the  United  States  to  scan  container  exports 
to  those  countries.  This  will  be  a  challenge,  as  CBP  officials  have  stated  that 
the  agency  does  not  have  the  resources  to  scan  other  countries’  exports  leaving 
the  United  States.  Further,  some  view  this  scanning  requirement  as  a  barrier 
to trade. 
Background 
CBP  Has  Developed  a  Layered  Security  Strategy  to  Help  Implement  Its  Risk 

Management Approach 

CBP  has  developed  a  layered  security  strategy  that  provides  multiple  opportuni-
ties  to  mitigate  threats  and  allows  CBP  to  focus  its  limited  resources  on  cargo  con-
tainers  that  are  the  most  likely  to  pose  a  risk  to  the  United  States.  Risk  manage-
ment is a strategy called for by Federal law and Presidential directive and is meant 
to help policymakers and program officials most effectively mitigate risk while allo-
cating limited resources under conditions of uncertainty. This layered security strat-
egy  is  composed  of  different  but  complementary  initiatives  and  programs,  such  as 
CSI  and  C–TPAT,  which  build  on  each  other  and  work  with  other  Federal  security 
programs,  such  as  the  Department  of  Energy’s  (DOE)  Megaports  Initiative.7 This 
layered strategy attempts to address cargo container security comprehensively while 
ensuring that security attention is directed toward the highest-risk containers with-
in the supply chain. 

7 Begun in 2003, DOE’s Megaports Initiative complements CBP’s layered security strategy by 
providing foreign nations with radiation detection equipment, such as radiation portal monitors, 
to  scan  cargo  containers  moving  through  their  seaports.  As  of  February  2008,  the  Megaports 
Initiative  was  fully  operational  at  12  foreign  seaports  and  in  various  stages  of  implementation 
at 17 others. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

21 

The Container Security Initiative 

CBP’s  CSI  program  aims  to  identify  and  examine  U.S.-bound  cargo  that  pose  a 
high  risk  of  concealing  WMD  or  other  terrorist  contraband  by  reviewing  advanced 
cargo  information  sent  by  ocean  cargo  carriers.  As  of  January  2008,  CBP  operated 
CSI in 58 foreign seaports, which, at the time, accounted for 86 percent of all U.S.- 
bound cargo containers. As part of the CSI program, CBP officers, usually stationed 
at  foreign  seaports,  seek  to  identify  high-risk  U.S.-bound  cargo  containers  by  using 
information from cargo carriers as well as reviewing data bases and interacting with 
host  government  officials.  When  requested  by  CBP,  host  government  customs  offi-
cials  examine  the  high-risk  container  cargo  by  scanning  it  using  various  types  of 
nonintrusive  inspection  (NII)  equipment,  such  as  large-scale  X-ray  machines,  or  by 
physically  searching  a  container’s  contents  before  it  is  sent  to  the  United  States.8 
Customs-Trade Partnership against Terrorism 

Initiated  in  November  2001,  the  C–TPAT  program  aims  to  secure  the  flow  of 
goods bound for the United States by developing a voluntary antiterrorism partner-
ship  with  stakeholders  from  the  international  trade  community.9 To  join  C–TPAT, 
a company submits a security profile, which CBP compares to its minimum security 
requirements for the company’s trade sector. CBP then reviews the company’s com-
pliance with customs laws and regulations and any violation history that might pre-
clude  the  approval  of  benefits—which  includes  reduced  scrutiny  or  expedited  proc-
essing  of  the  company’s  shipments.  CBP  data  show  that  from  2004  through  2006, 
C–TPAT  members  were  responsible  for  importing  about  30  percent  of  U.S.-bound 
cargo  containers,  specifically  importing  29.5  percent  of  the  11.7  million  oceangoing 
cargo  containers  off-loaded  in  the  United  States  in  the  first  9  months  of  2007.  As 
of  May  2008,  there  were  over  8,400  C–TPAT  members  from  the  import  trade  com-
munity that had various roles in the supply chain. 
The Importance of International Partnerships 

To  more  effectively  implement  the  components  of  its  layered  security  strategy, 
CBP  has  worked  to  promote  international  partnerships  to  enhance  security  so  that 
high-risk cargo can be identified before it arrives in the United States. For the CSI 
program, CBP has negotiated and entered into nonbinding, reciprocal arrangements 
with  foreign  governments,  specifying  the  placement  of  CBP  officials  at  foreign  sea-
ports  and  the  exchange  of  information  between  CBP  and  foreign  customs  adminis-
trations.  These  arrangements  allow  participating  foreign  governments  the  oppor-
tunity  to  place  their  customs  officials  at  U.S.  seaports  and  request  inspection  of 
cargo  containers  departing  from  the  United  States  that  are  bound  for  their  respec-
tive  countries.  CBP  also  works  with  other  customs  organizations  to  enhance  inter-
national  supply  chain  security.  For  example,  CBP  has  taken  a  lead  role  in  working 
with  foreign  customs  administrations  and  the  WCO  to  establish  and  implement 
international  risk-based  management  principles  and  standards,  similar  to  those 
used  in  the  CSI  and  C–TPAT  programs,  to  improve  the  ability  of  member  customs 
administrations to increase the security of the global supply chain while facilitating 
international trade. The member countries of the WCO, including the United States, 
adopted  such  risk-based  principles  and  standards  through  the  WCO  Framework  of 
Standards to Secure and Facilitate Global Trade (commonly referred to as the SAFE 
Framework), in June 2005. 
The  SAFE  Port  Act  Requires  a  Pilot  Program  to  Test  the  Feasibility  of  100  Percent 

Scanning 

To improve maritime container security, the SAFE Port Act was enacted in Octo-
ber  2006  and  requires,  among  other  things,  that  CBP  conduct  a  pilot  program  to 
determine  the  feasibility  of  scanning  100  percent  of  U.S.-bound  containers.  It  also 
specifies that the pilot should test integrated scanning systems that combine the use 
of  radiation  portal  monitors  and  NII  equipment,  building  upon  CSI  and  the 
Megaports  Initiative.  To  fulfill  this  and  other  requirements  of  the  SAFE  Port  Act, 
CBP  and  DOE  jointly  announced  the  formation  of  SFI  in  December  2006.  The  first 
phase  of  SFI  is  the  International  Container  Security  project—commonly  known  as 

8 There  are  generally  two  types  of  CSI  cargo  container  examinations—scanning  with  NII 
equipment and physical searches. To scan cargo containers, CSI depends on imaging equipment, 
which may use X-rays or gamma rays to create images of the container’s contents, and radiation 
detection  equipment.  CBP  officials,  along  with  host  government  officials,  may  review  the  infor-
mation  produced  with  the  scanning  equipment  to  determine  the  presence  of  WMD.  Depending 
on the results of the scans, physical searches may be conducted. 

9 Stakeholders  of  the  international  trade  community  include  importers;  customs  brokers;  air, 

sea, and land carriers; and other logistics service providers, such as freight consolidators. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

22 

the  SFI  pilot  program.10 The  SFI  pilot  program  tests  the  feasibility  of  100  percent 
scanning of U.S.-bound container cargo at seven overseas seaports and involves the 
deployment  of  advanced  cargo  scanning  equipment  and  an  integrated  examination 
system.  The  advanced  cargo  scanning  equipment—NII  and  radiation  detection 
equipment—produce  data  to  indicate  the  presence  of  illicit  nuclear  and  radiological 
material  in  containers.  The  integrated  examination  system  then  uses  software  to 
make  this  information  available  to  CBP  for  analysis.  According  to  CBP,  it  will  re-
view  the  scan  data  at  the  foreign  seaport  or  at  CBP’s  National  Targeting  Center- 
Cargo (NTCC) in the United States.11 If the scanning equipment indicates a poten-
tial  concern,  both  CSI  and  host  government  customs  officials  are  to  simultaneously 
receive  an  alert  and  the  specific  container  is  to  be  further  inspected  before  it  con-
tinues on to the United States. 

As shown in table 1, under the SFI pilot program, three SFI seaports are to scan 
100 percent of U.S.-bound container cargo that passes through those seaports, while 
the other four seaports are to deploy scanning equipment in a more limited capacity. 

Table 1.—Information on the Seven Foreign Seaports Participating in the SFI Pilot Program 

SFI port 

Qasim, Pakistan 

Puerto Cortez, Honduras 

Southampton, UK 

Deployment 

level 

when pilot 
operational 

Full c 

Full c 

Full c 

Testing date a 

Operational date b 

March 2007 

October 12, 2007 

April 2007 

October 12, 2007 

August 2007 

October 12, 2007 

Volume of 
U.S.-bound 
containers, 
Fiscal Year 2006 

2,058 

77,707 

31,780 

610,061 

Busan, South Korea 

Limited d 

Salalah, Oman 

Singapore 

Limited d 

Limited d 

April 2008 
(projected) 

May 2008 
(projected) 

June 2008 
(projected) 

To be determined 

To be determined 

81,333 

To be determined 

376,846 

Hong Kong 

Limited d 

November 2007 

January 2008 

1,333,812 

Source:  U.S.  Customs  and  Border  Protection. 
a Testing  date  is  defined  as  the  date  when  the  scanning  systems  are  in  place  and  operational  testing  begins. 
b Operational  date  is  defined  as  the  date  when  the  SFI  scanning  data  are  transmitted  successfully  to  the  local  central  alarm 

station  and  to  the  CBP  network  in  the  United  States. 

c Fully  operational  seaports  are  to  scan  100  percent  of  U.S.-bound  container  cargo  under  the  SFI  pilot  program. 
d Limited  operation  seaports  are  to  scan  less  than  100  percent  of  U.S.-bound  container  cargo.  For  these  seaports,  CBP  plans  to 

conduct  SFI  operations  at  a  reduced  level,  typically  limited  to  one  terminal  in  the  port,  such  as  Gamman  Terminal  in  Busan. 
As  required  by  the  SAFE  Port  Act,  CBP  was  to  issue  a  report  in  April  2008  on 
the  lessons  learned  from  the  SFI  pilot  program  and  the  need  and  feasibility  of  ex-
panding  the  100  percent  scanning  system  to  other  CSI  seaports,  among  other 
things.12 As we prepared this statement, CBP had not yet issued this report. Every 
6  months  after  the  issuance  of  this  report,  CBP  is  to  report  on  the  status  of  full- 
scale deployment of the integrated scanning systems at foreign seaports to scan 100 
percent of U.S.-bound cargo. 
The  SFI  Pilot  Program  and  100  Percent  Scanning  Face  a  Number 

of Challenges 

We  identified  challenges  in  nine  areas  that  are  related  to  the  continuation  of  the 
SFI pilot program and the longer-term 100 percent scanning requirement: (1) work-
force planning, (2) the lack of information about host government cargo examination 

10 The  second  phase  of  SFI  is  still  in  development.  This  phase  involves  the  advance  trans-

mission of cargo information from importers and cargo carriers. 

11 According to CBP, the National Targeting Center (NTC) was established in response to the 
need  for  proactive  targeting  aimed  at  preventing  acts  of  terror  and  to  seize,  deter,  and  disrupt 
terrorists  and  implements  of  terror.  NTC  originally  combined  both  passenger  and  cargo  tar-
geting  in  one  facility.  It  was  later  divided  into  NTCC  and  the  National  Targeting  Center-Pas-
senger.  For  purposes  of  this  report,  we  use  NTCC  in  our  references  since  its  mission  is  to  sup-
port CBP cargo-targeting operations. 

12 6 U.S.C. § 981(d). The DHS Appropriations Act for Fiscal Year 2007, enacted shortly before 
the  SAFE  Port  Act,  also  required  a  pilot  program  to  test  100  percent  scanning  at  three  ports, 
and  established  similar,  but  not  identical,  requirements  for  the  program.  For  example,  the  re-
port  to  Congress  on  lessons  learned  is  to  include  a  plan  and  schedule  to  expand  the  scanning 
system developed under the pilot to other CSI ports rather than an assessment of the need and 
feasibility of such an expansion. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

23 

systems,  (3)  measuring  performance  outcomes,  (4)  undefined  resource  responsibil-
ities  for  the  cost  and  labor  for  implementation,  (5)  logistical  feasibility  for  scanning 
equipment and processes, (6) technological issues, (7) the use and ownership of scan-
ning data, (8) a perceived disparity between 100 percent scanning and the risk man-
agement  approach  of  CBP’s  international  partners,  and  (9)  potential  requests  for 
reciprocity from foreign governments. 
Workforce Planning Will Be Critical to Success 

In  our  prior  work  examining  the  CSI  and  C–TPAT  programs,  we  reported  that 
CBP  faced  challenges  identifying  an  appropriate  number  of  positions  for  the  pro-
grams and finding enough qualified people to fill these positions.13 For example, we 
reported in 2005 and again in 2008 that CBP’s human capital plan did not system-
atically  determine  the  optimal  number  of  officers  needed  at  each  CSI  seaport  to 
carry  out  duties  that  require  an  overseas  presence  (such  as  coordinating  with  host 
government officials or witnessing the examinations they conduct) as opposed to du-
ties that could be performed remotely in the United States (such as reviewing data 
bases).14 Determining optimal staffing levels is particularly important since CBP re-
ports facing ongoing challenges identifying sufficient numbers of qualified employees 
to staff the program. For example, CBP officials reported that 9 qualified applicants 
applied for 40 permanent positions at CSI seaports. We also reported that according 
to CBP officials, to fill open CSI positions, officers have in some cases been deployed 
who  have  not  received  all  required  training.  We  recommended  in  April  2005  that 
CBP  revise  the  CSI  staffing  model  to  consider:  (1)  what  functions  need  to  be  per-
formed  at  CSI  seaports  and  what  can  be  performed  in  the  United  States,  (2)  the 
optimum levels of staff needed at CSI seaports to maximize the benefits of targeting 
and  inspection  activities  in  conjunction  with  host  nation  customs  officials,  and  (3) 
the  cost  of  locating  targeters  overseas  at  CSI  seaports  instead  of  in  the  United 
States.15 CBP  agreed  with  our  recommendation  on  CSI’s  staffing  model  and  said 
that  modifications  to  the  model  would  allow  program  objectives  to  be  achieved  in 
a  more  cost-effective  manner.  CBP  said  that  it  would  evaluate  the  minimum  level 
of  staff  needed  at  CSI  seaports  to  maintain  ongoing  dialogue  with  host  nation  offi-
cials, as well as assess the staffing levels needed domestically to support CSI activi-
ties. However, as of January 2008, CBP’s human capital plan did not systematically 
make these determinations. 

The  ability  of  the  SFI  pilot  program—and  by  extension  the  100  percent  scanning 
requirement  of  the  SAFE  Port  and  9/11  Acts—to  operate  effectively  and  enhance 
maritime  container  security  depends,  in  part,  on  the  success  of  CBP’s  ability  to 
manage  and  deploy  staff  in  a  way  that  ensures  that  critical  security  functions  are 
performed.  Under  the  CSI  program,  CBP  operated  and  conducted  cargo  container 
scanning  at  58  foreign  seaports  as  of  January  2008;  however,  given  that  additional 
scanning  equipment  will  be  used  in  the  SFI  pilot  program,  and  fulfilling  the  100 
percent  scanning  requirement  will  naturally  increase  the  number  of  containers  to 
be scanned at the more than 700 seaports that ship cargo to the United States, the 
SFI pilot program and 100 percent scanning requirement will generate an increased 
quantity of scan data. According to European customs officials, for there to be value 
added  in  these  additional  scans,  the  scan  data  must  be  reviewed.  Therefore,  in  im-
plementing the 100 percent scanning requirement, CBP will face staffing challenges 
because more CBP officers will be required to review and analyze these data for par-
ticipating seaports. 
CBP  Generally  Lacks  Key  Information  on  Host  Government  Examination 

Systems Because of Sovereignty Constraints 

As we reported in January 2008, CBP does not systematically collect information 
on  CSI  host  governments’  examination  equipment  or  processes.16 We  noted  that 
CBP  must  respect  the  sovereignty  of  countries  participating  in  CSI  and,  therefore, 
cannot require that a country use specific scanning equipment or follow a set of pre-

13 For  our  prior  recommendations  and  observations  on  C–TPAT’s  workforce  challenges,  see 
GAO,  Container  Security:  Expansion  of  Key  Customs  Programs  Will  Require  Greater  Attention 
to Critical Success Factors, GAO 03 770 (Washington, D.C.: July 25, 2003). Also, see GAO, Cargo 
Security:  Partnership  Program  Grants  Importers  Reduced  Scrutiny  with  Limited  Assurance  of 
Improved Security, GAO–05–404 (Washington, D.C.: Mar. 11, 2005). 

14 GAO, Container Security: A Flexible Staffing Model and Minimum Equipment Requirements 
Would Improve Overseas Targeting and Inspection Efforts, GAO 05 557 (Washington, D.C.: Apr. 
26,  2005)  and  GAO,  Supply  Chain  Security:  Examinations  of  High-Risk  Cargo  at  Foreign  Sea-
ports  Have  Increased,  but  Improved  Data  Collection  and  Performance  Measures  Are  Needed, 
GAO 08 187 (Washington, D.C.: Jan. 25, 2008). 

15 GAO–05–557. 
16 GAO–08–187. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

24 

scribed examination practices. Thus, while CBP has set minimum technical criteria 
to  evaluate  the  quality  and  performance  of  equipment  being  considered  for  use  at 
domestic  seaports,  it  has  no  comparable  standards  for  scanning  equipment  used  at 
foreign seaports. In addition, CBP officials stated that there are no plans to evaluate 
examination  equipment  at  foreign  seaports  against  the  domestic  criteria.  CBP  offi-
cials  added,  however,  that  the  capabilities  of  scanning  equipment  are  only  one  ele-
ment  for  determining  the  effectiveness  of  examinations  that  take  place  at  CSI  sea-
ports.  It  is  better,  in  their  view,  to  make  assessments  of  the  processes,  personnel, 
and equipment that collectively constitute the host governments’ entire examination 
systems. However, in January 2008, we reported that CBP does not gather this type 
of  information  and  recommended  that  CBP,  in  collaboration  with  host  government 
officials, improve the information gathered at each CSI port by: (1) establishing gen-
eral  guidelines  and  technical  criteria  regarding  the  minimal  capability  and  oper-
ating procedures for an examination system that can provide a basis for determining 
the  reliability  of  examinations  and  related  CSI  activities;  (2)  systematically  col-
lecting data for that purpose; and (3) analyzing the data against the guidelines and 
technical  criteria  to  determine  what,  if  any,  mitigating  actions  or  incentives  CBP 
should  take  to  help  ensure  the  desired  level  of  security.  CBP  partially  concurred 
with  this  recommendation  in  terms  of  improving  the  information  gathered  about 
host  governments’  examination  systems.  In  particular,  CBP  agreed  on  the  impor-
tance of an accepted examination process and noted that it continues to improve the 
information it gathers. CBP did not indicate that it would systematically pursue in-
formation  on  these  host  government  examination  systems.  It  did  state  that  it  was 
working  through  the  WCO  to  address  uniform  technical  standards  for  equipment. 
We  reported  that  while  CBP  engaged  with  international  trade  groups  to  develop 
supply  chain  security  requirements,  these  requirements  do  not  specify  particular 
equipment capabilities or examination practices. 

Both  the  SAFE  Port  and  9/11  Acts  require  DHS  to  develop  technical  and  oper-
ational standards for scanning systems; therefore, the challenges that CSI has faced 
in obtaining information about host governments’ examination systems are relevant 
to  the  SFI  pilot  program  and  the  100  percent  scanning  requirement.17 However,  as 
noted  earlier  in  this  statement,  the  United  States  cannot  compel  foreign  govern-
ments  to  use  specific  equipment  for  the  SFI  pilot  program  or  the  100  percent  scan-
ning  requirement,  thus  challenging  CBP’s  ability  to  set  and  enforce  standards.  In 
addition,  because  CBP  does  not  systematically  collect  information  on  the  efficacy  of 
host  governments’  examinations  systems,  it  lacks  reasonable  assurance  that  these 
examinations could reliably detect and identify WMD unless it implements our Jan-
uary  2008  recommendation  to  determine  actions  to  take  to  ensure  the  desired  level 
of security. This is particularly important since currently, under CSI, most high-risk 
cargo  containers  examined  at  international  seaports  are  not  re-examined  upon  ar-
rival at domestic seaports. 
Measuring Performance, Particularly Outcomes, Will Be Difficult 

In  our  reviews  of  the  CSI  and  C–TPAT  programs,  we  identified  challenges  with 
CBP’s  ability  to  measure  program  performance  because  of,  among  other  things,  the 
difficulty  in  determining  whether  these  programs  were  achieving  their  desired  re-
sult  of  increasing  security  for  the  United  States.18 In  the  past,  we  and  the  Office 
of  Management  and  Budget  (OMB)  have  acknowledged  the  difficulty  in  developing 
outcome-based performance measures for programs that aim to deter or prevent spe-
cific  behaviors.19 In  the  case  of  C–TPAT,  we  noted  in  our  March  2005 20 and  April 
2008 reports that CBP had not developed a comprehensive set of performance meas-

17 The  SAFE  Port  Act  directs  DHS  to:  (1)  establish  technical  criteria  and  standard  operating 
procedures for the use of NII equipment at CSI seaports and (2) require CSI seaports to operate 
the  equipment  in  accordance  with  the  criteria  and  operating  procedures  established  by  DHS. 
The  act  states  that  the  technical  criteria  and  operating  procedures  should  not  be  designed  to 
conflict  with  the  sovereignty  of  host  countries,  but  it  did  not  address  host  government  s’  sov-
ereignty  related  to  requirements  for  CSI  seaports  to  operate  the  equipment  in  accordance  with 
the criteria and procedures. The 9/11 Act directs DHS to establish technological and operational 
standards for systems to conduct 100 percent scanning of containers and to ensure that this and 
other  actions  taken  to  implement  100  percent  scanning  are  consistent  with  the  United  States’ 
international obligations. 

18 For  more  information  on  the  difficulty  that  CSI  has  had  in  developing  outcome-based  per-
formance  measures  and  in  measuring  the  deterrence  effect  of  the  program,  see  GAO–08–187. 
19 According  to  OMB,  outcome  measures  describe  the  intended  result  of  carrying  out  a  pro-
gram  or  activity.  For  example,  for  a  tornado  warning  system,  a  measure  of  outcome  could  be 
the number of lives saved and amount of property damage averted. 

20 GAO–05–404  and  GAO,  Supply  Chain  Security:  U.S.  Customs  and  Border  Protection  Has 
Enhanced Its Partnership with Import Trade Sectors, but Challenges Remain in Verifying Secu-
rity Practices, GAO–08–240 (Washington, D.C.: Apr. 25, 2008). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

25 

ures  and  indicators  for  the  programs,  such  as  outcome-based  measures,  to  monitor 
the  status  of  program  goals.  A  senior  CBP  official  stated  that  developing  these 
measures  for  C–TPAT,  as  well  as  other  CBP  programs,  has  been  difficult  because 
CBP lacks the data necessary to determine whether a program has prevented or de-
terred  terrorist  activity.  We  recommended  that  CBP  complete  the  development  of 
performance measures, to include outcome-based measures and performance targets, 
to  track  the  program’s  status  in  meeting  its  strategic  goals.  CBP  agreed  with  our 
recommendation  on  developing  performance  measures,  and  had  developed  initial 
measures  relating  to  membership,  inspection  percentages,  and  validation  effective-
ness. However, as we reported in April 2008, CBP had yet to develop measures that 
assess  C–TPAT’s  progress  toward  achieving  its  strategic  goal  to  ensure  that  its 
members  improve  the  security  of  their  supply  chains  pursuant  to  C–TPAT  security 
criteria. 

Given  that,  as  with  CSI  and  C–TPAT,  the  purpose  of  the  SFI  pilot  program  and 
the 100 percent scanning provision is to increase security for the United States, the 
same challenges related to defining and measuring performance could also apply to 
the  SFI  pilot  program  and  the  100  percent  scanning  provision.  Without  outcome- 
based  performance  measures,  it  will  be  difficult  for  CBP  and  DHS  managers  and 
Congress  to  effectively  provide  program  oversight  and  determine  whether  100  per-
cent scanning achieves the desired result—namely increased security for the United 
States. 
Resource  Responsibilities  for  Implementing  100  Percent  Scanning  Have  Not  Been 

Determined 

While CBP and DOE have purchased security equipment for foreign seaports par-
ticipating  in  the  SFI  pilot  program,  it  is  unclear  who  will  pay  for  additional  re-
sources—including  increased  staff,  equipment,  and  infrastructure—and  who  will  be 
responsible  for  operating  and  maintaining  the  equipment  used  for  the  statutory  re-
quirement  to  scan  100  percent  of  U.S.-bound  cargo  containers  at  foreign  seaports. 
According  to  CBP,  the  average  cost  of  initiating  operations  at  CSI  seaports  was 
about  $395,000  in  2004  and  $227,000  in  2005.21 By  comparison,  CBP  reported  that 
it  and  DOE  have  spent  approximately  $60  million,  collectively,  to  implement  100 
percent  scanning  at  the  three  foreign  seaports  fully  participating  in  the  SFI  pilot 
program.22 The  SAFE  Port  and  9/11  Acts  did  not  require  nor  prohibit  the  Federal 
Government from bearing the cost of scanning 100 percent of U.S.-bound cargo con-
tainers.23 According  to  customs  officials  in  the  U.K.  who  participated  in  the  SFI 
pilot  program  at  the  Port  of  Southampton,  resource  issues  will  inhibit  their  ability 
to  implement  permanently  the  100  percent  scanning  requirement.  For  example, 
these  customs  officials  commented  that  to  accommodate  the  SFI  pilot  program  at 
the  Port  of  Southampton,  existing  customs  staff  had  to  be  reallocated  from  other 
functions.  The  U.K.  customs  officials  further  stated  that  this  reallocation  was  fea-
sible  for  the  6-month  pilot  program,  but  it  would  not  be  feasible  on  a  permanent 
basis. Similarly, a customs official from another country with whom we met told us 
that while his country does not scan 100 percent of exports, its customs service has 
increased  its  focus  on  examining  more  exported  container  cargo,  and  this  shift  has 
led to a 50 percent increase in personnel. 

European government officials expressed concerns regarding the cost of equipment 
to meet the 100 percent scanning requirement, as well as the cost of additional per-
sonnel necessary to operate the new scanning equipment, view and transmit the im-
ages  to  the  United  States,  and  resolve  false  alarms.  Though  CBP  and  DOE  have 
provided the bulk of equipment and other infrastructure necessary to implement the 
SFI pilot program, they have also benefited from host nation officials and port oper-
ators willing to provide, to varying degrees, the resources associated with additional 
staffing,  alarm  response  protocols,  construction,  and  other  infrastructure  upgrades. 
However, according to CBP, there is no assurance that this kind of mutual support 

21 CBP had used the average cost per CSI port to achieve operational status as a performance 
measure. However, agency officials told us that they stopped using the measure in 2006 because 
at  that  point,  the  majority  of  CSI  seaports  had  already  become  operational  and  because  there 
were too many variables beyond CBP’s control in the calculation. 

22 Under  the  SFI  pilot  program,  three  seaports  will  scan  100  percent  of  U.S.-bound  container 
cargo  while  the  remaining  four  will  scan  less  than  100  percent  of  U.S.-bound  container  cargo. 
CBP  will  conduct  a  reduced  level  of  SFI  operations  at  these  four  seaports,  typically  limited  to 
one terminal in the port, such as Gamman Terminal in Busan or the Brani Terminal in Singa-
pore. 

23 However,  the  Congressional  Budget  Office  assumed  in  its  analysis  of  estimates  for  imple-
menting  this  requirement  that  the  cost  of  acquiring,  installing,  and  maintaining  systems  nec-
essary to comply with the 100 percent scanning requirement would be borne by foreign seaports 
so that they could maintain trade with the United States. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

26 

is  either  sustainable  in  the  long  term  or  exists  in  all  countries  or  at  all  seaports 
that export goods to the United States. 
Logistical Feasibility Could Vary by Seaport 

Logistical  issues,  such  as  crowded  terminal  facilities  and  the  variety  of  transpor-
tation  modes  at  terminals,  could  present  challenges  to  the  SFI  pilot  program  and 
implementation  of  100  percent  scanning.  Seaports  may  lack  the  space  necessary  to 
install  additional  scanning  equipment  needed  to  comply  with  the  100  percent  scan-
ning requirement. For example, we observed that scanning equipment at some sea-
ports  is  located  several  miles  away  from  where  cargo  containers  are  stored,  which 
could  add  to  the  time  and  cost  requirements  for  scanning  these  containers.  Simi-
larly,  while  some  seaports  have  natural  bottlenecks  that  allow  for  container  scan-
ning  equipment  to  be  placed  such  that  all  outgoing  containers  would  have  to  pass 
through  the  equipment,  not  all  seaports  are  so  configured,  and  the  potential  exists 
for  containers  to  be  shipped  to  the  United  States  without  being  scanned.  Another 
potential  logistical  vulnerability  is  related  to  the  transportation  modes  by  which 
cargo  containers  arrive  and  pass  through  seaports.  For  example,  cargo  containers 
that  arrive  at  a  seaport  by  truck  or  rail  are  generally  easier  to  isolate,  whereas 
transshipment  cargo  containers—those  moved  from  one  vessel  to  another—are  only 
available  for  scanning  for  a  comparatively  short  time  and  may  be  more  difficult  to 
access.24 For example, U.K. customs officials stated that it was not possible to route 
transshipment containers that arrived by sea through the SFI equipment. As a con-
sequence,  according  to  CBP  officials,  the  scanning  of  transshipment  containers  has 
not  begun  at  the  Port  of  Southampton.  CBP  and  European  customs  officials  evalu-
ating the SFI pilot program stated that while the pilot has been comparatively suc-
cessful at relatively lower-volume seaports, such as Southampton, implementing 100 
percent scanning would be significantly more challenging at seaports with a higher 
volume of cargo container traffic or greater percentages of transshipment cargo con-
tainers. 
Technology and Compatibility Issues Could Present Challenges 

The  SFI  pilot  program  currently  faces  technology  challenges,  such  as  mechanical 
breakdowns of scanning equipment because of environmental factors, inadequate in-
frastructure  for  the  transmission  of  electronic  information,  and  difficulties  in  inte-
grating  different  generations  of  scanning  equipment.  Environmental  conditions  at 
some  sites  can  compromise  the  effectiveness  of  radiation  detection  equipment  used 
in the SFI pilot program. For example, two of the three seaports fully participating 
in  the  SFI  pilot  program  experienced  weather-related  mechanical  breakdowns  of 
scanning  equipment.  Specifically,  at  the  Port  of  Southampton,  a  piece  of  radiation 
scanning  equipment  failed  because  of  rainy  conditions  and  had  to  be  replaced,  re-
sulting  in  2  weeks  of  diminished  scanning  capabilities.  Additionally,  Port  Qasim  in 
Pakistan  has  experienced  difficulties  with  scanning  equipment  because  of  the  ex-
treme  heat.  Because  of  the  range  of  climates  at  the  more  than  700  other  inter-
national  seaports  that  ship  cargo  to  the  United  States,  these  types  of  technological 
challenges could be experienced elsewhere. 

The  limited  infrastructure  at  some  foreign  seaports  poses  a  challenge  to  the  in-
stallation  and  operation  of  radiation  detection  equipment,  as  well  as  to  the  elec-
tronic transmission of scan data to CBP officers in the United States. Many seaports 
are located in remote areas that often do not have access to reliable supplies of elec-
tricity  or  infrastructure  needed  to  operate  radiation  portal  monitors  and  associated 
communication systems. For example, at Port Salalah in Oman, a key challenge has 
been the cost of data transmission, because of low bandwidth communications infra-
structure,  to  send  data  to  the  CBP  officers  who  review  the  scans.  Prior  to  SFI,  the 
CSI  office  in  Port  Salalah  already  used  transmission  technology  that  cost  annually 
about  10  times  that  of  other  SFI  seaports.  To  participate  in  SFI,  CBP  originally 
planned  to  procure  additional  technology  costing  approximately  $1.5  million  each 
year to transmit the SFI data from Port Salalah. However, CBP was able to devise 
a lower-cost option that involved sharing communications infrastructure with exist-
ing CSI operations at the port because U.S.-bound container volume is relatively low 
in Oman. While CBP reported that this solution could keep data transmission costs 
down at other low-volume seaports, it is unclear whether this could be accomplished 
at higher-volume seaports. In addition to compatibility with existing infrastructure, 
SFI  seaports  have  experienced  compatibility  issues  with  equipment  from  different 
generations.  According  to  CBP,  there  are  various  manufacturers  of  equipment  used 
at  CSI  seaports,  and  although  the  integration  of  equipment  and  technology  at  SFI 

24 Similarly,  it  may  be  difficult  to  scan  cargo  containers  that  remain  on  board  a  vessel  as  it 

passes through a foreign seaport. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

27 

pilot  program  seaports  has  generally  been  successful,  it  has  not  been  without  chal-
lenges.  For  example,  at  Port  Salalah  integration  of  a  large  number  of  new  pieces 
of equipment by new vendors caused operational delays. 
Use and Ownership of Data Have Not Been Determined 

The  legislation  that  mandated  the  SFI  pilot  program  and  100  percent  scanning 
does  not  specify  who  will  have  the  authority  or  responsibility  to  collect,  maintain, 
disseminate,  view,  or  analyze  scan  data  collected  on  cargo  containers  bound  for  the 
United States. While the SAFE Port Act specifies that SFI pilot program scan data 
should  be  available  for  review  by  U.S.  Government  officials,  neither  it  nor  the  9/ 
11  Act  establishes  who  is  to  be  responsible  for  managing  the  data  collected  at  for-
eign  seaports.  Other  unresolved  questions  include  ownership  of  data,  how  propri-
etary  information  is  to  be  treated,  and  how  privacy  concerns  are  to  be  addressed. 
For example, officials from U.K. Customs stated that U.K. privacy legislation barred 
sharing information on cargo containers with CBP unless a specific risk was associ-
ated with the containers. To comply with U.K. laws, while still allowing CBP to ob-
tain scan data on container cargo, U.K. Customs and CBP negotiated working prac-
tices to allow CBP to use its own handheld radiation scanning devices to determine 
whether  cargo  containers  emitted  radiation,  but  this  was  only  for  purposes  of  the 
SFI pilot program. According to the European Commission, for 100 percent scanning 
to go forward, the transfer of sensitive information would have to take place system-
atically, which would only be possible if a new international agreement between the 
United  States  and  the  European  Union  (EU)  was  enacted.  In  the  absence  of  agree-
ments with the host governments at the more than 700 seaports that ship cargo to 
the United States, access to data on the results of container scans could be difficult 
to ensure. 
CBP  International  Partners  Have  Stated  That  100  Percent  Scanning  Is  Inconsistent 

with Widely Accepted Risk Management Practices 

Some of CBP’s international partners, including foreign customs services, port op-
erators, trade groups, and international organizations, have stated that the 100 per-
cent  scanning  requirement  is  inconsistent  with  widely  accepted  risk  management 
principles,  and  some  governments  have  expressed  to  DHS  and  Congress  that  100 
percent  scanning  is  not  consistent  with  these  principles  as  contained  in  the  SAFE 
Framework.25 Similarly, some European customs officials have told us that the 100 
percent  scanning  requirement  is  in  contrast  to  the  risk-based  strategy  behind  CSI 
and C–TPAT, and the WCO has stated that implementation of 100 percent scanning 
would  be  ‘‘tantamount  to  abandonment  of  risk  management.’’  In  addition,  some  of 
CBP’s international partners have stated that the requirement could potentially re-
duce security. For example, the European Commission noted that there has been no 
demonstration  that  100  percent  scanning  is  a  better  means  for  enhancing  security 
than  current  risk-based  methods.  Further,  CBP  officials  have  told  us  that  the  100 
percent scanning requirement may be a disincentive for foreign countries or compa-
nies  to  adopt  risk-based  security  initiatives,  such  as  CSI,  C–TPAT,  or  the  SAFE 
Framework.  Similarly,  in  April  2008,  the  Association  of  German  Seaport  Operators 
released  a  position  paper  that  stated  that  implementing  the  100  percent  scanning 
requirement  would  undermine  mutual,  already  achieved  security  successes  and 
hinder maritime security by depriving resources from areas that present a more sig-
nificant threat and warrant closer scrutiny. 
100  Percent  Scanning  Could  Lead  to  Calls  for  Reciprocity  and  Be  Viewed  as  a 

Barrier to Trade 

Implementation  of  the  100  percent  scanning  requirement  could  result  in  calls  for 
reciprocity  of  scanning  activities  from  foreign  officials  and  be  viewed  as  a  barrier 
to  trade.  European  customs  officials,  as  well  as  officials  from  the  WCO,  have  ob-
jected to the unilateral nature of the 100 percent scanning requirement, noting that 
this  requirement  contrasts  with  prior  multilateral  efforts  CBP  has  implemented. 
Similarly,  the  Association  of  German  Port  Operators  published  a  position  paper 
stating  that  the  legislative  requirement  inherently  ignores  the  international  char-
acter of global maritime trade and is a classic example of an issue that should have 
been discussed with and passed by the legislative body of an international organiza-
tion,  such  as  the  WCO.  In  its  report  on  the  SFI  pilot  program,  the  European  Com-
mission expressed concern that it would be difficult for EU customs administrations 

25 Currently,  the  CSI  program  employs  a  risk  management  approach  to  identify  cargo  con-
tainers at high risk of containing WMD for scanning with nonintrusive imaging equipment and 
possible  physical  inspection  before  being  placed  on  vessels  bound  for  the  United  States.  In  con-
trast, the 100 percent scanning approach subjects to all U.S.-bound cargo containers to scanning 
with nonintrusive imaging equipment regardless of risk. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

28 

to implement a measure designed to protect the United States that would divert re-
sources  away  from  strengthening  EU  security.  Customs  officials  from  Europe,  as 
well as members of the World Shipping Council and the Federation of European Pri-
vate Port Operators, indicated that should implementation of the 100 percent scan-
ning  requirement  be  pursued,  foreign  governments  could  establish  similar  require-
ments  for  the  United  States,  forcing  U.S.  export  cargo  containers  to  undergo  scan-
ning  before  being  loaded  at  U.S.  seaports.  According  to  CBP  officials,  the  SFI  pilot 
program,  as  an  extension  of  CSI,  allows  foreign  officials  to  ask  the  United  States 
to  reciprocate  and  scan  100  percent  of  cargo  containers  bound  for  their  respective 
countries.  CBP  officials  told  us  that  CBP  does  not  have  the  personnel,  equipment, 
or  space  to  scan  100  percent  of  cargo  containers  being  exported  to  other  countries, 
should it be requested to do so. 

In  addition  to  the  issue  of  reciprocity,  European  and  Asian  government  officials, 
as well as officials from the WCO, have stated that 100 percent scanning could con-
stitute  a  barrier  to  trade.  For  example,  the  Association  of  German  Seaport  Opera-
tors stated that the 100 percent mandate would amount to an unfair nontariff trade 
barrier  between  the  United  States  and  foreign  seaports.  Similarly,  senior  officials 
from  the  European  Commission  expressed  concern  that  a  100  percent  scanning  re-
quirement  placed  on  foreign  seaports  could  disrupt  the  international  trading  sys-
tem.26 Further,  the  WCO  passed  a  unanimous  resolution  in  December  2007,  ex-
pressing concern that implementation of 100 percent scanning would be detrimental 
to  world  trade  and  could  result  in  unreasonable  delays,  port  congestion,  and  inter-
national trading difficulties.27 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  this  concludes  my  prepared 
statement.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  CBP  and  the  Congress  to  track 
progress  of  the  SFI  pilot  and  to  identify  the  way  forward  for  supply  chain  security. 
I would be happy to respond to any questions you may have. 
Related GAO Products 

Supply  Chain  Security:  U.S.  Customs  and  Border  Protection  Has  Enhanced  Its  Partnership 
with Import Trade Sectors, but Challenges Remain in Verifying Security Practices. GAO–08–240. 
Washington, D.C.: April 25, 2008. 

Supply Chain Security: Examinations of High-Risk Cargo at Foreign Seaports Have Increased, 
but  Improved  Data  Collection  and  Performance  Measures  Are  Needed.  GAO–08–187.  Wash-
ington, D.C.: January 25, 2008. 

Maritime Security: The SAFE Port Act: Status and Implementation One Year Later. GAO–08– 

126T. Washington, D.C.: October 30, 2007. 

Maritime  Security:  One  Year  Later:  A  Progress  Report  on  the  SAFE  Port  Act.  GAO–08–171T. 

Washington, D.C.: October 16, 2007. 

86T. Washington, D.C.: October 4, 2007. 

Maritime Security: The SAFE Port Act and Efforts to Secure Our Nation’s Seaports. GAO–08– 

Combating Nuclear Smuggling: Additional Actions Needed to Ensure Adequate Testing of Next 
Generation  Radiation  Detection  Equipment.  GAO–07–1247T.  Washington,  D.C.:  September  18, 
2007. 

Maritime  Security:  Observations  on  Selected  Aspects  of  the  SAFE  Port  Act.  GAO–07–754T. 

Washington, D.C.: April 26, 2007. 

Customs  Revenue:  Customs  and  Border  Protection  Needs  to  Improve  Workforce  Planning  and 

Accountability. GAO–07–529. Washington, D.C.: April 12, 2007. 

Cargo Container Inspections: Preliminary Observations on the Status of Efforts to Improve the 

Automated Targeting System. GAO–06–591T. Washington, D.C.: March 30, 2006. 

Combating Nuclear Smuggling: Efforts to Deploy Radiation Detection Equipment in the United 

States and in Other Countries. GAO–05–840T. Washington, D.C.: June 21, 2005. 

Homeland  Security:  Key  Cargo  Security  Programs  Can  Be  Improved.  GAO–05–466T.  Wash-

ington, D.C.: May 26, 2005. 

Maritime  Security:  Enhancements  Made,  but  Implementation  and  Sustainability  Remain  Key 

Challenges. GAO–05–448T. Washington, D.C.: May 17, 2005. 

Container  Security:  A  Flexible  Staffing  Model  and  Minimum  Equipment  Requirements  Would 
Improve  Overseas  Targeting  and  Inspection  Efforts.  GAO–05–557.  Washington,  D.C.:  April  26, 
2005. 

Preventing  Nuclear  Smuggling:  DOE  Has  Made  Limited  Progress  in  Installing  Radiation  De-
tection Equipment at Highest Priority Foreign Seaports. GAO–05–375. Washington, D.C.: March 
31, 2005. 

Cargo Security: Partnership Program Grants Importers Reduced Scrutiny with Limited Assur-

ance of Improved Security. GAO–05–404. Washington, D.C.: March 11, 2005. 

26 The European Commission is the EU’s policy-making and executive engine. The commission 
is  composed  of  27  commissioners,  one  from  each  member  state.  Among  its  many  powers,  the 
commission  proposes  legislation  for  approval  by  the  EU  Council  and  European  Parliament  in 
matters relating to economic integration, ensures that EU laws are applied and upheld through-
out  the  EU,  implements  the  budget,  and  represents  the  European  community  in  international 
trade negotiations. 

27 The United States abstained from the vote. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

29 

Homeland Security: Process for Reporting Lessons Learned from Seaport Exercises Needs Fur-

ther Attention. GAO–05–170. Washington, D.C.: January 14, 2005. 

Port Security: Better Planning Needed to Develop and Operate Maritime Worker Identification 

Card Program. GAO–05–106. Washington, D.C.: December 10, 2004. 

Maritime  Security:  Substantial  Work  Remains  to  Translate  New  Planning  Requirements  into 

Effective Port Security. GAO–04–838. Washington, D.C.: June 30, 2004. 

Homeland Security: Summary of Challenges Faced in Targeting Oceangoing Cargo Containers 

for Inspection. GAO–04–557T. Washington, D.C.: March 31, 2004. 

Container  Security:  Expansion  of  Key  Customs  Programs  Will  Require  Greater  Attention  to 

Critical Success Factors. GAO–03–770. Washington, D.C.: July 25, 2003. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
I  would  like  a  definition,  Mr.  Caldwell.  How  would  you  describe 

a layered approach to things? Is it basically modular? 

Mr.  CALDWELL.  Well,  the  layered  approach  is  several  different 
programs  trying  to  get  at  different  parts  of  vectors  that  terrorists 
may  use  to  get  a  weapon  of  mass  destruction  or  other  kind  of  con-
traband into this country. Part of that layer is Megaports that the 
Department  of  Energy  operates  to  look  for  containers  that  would 
contain  radioactive  WMD.  CBP’s  layers  include,  first,  advance  in-
formation to try to get information which could reveal potential—— 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  But  tell  me,  does  that  not  really  describe 
the  whole  picture?  I  think  when  we  modify  the  design  of  the  pro-
gram with a layered approach—I do not think that is any different 
than  the  approach  to  get  to  the  end  of  the  game,  regardless  of 
route.  I  mean,  you  have  to  do  these  things.  What  concerns  me  is 
that  layered  comes  in  there  as  an  opportunity,  Mr.  Ahern,  for  the 
inability  to  meet  a  target  that  we  have  for  the  100  percent  scan-
ning.  So  we  use  different  words  to  describe  it.  ‘‘Layered’’  is  one  of 
them. 

And I talked to several of the staff as well. 
I  mean,  to  me  it  is  which  of  the  routes  is  most  important.  Well, 
you have to consider that totally when you are looking for the secu-
rity that we would like to see. 

Mr.  Ahern,  the  Congress  last  year  passed  a  law  requiring  all 
shipping containers coming into our ports to be scanned for nuclear 
weapons  and  radiation  before  they  reach  our  shores.  Now,  accord-
ing  to  the  testimony  this  morning,  the  July  2012  deadline  will  not 
be met. What will you say is a reasonable expectation now to have 
a 100 percent scanning system in place for all maritime cargo com-
ing into the United States? 

Mr. AHERN. Well, as stated, the 2012 deadline that was actually 
expressed in the 9/11 Act had six caveats where there could be ex-
tensions if certain conditions were not met. Those are very specific 
in  the  law:  making  sure  there  was  sufficient  equipment  available 
for  purchase  and  installation;  sufficient  low  false  alarm  rates;  the 
capability  to  physically  deploy  the  logistical  challenges,  some  of 
which I described in some minimal detail, which is much more de-
scribed  in  the  report,  some  of  the  physical  lay-down  challenges  we 
have  seen  in  two  very  small  ports  that  we  have  tested  it  in;  the 
integration with the existing systems. I mean, Mr. Huizenga spoke 
about  the  fact  that  integrating  the  systems.  Yes,  there  is  a  com-
plementary  package  of  technology  that  is  out  there,  but  one  of  the 
other conditions is about the software anomaly recognition system. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes.  Listen,  we  have  got  lots  of  brilliant 
people  who  are  helping  to  devise  the  program  into  place.  Why  are 
all of these things anomalous? To me it seems that is part of what 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

30 

you  do  in  order  to  make  an  estimate.  Otherwise,  it  is  kind  of  hip 
shooting and picking out a date. From day one almost, it says that 
we are never going to meet this date. 

Mr. AHERN. Let me try to simplify it as best I can. The anomaly 
recognition, to be able to look at each one of the X-rays that comes 
through  the  gates  for  the  containers—if  we  were  to  apply  that 
against  a  universal  11.5  million  containers,  continuing  to  grow 
each  year  by  10  to  12  percent,  it  is  not  a  matter  of  just  running 
the  containers  through  the  X-ray  systems.  At  this  point  in  time, 
someone—that means a human, a trained officer, we believe a Gov-
ernment officer—needs to be able to go ahead and look and review 
those images. That takes—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. You mean that was not thought of? 
Mr.  AHERN.  No.  That  has  absolutely  been  thought  of.  We  have 

made this very clear for a number of years—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  So  why  do  we  not  get  past  the  problems 
that exist and answer the question, well, why in the planning were 
these  things  not  reviewed?  Why  were  these  situations  not  ex-
pected? If it was a NASA flight, it would be terrible if the planning 
had been this far off the mark. 

Mr. AHERN. Well, very respectfully, sir, there is conflicting direc-
tion  from  the  Congress.  The  SAFE  Port  Act  actually  was  going  to 
give us the opportunity to go ahead and provide the opportunity to 
study  through  piloting  three  locations,  which  we  are  underway,  in 
the  process  of  doing,  which  is  the  report  that  was  just  submitted 
late. 

The 9/11 Act that came along later then just trumped that legis-
lation  and  basically  called  for  100  percent  scanning  of  all  con-
tainers coming into the United States. So there was not the oppor-
tunity to continue to work through the pilot in an appropriate fash-
ion to discover all the concerns that are out there with the develop-
ment and maturity of technology, the integrating of the images, the 
software  anomaly  recognition  capabilities,  the  challenges  to  sov-
ereignty  that  we  have  out  there  as  well,  and  also  deal  with  some 
of the diplomatic challenges. 

One  of  the  things  I  would  like  to  present  to  you—and  I  would 
really offer it into the record for your consideration for the full com-
mittee  here—is  that  we  have  had  27  countries  that  have  written 
to us and expressed their concerns. We have had nine international 
trade associations and two international associations. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

31 

LIST OF COUNTRIES AND TRADE ORGANIZATIONS EXPRESSING CONCERNS 

ON 100 PERCENT SCANNING 

Provided by U.S. Customs and Border Protection 

Countries: 
Australia 
Belgium 
Bulgaria 
Cameroon 
Canada 
China 
Finland 
Germany 
Honduras 
Hong Kong 
Indonesia 
Italy 
Japan 
Latvia 
Mauritania 
Netherlands 
New Zealand 
Oman 
Philippines 
Poland 
Port-au-Prince 
Singapore 
South Korea 
Taiwan 
Thailand 
Ukraine 
United Kingdom 
International Organizations: 
European Union 
World Customs Organization 
Industry Organizations: 
American Association of Exporters and Importers 
Business Alliance for Customs Modernization 
Joint Industry Group 
National Industrial Transportation League 
National Customs Brokers & Forwarders Association of America 
Retail Industry Leaders Association 
U.S. Chamber of Commerce 
WCO Private Sector Consultative Group 
World Shipping Council 

There was also a study that was just recently released this week 
that I would also provide for the record* to make sure that has an 
opportunity  to  be  reviewed  as  well  talking  about  the  economic  im-
pact  that  this  would  have  to  the  global  supply  chain  as  well.  I 
think  these  are  important  things  that  we  would  have  had  the  op-
portunity  to  continue  to  learn  had  we  followed  the  track  of  the 
SAFE Port Act. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  There  were  opportunities  for  testimony  to 
be given, and I listened with respect. But I will tell you that if this 
was a brain operation and the doctor said, well, I did not know that 
I had to have a particular type of tool, I did not know that we used 
a particular type of anesthesia, fundamental to planning. 

* This  study,  Global  Logistic  Chain  Security—Economic  Impacts  of  the  U.S.  100%  Container 

Scanner Law is maintained in Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

32 

I had the opportunity run a pretty big corporation before I came 
here,  and  we  made  mistakes.  But  what  happened  is  we  learned 
that  you  cannot  enter  these  things,  offer  a  deadline  based  on  the 
conditions you are describing now. It is absolutely impossible. 

When will we have 100 percent scanning? 
Mr. AHERN. Well, I would submit to you that is not a wise invest-
ment  for  the  taxpayers’  dollars.  I  do  not  believe  100  percent  scan-
ning  would  equal  100  percent  security.  I  think  when  you  actually 
take a look at the risk to the global supply chain, the risk for secu-
rity  concerns  is  relatively  low  based  on  intelligence  assessments. 
Given the fact that 90 percent of the global economy moves through 
the maritime environment, the consequences are high. But I would 
submit  that  we  have  very  productive  layered  defenses  in  place 
through  the  advance  information  that  we  are  doing  a  better  job 
of—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  OK.  We  are  looking  here  at  a  com-
mitment  that  was  made,  a  very  important  commitment.  We  knew 
that  we  had  to  do  studies  along  the  way.  We  knew  we  had  to  do 
tests along the way. It has been 7 years since 9/11. The 9/11 Com-
mission  found  that  the  greatest  failure  in  their  review  was  one  of 
imagination. 

And  when  I  hear  your  response  to  picking  a  date  that  has  some 
degree  of  reliability  without  a  broad  explanation  of  why  it  cannot 
be done—can you offer a date with any sense of satisfaction it will 
be met? 

Mr.  AHERN.  Not  with  the  current  technology,  not  with  the  eco-

nomics involved with this, not with the fact that—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  OK.  What  you  are  saying  realistically  is 
that  they  are  going  to  continue  to  have  to  take  these  risks.  There 
is no other way to assure ourselves that these materials are not in-
cluded  in  a  container.  So  you  are  telling  the  world  here  that  we 
cannot do that. This country is not capable of it. 

Mr. AHERN. What I am suggesting is that the layered defense ap-
proach, beginning with advance information, running it through an 
automated  targeting  system,  interfacing  with  intelligence,  having 
the  ability  to  have  our  Customs-Trade  Partnership  Against  Ter-
rorism  be  able  to  do  supply  chain  verification  at  the  point  of  stuff-
ing, having over 200 officers identified and assigned at the top loca-
tions, 58 locations—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  hear  you,  Mr.  Ahern.  And  I  thank  you. 
I think what you are doing is presenting questions now that should 
have been in the origination of a date and a program. 

Mr.  AHERN.  Well,  very  respectfully,  I  would  ask  that  the  record 
be  reviewed  since  the  beginning  of  this  process.  We  have  talked 
about some of the challenges with 100 percent scanning before the 
law was passed last year. 

We  thought  the  SAFE  Port  Act  was  a  very  thoughtful  approach 
and a way to go forward with dealing in a pilot location so that we 
could learn all the different challenges that are out there. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. When does it get done? 
I  am  going  to  go  on  to  Mr.  Caldwell.  Four  of  the  world’s  largest 
marine  terminal  operators  have  indicated  on  their  own  that  they 
are  going  to  begin  to  scan  all  cargo  through  their  facilities.  They 
are waiting for the administration to set performance standards for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

33 

the  scanning  equipment  as  Congress  required  in  the  2006  SAFE 
Port Act. When will these technology performance standards be put 
in place? 

Mr.  CALDWELL.  Sir,  I  do  not  know  when  those  standards  will  be 
in place. It is very important to have those standards, and it is im-
portant  that  they  be  developed  through  a  standard-setting  organi-
zation  such  as  ISO.  Once  you  actually  have  those  standards, 
whether  it  is  for  NII  equipment  or  RPM  equipment,  only  then  can 
you really independently assess and compare equipment. Then you 
can compare equipment in another port versus our port? Then you 
can  determine  if  its  capability  is  less  than  ours,  or  if  it  meets  a 
minimum standard? 

I  am  not  sure  how  the  Government  or  CBP  gets  that  process 
started within ISO. There is an ISO standard which some port ter-
minal  operators  have  used  to  certify  the  general  security  manage-
ment in their ports. But there still is not a standard for the actual 
equipment performance. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  So  with  these  terminal  operators  on  their 
own—what  is  their  target?  Does  each  one  make  the  assessment 
that  they  are  going  to  meet  the  qualities  we  want  in  our  protec-
tion? Or do we keep on waiting for a performance standard that is 
universal that everyone has to meet? 

Mr.  CALDWELL.  I  think  these  are  competitive  decisions  by  these 
terminal  operators.  Maybe  they  see  the  writing  on  the  wall.  They 
are  pushing  toward  100  percent  scanning,  which  clearly  is  in  U.S. 
law  at  this  point,  and  it  would  certainly  give  them  a  competitive 
edge  if  they  are  able  to  set  up  such  a  system.  I  do  not  think  any 
of these terminal operators are claiming they can do this for trans-
shipped items. 

Obviously, this equipment is out there. It is being used—advanc-
ing the state-of-the-art and hopefully increasing those performance 
capabilities. 

But  again,  I  do  not  know  if  there  is  an  active  process  at  ISO  to 

actually set such performance standards. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Huizenga,  do  you  want  to  make  a 

comment? 

to address your concern. 

Mr. HUIZENGA. Yes. If you do not mind, Mr. Chairman, I will try 

We have been working pretty closely with the industry represent-
atives  for  some  time  now.  Although  we  could  formalize  this—and 
I  think  it  is  useful  and  we  are  in  the  process  of  doing  so,  industry 
representatives are familiar with—the targets that we are trying to 
hit.  The  information  is  out  there  and  we  will  work  with  Mr. 
Ahern’s people and the DNDO people at the Department of Home-
land Security to formalize this process. 

But  the  more  important  point  is  that  the  technology  actually 
does not exist, despite our best efforts right now. If you want to try 
to  capture  an  X-ray  image  or  a  radiation  scan  for  a  transshipped 
container that comes into Singapore and gets off one ship, gets put 
on the dock for a very short period of time and then put on another 
one,  there  is  no  space  in  the  terminal  to  put  the  equipment.  So  if 
you  had  to  take  that  container  and  drive  it  off  the  port  and  back 
through  the  entry  and  exit  gate,  where  it  is  easy  to  capture  the 
containers,  it  would  completely  disrupt  the  operations  of  the  port. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

34 

Despite our best efforts, there are some things that cannot be done 
and keep the port operating. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  But  even  if  the  manifest  or  bill  of  lading 
would  have  been  established  for  each  container  and  some  certifi-
cation that this container is filled with safe cargo, now if the trans-
fer is made without breaking the seal—and I am not intimately fa-
miliar with this—does that not take care of it? 

Mr. HUIZENGA. It is a simple logistics issue really. The container 
comes  into  the  port  and  gets  taken  off  the  ship  and  put  down  on 
the  dock,  and  then  put  on  another  ship,  and  it  really  does  not  go 
through  a  convenient  choke  point  where  it  can  be  driven  through 
a  scanning  device.  Now,  we  are  looking  for  ways  to  overcome  this, 
but right now we do not have a technology that can solve the prob-
lem. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  But  it  would  have  been  driven  through  a 
device,  to  use  your  expression,  before  it  left  the  port  of  embar-
kation. 

Mr.  HUIZENGA.  It  was  through  a  feeder  port,  perhaps.  But  that 
port might not necessarily have been shipping anything directly to 
the  United  States.  It  just  adds  another  layer  of  complexity  to  the 
number of ports you need to try to work at. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Ahern,  any  idea  what  the  cost  might 
be  to  the  country  to  install  the  necessary  equipment  to  be  able  to 
allow  our  Government  to  receive  the  scanning  data  we  need  for 
shipments from overseas? 

Mr.  AHERN.  If  we  were  to  look  at  it  globally  for  100  percent  ap-
plication, we have over 700 ports around the world that ship to the 
United  States.  Obviously,  those  are  pretty  large  and  go  down  to 
very, very small feeder ports. We have not actually done a footprint 
of each one of those 700 ports for the number of terminals and the 
number  of  gates  that  would  actually  be  in  each  one  of  these  envi-
ronments. But a rough order of magnitude, we are looking at about 
$8 million per lane. A place like Hong Kong, just one terminal has 
10 lanes. 

That  does  also  not  address  the  issue  that  Mr.  Huizenga  spoke 
about which is transshipment cargo that does not come through the 
gates. Those are basically on-dock transfers when you have a vessel 
that  comes  alongside  and  takes  some  containers  off  to  then  put  on 
another vessel destined to the United States. There is that compli-
cating factor as well. 

Certainly for this initial pilot, the cost of DOE and Customs and 
Border  Protection  was  about  $30  million  each,  for  a  total  of  $60 
million  just  to  run  the  pilots  in  these  three  very  small  locations. 
That  was  a  combination  of  DOE’s  resources  and  capabilities  for 
some  of  the  hardware,  the  radiation  portal  monitors,  ours  for  the 
X-ray,  and  in  one  case,  Honduras  actually  capitalized  the  invest-
ment  for  the  X-ray  system.  So  it  is  a  very  expensive  proposition. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Without  being  too  specific,  are  the  ports 
that  send  material  to  our  country  rated  on  some  kind  of  a  risk 
basis?  Do  we  believe  that  there  are  ports  that  are  far  riskier  than 
others for whatever the reason? 

Mr. AHERN. Yes, we do, and there are a couple of additional fac-
tors.  Certainly  the  Coast  Guard  through  their  HSBIS  reviews  do 
ratings.  Certainly  there  is  intelligence  community  assessments  as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

35 

well,  and  also  we  have  our  own  track  record  now  of  a  number  of 
years  of  collecting  information  and  doing  risk  assessment  on  indi-
vidual shipments coming from a location where our automated tar-
geting system has rated them above the threshold that requires an 
examination.  We  have  that  data  as  well.  That  goes  into  the  com-
pilation  of  how  we  would  begin  to  look  at  a  more  risk-based  ap-
proach for particular trade lanes. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  recognize  the  work  that  you  and  your 
CBP  staff  have  done  to  set  up  the  scanning  pilot  program,  and 
there  will  be  some  valuable  lessons,  as  you  indicated,  learned  for 
going forward. 

Industry  representatives  have  tried  to  claim  that  some  security 
measures  like  mandatory  container  scanning  are  bad  for  business 
because  they  will  slow  commerce.  But  I  understand  that  in  some 
ports, including Southampton which you mentioned, after scanning 
operations  were  in  place,  the  port  actually  moved  more  containers 
overall. Can you elaborate on that? 

Mr.  AHERN.  Could  you  repeat  that  last  line  again?  I  am  sorry. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes.  That  the  port  actually  moved  more 
containers  overall  out  of  Southampton,  for  instance.  Can  you  tell 
us whether or not the concerns of the industry are valid, that they 
will  slow  commerce  to  a  halt?  I  think  our  experience  in  South-
ampton  said  that  they  see  things  moving  more  containers  as  a  re-
sult of their inspection. 

Mr. AHERN. I would need to look precisely at the numbers or the 
analysis  that  led  to  that  conclusion.  But  I  would  submit  that  with 
a place like Southampton—it is a very small universe of containers 
coming  to  the  United  States.  It  is  an  intermittent  flow  at  best.  I 
was  just  there  about  6  weeks  ago  to  look  at  it  again,  and  it  is  an 
8-acre footprint, which goes to one of the issues. We don’t have the 
environment  in  most  of  these  ports  to  be  able  to  put  the  lay-down 
of technology so that it could stop at intermittent locations, usually 
three,  to  be  able  to  be  scanned  by  the  X-ray,  the  radiation  portal 
monitor,  the  optical  character  recognition,  and  then  for  the  officer 
in the alarm station to be able to do the review. 

There  has  been  some  resulting  benefit—and  this  is  what  I 
touched on briefly in my oral statement—that if we can reduce that 
risk overseas, that certainly is one of the exams we do not need to 
do  upon  arrival  in  the  United  States  if  there  is  an  alarm  that  oc-
curs.  We  then  have  the  ability  through  the  information  we  have 
collected  to  transmit  that  whole  electronic  file  with  the  radiation 
spectra,  the  X-ray  image,  as  well  as  the  automated  targeting  sys-
tems in one electronic file to our domestic location, Newark, for ex-
ample,  to  be  able  to  say  we  did  have  an  alarm.  We  did  resolve  it 
before it came. That is a very, very small manageable universe. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Right. 
Mr.  AHERN.  That  is  one  of  the  challenges  to  try  to  put  the—— 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Did  that  slow  the  pace?  The  work  done 

there—does that slow the pace of movement? 

Mr.  AHERN.  I  would  submit  there  was  no  pace  to  disrupt  in  a 
place  like  Southampton.  It  was  such  a  small,  intermittent  type 
traffic that shows up at the gate. It is such a small universe. 

In  a  place  like  Hong  Kong,  for  example,  1.2  million  containers 
roughly  a  year  to  the  United  States.  Through  each  one  of  those 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

36 

gates, you are running 300 containers an hour through those gates. 
To  be  able  to  review  the  image,  to  be  able  to  read  the  spectra,  to 
be able to go ahead and do any resolution would add exponentially 
to  the  traffic  and  throughput  through  those  gates.  That  is  where 
we see the problems. It is not so much—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  So  300  containers  an  hour  move  through 

there. 

Mr. AHERN. In a place like Hong Kong, that is where—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes, but electronic readings, however they 
get  them,  for  each  container—inspection  is  done  electronically, 
technologically. Right? 

Mr.  AHERN.  In  Southampton,  yes.  And  in  Hong  Kong,  just  one 
lane  of  one  terminal.  And  the  normal  throughput  through  all  the 
lanes is about 300 per hour. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Oh, all the lanes. OK, I am sorry. 
Mr.  AHERN.  Per  lane  over  all  of  the  lanes.  So  it  would  be  300 

times the 10 per hour coming through those facilities. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. OK. 
Mr.  AHERN.  But  what  the  problem  is—and  we  saw  this  even 
when we went back to the Hong Kong demonstration project called 
ISIS about 3 or 4 years ago, when there were claims and represen-
tation that it was providing 100 percent scanning, I also had an op-
portunity to see that personally as well. They were scanning. They 
were  just  running  containers  through  X-ray  and  radiation  portal 
monitors with no regard for the quality of the image or any resolu-
tion  of  the  image  that  was  occurring  through  this  demonstration 
project through industry. 

Each one of these technological systems has to be manned at this 
point in time for somebody to look for the anomaly. Otherwise, the 
complementary package of an X-ray with a radiation spectra to see 
if there is any shielding of a harmful isotope is going to be negated. 
So  it  has  to  have  the  human  intervention,  a  trained  officer  to  look 
at the image to see if there is an anomaly that could be there hid-
ing an isotope of concern. 

Right now what does not exist—and this is one of the challenges 
we  see  very  significantly  that  is  in  the  report—is  an  anomaly  rec-
ognition  software  so  you  do  not  have  to  spend  3  to  5  minutes  per 
image to see if there are anomalies that are out there. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  It  sounds  fairly  basic  in  terms  of—if  it 
needs  human  intervention,  obviously  it  is  going  to  be  different.  I 
am assuming that some kind of an alarm system that picks out the 
particular thing that has got to be called attention to would be op-
erated also through the system that does the analysis. 

Mr. AHERN. There is a system for an alarm if an isotope is identi-
fied.  Those  alarms  are  actually  identified  through  the  radiation 
spectra  capabilities.  What  is  not  existent  is  the  complementary 
package  for  the  nonintrusive  inspection  capability,  the  large-scale 
X-ray. There is no alarm capability there that identifies that there 
is an anomaly in this particular box without getting into too much 
detail. That is what is going to be a critical piece to make this inte-
gration  of  these  technological  packages  a  success,  that  each  one 
have  a  software  capability  to  be  able  to  alarm  someone,  whether 
it be our presence overseas, which we would advocate—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

37 

Senator LAUTENBERG. That being the case, do the concerns of in-
dustry  register  a  problem  that  is  real,  that  it  would  bring  a  halt 
to commerce? 

Mr.  AHERN.  In  my  estimation  and  in  my  experience  and  my  ob-
servation  of  the  three  pilot  locations  and  also  looking  at  Hong 
Kong, if we were to apply this in a universe of 100 percent environ-
ment  and  each  one  of  the  alarms  needed  to  be  resolved  and  each 
one  of  the  X-rays  needed  to  be  determined  by  a  trained  officer,  it 
would bring commerce to a halt. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Well, Mr. Huizenga? 
Mr.  HUIZENGA.  And  I  just  want  to  add,  if  I  could,  one  clarifica-
tion. In Southampton, I think it is fair to say, that the gate traffic, 
the  containers  coming  into  and  exiting  the  terminal—it  really  did 
not impact the operation. 

But the transshipped containers in Southampton were really not 
inspected according to the requirements of the SFI. It was not pos-
sible  in  the  end.  We  ended  up  having  to  do  some  workarounds.  So 
it is another example of, although the gate traffic is pretty easy to 
get, the transshipped containers were still difficult to—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes.  Well,  but  I  am  not  sure  about  the 
message  we  are  sending  out  of  here.  We  obviously  need  the  com-
merce. We need the activity of shipped materials. Enormous traffic. 
Is  it  suggested  that  we  cannot  be  as  safe  as  we  should  be  and 

still have the movement of material? 

Mr. AHERN. Mr. Chairman, I would submit a few factors for con-

sideration. 

First,  the  security  systems—the  layers  we  have  in  place  post- 
9/11—have  actually  been  very  effective  and  they  continue  to  im-
prove.  We  thank  GAO  for  their  continued  reviews.  Each  time  they 
come,  we  find  additional  enhancements.  For  our  24-hour  rule, 
where  we  get  advance  information,  we  have  a  final  rulemaking 
about  to  come  out  that  will  get  additional  information  in  advance 
of  shipments  so  that  we  can  run  that  through  our  targeting  sys-
tems to identify shipments of concern. 

I  think  it  is  also  important,  as  we  look  at  our  partnership  with 
industry,  the  security  protocols  they  have  put  in  place,  beginning 
at  the  onset  of  the  supply  chain,  at  the  point  of  stuffing  which  is 
the  greatest  opportunity  for  the  introduction  of  a  significant  piece 
of  material  that  could  be  of  concern  or  a  weapon  or  other  contra-
band of concern—that is continuing to get better. 

I  think  it  is  also  important  to  realize  that  when  we  began  this, 
we  did  have  any  radiation  portal  monitors  here  in  the  United 
States.  We  had  one  that  was  being  demonstrated  over  4  years  ago 
in  Detroit.  We  now  have  98  percent.  98  percent  of  the  container 
traffic  coming  to  the  United  States,  before  it  goes  into  the  com-
merce  of  the  United  States,  actually  goes  through  radiation  portal 
monitors  before  it  departs  the  terminals  at  the  ports  within  the 
United States. That is a significant accomplishment. 

As  we  continue  to  go  ahead  and  balance  the  security  responsi-
bility,  we  also  need  to  balance  it  against  the  risk.  The  continual 
threat  assessments  show  that  the  risk  in  the  maritime  environ-
ment  is  relatively  low.  Certainly  the  consequence  is  high.  And  I 
would  submit  with  the  risk  reduction  strategy  we  have  in  place,  I 
believe it matches what the risk would be. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

38 

Now  you  weigh  that  against  the  consequence,  the  economic  con-
sequence,  of  the  layering  of  100  percent  scanning  globally,  I  think 
that is a huge consideration, and we need to make sure, as we are 
putting  security  protocols  in  place,  that  we  are  not  going  to  give 
the  terrorist  organizations  an  opportunity  to  claim  victory  because 
we  responded  in  such  a  way  that  is  going  to  drive  up  costs  so  sig-
nificantly. 

And finally, I think we need to be mindful of the fact of the con-
sequences  that  really  are  out  there  looming  large.  I  again  ask  this 
committee  to  take  a  look  at  the  report  released  by  the  World  Cus-
toms Organization and look at the submissions by the trade indus-
tries,  the  international  organizations,  and  our  international  part-
ners.  They  are  calling  for  reciprocity.  So  your  port  in  New  Jersey, 
sir, would be one that they would say if you want us to do 100 per-
cent  scanning  destined  to  your  country,  we  want  the  same  recip-
rocal requirement from you. You talk about logistics and movement 
to the trade community here in the United States that exports, the 
impact  that  will  have  on  the  trucking  industry,  the  rail  industry, 
the  maritime  industry,  the  footprint  to  be  required  here  in  the 
United  States.  It  is  a  huge  issue  that  has  not  even  been  studied 
from  an  economic  standpoint  as  we  look  at  100  percent  scanning 
overseas. Our foreign partners are saying we are just as concerned 
with things coming from the United States. And that really should 
be considered as well, sir. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  but  there  were  things  said  a  few 
years ago about our ability to get the 100 percent scanning, imply-
ing  there  that  that  would  be  100  percent  safe,  100  percent  secure. 
Now,  when  you  talk  about  the  money  being  spent,  look  at  what 
we spend on baggage screening for airplanes. There is an entire in-
dustry  now  that  is  related  to  having  to  provide  that  kind  of  secu-
rity and safety. 

But as I hear you now, Mr. Ahern, I am concerned that the mes-
sage  is,  well,  we  cannot  do  it.  If  that  is  the  case,  then  I  am  going 
to ask for a comprehensive report from your Department that tells 
us  what  can—I  want  the  public  to  hear  from  the  people  who  have 
the  authority,  have  the  responsibility,  have  the  resources  to  do  it 
to tell us exactly what the score is here. 

I want to just ask a question here. I understand that CBP is re-
ceiving  container  scans  now  but  that  an  individual  person  has  to 
look  at  each  one  of  them  to  see  if  they  present  a  security  risk,  the 
thing  we  have  just  been  talking  about.  So  what  does  the  Depart-
ment  do  now  to  develop  the  technology  for,  as  I  suggested  earlier, 
automatic detection? Can that be achieved? 

Mr.  AHERN.  Right  now  that  has  been  a  real  technological  chal-
lenge for industry, and we certainly have been—the medical indus-
try  has  been  challenged  by  this  issue  for  a  number  of  years  before 
we  had  this  issue  emerge  as  a  homeland  security  problem.  We  do 
not have the solution to that within Homeland Security. We really 
challenge industry to come up with that software anomaly recogni-
tion  package.  That  is  going  to  be  the  key  to  make  this  go  forward. 
I  also  would  submit,  back  to  your  previous  question  of  mixed 
messaging, I hope that is certainly not the case. But just to clarify 
again  here,  I  believe,  to  make  sure  the  country  realizes,  the  secu-
rity  measures  that  are  in  place  I  believe  provides  a  layer  of  secu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

39 

rity  that  is  appropriate  and  continue  to  enhance  each  one  of  the 
layers. 

And  as  we  look  forward,  I  would  believe  that  we  need  to  take  a 
look—to  continue  the  risk  layers  in  appropriate  ways  in  a  place 
like  we  currently  have  in  Pakistan  where  we  have  a  protocol  in 
place  where  we  actually  screen  100  percent  of  containers  coming 
out of just one of the ports in a place like Qasim, Pakistan. We cer-
tainly think it would make sense to take a look at another location 
right there out of the same country, a place like Karachi. We need 
to  make  sure  that  we  start  to  have  a  thoughtful  approach  to  100 
percent  scanning  where  it  makes  sense  in  high-risk  trade  lanes  so 
that  we  can  actually  provide  an  additional  layer,  where  we  do  not 
think the current five layers of risk reduction are sufficient. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes.  Well,  it  raises  a  question  that  is  not 

going to be resolved this day in this hearing. 

Are  we  saying  that  there  is  a  limit  to  the  amount  of  protection 
that  the  public  can  be  afforded?  And  I  am  not  talking  about  af-
forded in price. I am talking about afforded in functioning. We have 
so much of our resources now helping us to defend against terrorist 
attack,  against  malicious  targeting  with  very  high-powered  weap-
ons.  Do  you  want  to  comment?  Do  you  want  to  give  us  an  index 
of how safe we can be? 

Mr. AHERN. I will give several points for consideration. 
First  off,  no  one  should  be  misled  to  believe  that  100  percent 
scanning with the current technology that is out there or anything 
we  see  on  the  horizon  is  going  to  provide  100  percent  security.  No 
one should be misled by that point. 

The other thing is certainly we need to realize there is risk that 
needs  to  be  assumed  in  every  environment.  The  maritime  environ-
ment  is  not  excluded  or  separate  alone.  I  mean,  certainly  it  is  a 
global impact economically, but certainly even with the layers, even 
with  100  percent  scanning  thrown  on  top,  you  still  will  not  reduce 
the risk 100 percent. That has to be an assumption going forward. 
My biggest concern, with 32 years of experience, is we are focus-
ing  in  the  maritime  environment  to  the  exclusion  of  other  areas  of 
higher concern to this country and continue to invest time, efforts, 
and  resources  in  the  maritime  environment  where  have  other  con-
cerns  that  we  need  to  have  the  funding,  the  resources,  and  our 
technological attention directed toward. I will be meeting with you 
this afternoon, sir, to talk about rail security. That is another envi-
ronment  we  have  other  concerns  about.  So  we  need  to  take  a  look 
at  the  borders  and  border  security  in  its  totality,  not  just  continue 
to  focus  on  one  particular  aspect  of  homeland  security  in  one  par-
ticular vector. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Do  you  want  to  add  something,  Mr. 

Mr.  CALDWELL.  Yes,  Senator  Lautenberg.  In  my  portfolio,  I  do 
have  other  areas  of  maritime  security  beyond  the  CBP  programs, 
to  include  Coast  Guard  programs.  Based  on  this  other  work,  I 
share  some  of  Mr.  Ahern’s  concerns.  I  would  not  want  to  see  100 
percent  scanning  become  the  ‘‘Masinot  Line’’  of  maritime  security. 
You  are  putting  all  your  resources  in  a  certain  type  of  attack  in  a 
certain  vector.  Those  resources  could  also  be  used  to  protect  mari-
time  areas  that  are  relatively  unprotected  now,  such  as  bulk  car-

Caldwell? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

40 

gos, small vessels, or attacks in the maritime environment by other 
means. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. I remind you, before we close this hearing, 
that  we  spend  over  a  quarter  of  a  trillion  dollars,  close  to  a  half, 
on  a  war  that  is  supposed  to  protect  us  against  terrorism.  That  is 
what  we  say.  Now,  if  we  were  to  place  the  same  emphasis  finan-
cially on protecting us from an invasion through the shipping struc-
ture,  might  we  solve  the  problem?  Mr.  Ahern,  you  mentioned 
money several times. And I agree. We have got to put it where our 
interests  lie.  But  I  do  not  see  it  happening  right  now,  but  I  do  see 
us  spending  the  money  in  Iraq  and  Afghanistan  and  other  places 
around  the  world.  But  we  have  not  had  the  kind  of  loss  that  we 
had on our own shores at 9/11, the number of people that lost their 
lives in my neighborhood, if you will. 

So  there  is  something  here  that  I  think  would  be  of  significant 
public  interest,  and  that  is,  we  are  saying—or  the  Administration 
is  saying—you  are  representing  their  view  and  their  determina-
tion—that  we  cannot  expect  the  kind  of  result  that  we  were  led  to 
believe  we  would  get.  That  was  the  assumption.  The  100  percent 
inspection  was  thought  to  be,  if  not  100  percent  safety,  that  we 
were very close to that kind of a protection wall. 

So whatever you have got to develop for us, Mr. Ahern, I ask you 
to  do  so  and  be  blunt  so  that  the  public  understands  what  is  hap-
pening now in this Administration and in our world. 
Thank you. This Committee hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:06 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF AMERICAN ASSOCIATION OF EXPORTERS AND IMPORTERS 
Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  Members  of  the  Sub-

committee, 

The  American  Association  of  Exporters  and  Importers  (AAEI)  appreciates  the  op-
portunity  to  offer  its  comments  on  U.S.  Customs  and  Border  Protection’s  (CBP)  Se-
cure Freight Initiative (SFI) and its other supply chain security efforts. 

AAEI  has  been  a  national  voice  for  the  international  trade  community  in  the 
United  States  since  1921.  Our  unique  role  in  representing  the  trade  community 
comes from our broad base of members, including manufacturers, importers, export-
ers,  wholesalers,  retailers  and  service  providers,  including  brokers,  freight  for-
warders,  trade  advisors,  insurers,  security  providers,  transportation  interests  and 
ports.  Many  of  these  enterprises  are  small  businesses  seeking  to  export  to  foreign 
markets. 

AAEI  is  truly  a  member  driven  organization.  In  AAEI’s  committees,  conferences 
and  working  groups,  the  professionals  who  make  up  our  membership  spend  hours 
sharing  their  trade  facilitation,  supply  chain  security  and  other  international  trade 
experiences  with  other  professionals  and  learning  from  the  experiences  of  others. 
Through those activities, our members are able to coalesce around those experiences 
into an in-depth analysis of important international trade policy issues and provide 
that insight to policymakers in Washington and throughout the world. 

AAEI is deeply interested and vested in the subject of this hearing. We have mul-
tiple  concerns  regarding  the  effectiveness,  efficiency,  significant  costs,  practicality, 
and  real  world  benefits  of  SFI  initiatives  and  other  government  mandated  efforts 
such as 100 percent scanning. We hope that the practical experience of our members 
in compliance, trade facilitation and security will be of assistance. 

While  AAEI  remains  very  concerned  about  the  implementation  of  100  percent 
scanning  on  a  global  basis,1 we  believe  the  prototype  testing  undertaken  in  imple-
menting SFI to be a correct approach to the development and implementation of im-
portant  supply  chain  security  programs.  The  development  and  implementation  of 
such  important  and  complex  programs  requires  comprehensive  testing  to,  ensure 
that  the  programs  will  effectively  and  efficiently  provide  the  enhanced  operation 
that we all desire and recognize, as intrinsic to achieving immediate and long term 
economic  and  homeland  security  benefits.  Implementing  100  percent  scanning  or 
any other universal data submission project without such a prototype may unneces-
sarily  result  in  gridlock  at  the  ports,  the  submission  of  overwhelming  volumes  of 
data  and  the  expenditure  of  enormous  public  and  private  resources  reengineering 
solutions to problems that could have been, and frankly must be, avoided. As export/ 
import  enterprises,  it  has  been  our  experience  that  testing  proposed  security  pro-
grams  using  real  world  systems  and  processes  is  not  only  necessary  for  successful 
implementation  but  critical  to  the  determination  of  what,  if  any,  increased  security 
can be obtained. 

In  our  comments  on  CBP’s  January  2,  2008,  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking,  we 
urged  CBP  to  fulfill  its  obligation  under  the  SAFE  Port  Act  to  test  the  ‘‘feasibility’’ 
of  its  proposal  by  undertaking  just  such  a  prototype  before  implementing  the  10+2 
advanced data requirements. Unfortunately, CBP has steadfastly refused to conduct 
a full pilot of its 10+2 proposal, instead running a very limited prototype. 

AAEI  believes  that  a  pragmatic  ‘‘holistic’’  approach  to  trade  security  is  para-
mount.  This  committee’s  grasp  of  commercial  and  technological  realities  is  of  great 
value in understanding and dealing with multiple independently created public and 
private  sector  initiatives  each  intended  to  address  vital  homeland  security  related 
issues.  Your  jurisdiction  both  requires  and  enables  exploration  at  the  increasingly 
difficult intersection of compliance, facilitation, safety, and security. 

1 Among  our  concerns  are  that  each  and  every  one  of  the  statutory  performance  and  imple-

mentation criteria are met. See 9/11 Commission Act Section 1701(b)(4). 

(41) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

42 

As  the  Committee  knows,  there  are  numerous  trade  security  efforts  that  directly 
impact vital U.S. supply chains. These programs include supply chain partnerships, 
data collection, advanced data methods, related security program elements and 100 
percent scanning, among many others. The depth and extent of these programs can 
be  seen  in  AAEI’s  now  familiar  American  Trader’s  Guide  to  Post  9/11  and 
Homeland  Security  Programs.  (A  copy  is  attached.)  Also  available  at  http:// 
www.aaei.org/aaei/files/ccLibraryFiles/Filename/000000003019/TSP%20FINAL% 
20%2801-16-08%29.pdf. 

Initially  released  in  the  Fall  of  2007,  and  recently  updated  to  include  the  ‘‘10+2’’ 
information,  the  Guide  is  the  product  of  extensive  discussions  and  review  with  pol-
icymakers,  industry  observers  and  trade  professionals.  The  Guide  provides  trade 
professionals with one piece of paper showing the vast number of the trade security 
programs  that  companies  have  to  deal  with.  You  will  notice  that  the  single  sheet 
of  paper  is  not  a  standard  size  sheet.  In  order  to  make  the  list  of  trade  security 
programs fit on a single sheet of paper, we had to use a larger size. In fact, we had 
to go to two pages! 

The  Guide  provokes  one  of  the  fundamental  security  questions  of  the  Post-9/11 

age: How many layers of security are enough for risk management to work? 

AAEI  supports  the  risk  management  concept  of  ‘‘defense  in  depth.’’  We  believe 
that the best security is derived from an approach in which well integrated security 
programs  are  layered  together  to  create  a  web  of  defense  against  terrorism.  To  be 
well  integrated,  the  layers  of  such  a  defense  must  not  unnecessarily  overlap,  or 
leave  gaps.  Layers  should  not  be  added  if  they  provide  no  demonstrable  security 
gains.  In  fact,  such  layers  are  likely  to  undermine  security  as  they  take  scarce  re-
sources of time and money from the layers that do provide security gains. 

While each program listed in the Guide may have provided valuable security ini-
tiatives  when  they  were  implemented  or  even  when  viewed  in  isolation,  the  Guide 
makes clear that, these programs have, with the best of intentions, been introduced 
without  being  integrated  into  existing  regulatory  legislative  or  private  sector  de-
signed  structures.  In  fact,  they  have  emerged  from  multiple  Congressional  commit-
tees,  Government  Agencies  and  private  sector  initiatives  with  limited  policy  con-
sultation amongst these diverse ‘‘entities’’. Thus, both DHS/CBP and the trade com-
munity face an expanding trade security environment of unnecessarily burdensome, 
complex  and  often  overlapping  programs.  With  the  complexity  and  overlapping  na-
ture  of  the  current  security  environment,  programs  that,  on  their  face,  may  appear 
to increase security may actually provide no measurable security gains. 

This point can be best illustrated by examining the security environment of a sin-

gle supply chain. 

Let’s look at security layers that are applied by U.S. CBP to a container exported 
from  Pakistan’s  Port  Qasim  to  a  validated  C–TPAT  participant  in  the  U.S.  today. 
Layer 1: As a validated C–TPAT participant, information about the participants 
in the supply chain and their security practices have been provided to, and vali-
dated by, U.S. CBP. CBP has validated that the C–TPAT participant is utilizing 
the  supply  chain  security  ‘‘best  practices’’  that  have  been  identified  by  CBP. 
CBP’s  validation  of  this  information  is  done  prior  to  the  container’s  arrival  at 
the port of export. 
Layer  2:  Once  a  specific  shipment  has  been  initiated,  the  container  is  prepared 
and  sent  to  Port  Qasim.  According  to  CBP’s  Secure  Freight  Fact  Sheet,  when 
the  container  arrives  in  the  port,  officials  of  the  Pakistan  government  subject 
it  to  passive  radiation  detection  equipment  and  non-intrusive  inspection  (NII) 
equipment. The NII uses ‘‘x-rays or gamma rays to penetrate the container and 
produce an image of the contents.’’ The output of these scans is integrated with 
other data available to the terminal operator, the Pakistani government (includ-
ing  export  declaration  data  which  is  also  sent  to  CBP),  and  in  other  govern-
mental systems. The image of the content and the other integrated data is elec-
tronically  provided  to  CBP’s  targeting  system  in  real  time.  CBP  personnel  are 
able to examine that information to determine whether the contents of the con-
tainer present any threat. 
Layer  3:  Twenty  4  hours  prior  to  the  loading  of  the  vessel,  the  vessel  carrier 
must  provide  CBP  with  manifest  information  through  CBP’s  Automated  Mani-
fest  System.  That  manifest  information  includes  the  names  of  the  parties  in-
volved  in  the  transaction,  a  description  of  the  goods  and  other  shipment  and 
transportation data. 
Layer 4: Within 24 hours of arrival at the U.S. port, the validated C–TPAT im-
porter  will  pre-file  its  entry  summary  in  order  to  get  the  benefit  of  CTPAT’s 
lower  targeting  scores.  Again,  the  entry  summary  contains  much  of  the  same 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

43 

basic information that has been provided in the three previous layers described 
above (e.g., names of the parties, description of the goods etc.) 

Yes,  there  are  data  differences  between  the  various  layers,  but  the  vast  majority 
of the information is the same. Moreover, for repetitive shipments of the same com-
modity between the same parties, the redundant data will be provided over and over 
again.  This  is  in  direct  contradiction  to  one  of  the  principle  goals  of  ATDI—an  ac-
count  based  approach  to  homeland  security,  which  would  greatly  reduce  the  need 
for redundant data to be submitted to the government over and over again. 

On  January  2,  2008,  CBP  proposed  a  5th  data  layer—the  ‘‘Importer  Security  Fil-
ing  and  Additional  Carrier  Requirements’’  proposal  (also  known  as  the  10+2  pro-
posal).  This  layer  would  require  the  U.S.  importer  (regardless  of  CTPAT  status)  to 
file  a  Security  Filing  (SF)  to  CBP  24  hours  prior  to  the  loading  of  the  container  on 
the  vessel.  The  filing  of  the  SF  is  required  without  any  consideration  being  given 
to  whether:  (1)  the  importer  is  validated  C–TPAT  member;  (2)  that  much  of  the 
same  basic  information  from  the  same  sources  has  already  been  provided  by  or  on 
behalf  of  the  importer;  or  (3)  whether  the  shipment  is  being  exported  from  a  SFI 
port  that  provides  CBP  with  a  real  time  image  of  the  contents  of  the  container  be-
fore it is loaded on the vessel. 

As  just  one  example,  AAEI  believes  it  is  unnecessarily  duplicative  to  require  the 
submission of the ‘‘10+2’’ line by line targeting data 24 hours prior to vessel loading 
from low risk importers on shipments that have already been subject to: (1) C–TPAT 
validation;  (2)  radiological  scanning;  (3)  content  image  scanning;  and  (4)  the  filing 
of manifest data. Thus, for C–TPAT shipments from SFI ports, no 10+2 submission 
should be required. 

AAEI  urges  the  members  of  this  subcommittee  and  other  Members  of  Congress 
to  require  CBP  to  take  a  holistic  approach  to  supply  chain  security  and  integrate 
the plethora of security programs into a cohesive program that provides quantifiable 
risk reduction in light of the true risks posed by terrorists. 

We  thank  you  again  for  allowing  us  to  submit  these  comments.  We  look  forward 
to providing you with further information at your request, and stand ready to assist 
in any way possible. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

THE AMERICAN TRADER'S GUIDE TO POST 9/11  AND HOMELAND SECURITY PROGRAMS 

5,.",,2010 ' '''''<1 

. ,  

I  I  II  II  I if 

-t 

" , .   I 

I 

••  , 

I 
I  ~i  j.! i ~ II ! !~  f Ii i  ~  II h !! :I H H f I fIll 

Ii  U !h~ 11  in! .1  l  i  '- ,~,  .~ I i 
1 

Jl  i t ! .  t  t  t 

~  ~  " q I i I - -
' j  j 
! 
I 
I  . f 
j 
j 

J uf nf II 
~ L 
!  J  _I ' ' 
!  ~  , 

i" f  Ii  I  I  ~ 
- H 

~  j 

I  IS] 

~ 
~ 
1 

I  I 
i.! 

t 

'! 

j 

;  I '  

• 

I 

I' 

.... 
: -+ ' 

I 
+ 

IlU'OfIIrrDllIQIM) 
I "  I 

I 

4
4

 

--

--

--

F 

_  1"'-

j 

! 
I 
J 
-
-~,-
-- ~-
-~ ----" 
-~ -
--
-= 

. 
-.. 

MoaI'  1"= 

I' 1 -.,  1' .... 1' 1  1 ' 

u--L 

·:. AAEI 

UNITED  STAm 

SECURITYPRDGRAMS 

(PDST9111 ) 

1·-

I MO'4 ........ -...NIOI 

t-_~ __ _ 
~-----

----~pq 

t

V
e
r
D
a
e
N
o
v
 

 

2
4

 

2
0
0
8

 

0
6
:
1
9
 
A
p
r
 
2
6
,
 
2
0
1
3

J
k
t
 
0
7
5
6
7
9

P
O
 
0
0
0
0
0

F
r
m
 
0
0
0
4
8

F
m

t
 
6
6
0
1

f

S
m

t
 
6
6
2
1

S

:
\

\

G
P
O
D
O
C
S
8
0
4
9
3
T
X
T

\

.

J
A
C
K
E

I

612AAEI1.eps

45 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RENEE STEIN, CHAIR, AND RICHARD M. BELANGER, 

COUNSEL; BUSINESS ALLIANCE FOR CUSTOMS MODERNIZATION* 

The Business Alliance for Customs Modernization (BACM) submits this statement 
to  the  Senate  Commerce  Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Merchant 
Marine  Infrastructure,  Safety  and  Security  regarding  its  hearing  June  12,  ‘‘Supply 
Chain  Security:  Secure  Freight  Initiative  and  the  Implementation  of  100  Percent 
Scanning.’’ 

BACM  is  a  coalition  of  U.S.  companies  that  import  and  export  extensively,  filing 
over  two  million  entries  valued  at  more  than  $130  billion  per  year.  It  is  dedicated 
to  modernization  of  U.S.  customs  laws,  regulations  and  policies  and  committed  to 
the facilitation of trade to the greatest extent possible consistent with customs com-
pliance and trade security. 

BACM members strongly support U.S. Government efforts to make the global sup-
ply  chain  more  secure  in  the  post-9/11  environment.  We  have  eagerly  participated 
in forums like the TSN and COAC and have participated in the development of pro-
grams  such  as  C–TPAT  and  the  24-hour  rule.  What  makes  these  programs  so  suc-
cessful  is  that  they  were  developed  cooperatively  with  the  trade  to  target  security 
risks  without  creating  unnecessary  burdens  for  businesses.  While  BACM  members 
have  faced  increased  costs  as  part  of  these  efforts,  we  support  these  programs  be-
cause  they  achieve  the  critical  balance  between  our  national  security  and  economic 
interests. 

BACM members object, however, to additional security requirements for shipping 
when the security benefit is negligible and adds an unnecessary burden to industry. 
We are concerned that, in its desire to protect our borders, the U.S. is enacting layer 
upon  layer  of  security  programs  without  consideration  of  how  they  reconcile  with 
each other or whether they create burdensome redundancies. The 100 percent scan-
ning requirement raises this question. If CBP will be requiring the trade to perform 
extensive data reporting under the 10+2 initiative to identify high risk cargo for fur-
ther  scanning,  how  does  this  reconcile  with  the  100  percent  scanning  requirement 
once implemented? 

We  urge  the  Committee  to  give  serious  consideration  to  these  issues  in  order  to 
avoid  putting  U.S.  companies  at  a  competitive  disadvantage  through  compliance 
costs that are economically and logistically burdensome and yield no appreciable ad-
ditional security benefit. 

The  Security  and  Accountability  For  Every  (SAFE)  Port  Act  of  2006  (P.L.  109– 
347) created the Secure Freight Initiative, a pilot program for 100-percent screening 
of  inbound  containers  at  three  overseas  ports.  The  program  combines  non-intrusive 
inspection imaging with radiation portal monitors to identify any anomalies in ship-
ments  destined  to  the  United  States  and  to  target  those  containers  for  further  in-
spection.  The  program  has  now  been  tested  for  a  limited  time  in  smaller  ports  in 
Honduras,  Pakistan  and  the  United  Kingdom  and  has  been  found  by  CBP  to  have 
significant  technical,  operational,  resource-related  shortcomings.  Of  high  concern  is 
the  fact  that  the  computer  technology  and  capacity  does  not  exist  for  quickly  and 
accurately  identifying  anomalies  in  shipments,  particularly  for  transshipped  cargo. 
The  Implementing  Recommendations  of  the  9/11  Commission  Act  of  2007  (P.L. 
11053),  requires  100  percent  screening  of  all  imported  containers  by  non-intrusive 
imaging  equipment  and  radiation  detection  equipment  by  July  1,  2012.  With  this 
hearing, Congress is looking at how to reconcile the SFI pilot results with the man-
dates under the 9/11 Commission Act. We hope that the Congress will delay imple-
mentation of the 100 percent scanning requirement until the technology is available 
to  ensure  quick  and  efficient  scanning  that  does  not  cause  burdensome  congestion 
in port operations overseas. 

The  SAFE  Port  Act  of  2006  also  instructed  CBP  to  evaluate  whether  additional 
cargo information would be needed to better evaluate shipment risk. In response to 
this  mandate,  CBP  has  recently  proposed  its  so-called  ‘‘10+2’’  data  elements  pro-
posal, which would impose extensive new data reporting requirements on shipments 
to the U.S. 24 hours before lading at foreign ports. The purpose of 10+2 is to prevent 
smuggling  of  weapons  of  mass  destruction  into  the  U.S.  and  enhance  cargo  safety 
before goods are loaded onto U.S. bound boats. If CBP identifies an anomaly in the 
data reported, the cargo is then subject to scanning to better identify whether there 
is a threat to U.S. commerce. 

* American  Honda  Motor,  Archer  Daniels  Midland,  BP  America,  Caterpillar,  Chrysler,  Ford 
Motor,  General  Electric,  General  Mills,  General  Motors,  Hanesbrands,  Hewlett  Packard,  Home 
Depot, IBM, J.C. Penney, Limited Brands, Lowe’s, Mattel, Microsoft, Nike, Nissan North Amer-
ica, Sears, Shell, Sony Electronics, Target Corporation, Toyota, Wal-Mart 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

46 

The  mandate  for  the  10+2  proposal  was  enacted  before  Congress  passed  the  100 
percent  scanning  requirement.  It  is  now  clear,  however,  that  the  two  programs  to-
gether  overreach.  The  10+2  was  meant  to  help  CBP  target  suspect  cargo  for  scan-
ning. The 100 percent scanning requirement would render the 10+2 additional data 
elements redundant or useless. 

BACM has submitted public comment on CBP’s 10+2 program, expressing signifi-
cant concerns that the program would impose commercial costs and delays, putting 
U.S.  companies  at  a  competitive  disadvantage  in  the  global  economy.  Our  concerns 
are many but can be summarized as follows: 

1. there has been no demonstration to the trade community as to how this pro-
posal would measurably improve supply chain security; 
2.  the  proposal  moves  away  from  risk  management  principles  as  the  necessary 
solution  to  burgeoning  trade  flows,  legitimate  regulatory  needs  and  limited  or 
static resources; 
3. the proposal treats all shipments for all sources as the same, without regard 
to  trusted  partner  or  authorized  economic  operator  programs  such  as  Customs- 
Trade Partnership Against Terrorism (C–TPAT) and more secure trade; 
4.  for  many  shipments  10+2  requires  reporting  combinations  of  the  same  data 
attributes  over  and  over  again,  resulting  in  redundancies  and  the  overload  of 
repetitive data; 
5.  in  many  cases,  the  newly  required  data  elements  are  not  known  or  readily 
available as early in the supply chain as the proposal assumes; 
6.  10+2  reporting  requirements  would  ignore  account-based  processing  that  is 
the basis for the Automated Customs Environment; 
7.  the  proposal  seriously  underestimates  the  costs  that  would  be  imposed  on 
business; and 
8.  it  would  not  address  a  number  of  logistical  and  processing  issues  that  need 
clarification before moving forward 
9.  a  true-to-life  prototype  should  be  conducted  using  representative  importers 
of different sizes and from different industries in order to learn more about how 
the  proposal  will  work  when  CBP  collects  the  data  according  to  proposed  rules 
and conducts actual targeting. 

We  believe  that  these  concerns  should  be  addressed  before  the  Administration 
moves  ahead  with  the  10+2  initiative.  More  broadly,  it  is  critical  that  coherence  be 
brought to the entire spectrum of supply chain security programs. 

We  agree  that  it  is  imperative  that  the  U.S.  Government  work  to  eliminate  con-
tainer vulnerabilities, but it must not be done by piling on layer after layer of initia-
tives  with  little  added  security  benefit.  Congress  must  work  to  reconcile  all  of  the 
security initiatives currently in place to ensure a more fluid and complementary sys-
tem that is not overly burdensome to the trade. Serious consideration must be given 
to the cost and benefits of each new security system before the Congress and Admin-
istration impose additional burdens on the industry. Such concepts as reporting ex-
emptions for low-risk shipment and account-based filing for repetitive shipments are 
examples  of  provisions  that  might  better  reconcile  the  overlapping  security  man-
dates. 

We appreciate the opportunity to submit this statement. Thank you for your con-

sideration of our views. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CATHERINE ROBINSON,  ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR,  HIGH 
TECHNOLOGY TRADE POLICY ON BEHALF OF THE NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF 
MANUFACTURERS (NAM) 
The National Association of Manufacturers (NAM) is providing the following writ-
ten statement for the record of the Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transpor-
tation;  Subcommittee  on  Surface  Transportation  and  Merchant  Marine  Infrastruc-
ture, Safety, and Security Hearing ‘‘Supply Chain Security: Secure Freight Initiative 
and the Implementation of 100 Percent Scanning’’ held on June 12, 2008. The NAM 
represents  a  broad  spectrum  of  U.S.  manufacturers,  with  members  in  every  indus-
trial  sector  and  every  state.  Its  membership  includes  both  large  multinational  cor-
porations  with  operations  in  many  foreign  countries  and  small  and  medium  manu-
facturers that are engaged in international trade on a more limited scale. Our mem-
bers  depend  heavily  on  imported  parts,  components  and  finished  products  to  com-
pete not only in the U.S. marketplace but in foreign markets as well. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

47 

NAM  members  recognize  the  important  role  Customs  and  Border  Protection 
(CBP)  plays  not  only  in  protecting  the  United  States  but  also  in  facilitating  legiti-
mate  trade.  Our  members  are  committed  to  working  with  CBP  and  other  U.S.  law 
enforcement  agencies  to  keep  America  secure  and  safe  from  terrorist  threats  and 
other  security  challenges.  Many  NAM  members  gladly  participate  in  the  numerous 
CBP initiatives that make the United States more secure. 

This  hearing  is  timely  as  CBP  is  currently  working  on  a  number  of  new  initia-
tives. While the NAM supports the efforts of CBP, we want to ensure that new cus-
toms  requirements  achieve  the  dual  CBP  goals  to  ‘‘enhance  national  security  while 
protecting the economic vitality of the United States.’’ The NAM recognizes the dif-
ficulty of striking the right balance between the two. We believe, however, that pro-
tecting  national  security  and  facilitating  international  trade  need  not  be  mutually 
exclusive. 

Striking  the  right  balance  between  enhancing  national  security  and  facilitating 
trade is critical. Manufactured goods accounted for 76 percent of all imports into the 
United  States  in  2007,  or  $1.9  trillion.  U.S.  manufacturers  have  global  supply 
chains,  source  inputs  from  around  the  world,  and  import  parts  and  components  on 
a daily basis. Many have developed ‘‘just-in-time’’ supply chains to stay competitive 
in today’s global economy. Therefore, any new programs developed by CBP must be 
mindful of the way U.S. manufacturers operate their supply chains and their impor-
tant  role  in  the  U.S.  economy.  New  programs  should  be  real  world  tested  to  guar-
antee that they are both fully effective from a security perspective and do not place 
U.S. manufacturers at a competitive disadvantage vis-a`-vis their competitors around 
the globe. 

In  order  to  strike  the  right  balance,  CBP  must  implement  new  programs  based 
on  sound  risk  management  principals.  Low-risk  cargo  from  trusted,  fully-vetted 
shippers  should  be  treated  differently  than  high  risk  cargo.  CBP  should  not  imple-
ment  programs  that  treat  the  two  identically.  Doing  so  wastes  limited  resources  on 
containers and companies that have been validated by CBP, and leaves insufficient 
resources to focus on the higher risk shipments. 

The  NAM  welcomes  this  Committee’s  and  others’  interest  on  customs  programs. 
There  are  a  myriad  of  customs  issues  that  merit  attention  including  resources  for 
CBP, technical issues such as duty drawback, interagency cooperation, international 
recognition,  intellectual  property  rights  and  supply  chain  management  programs 
such as C–TPAT. While those issues are deserving of increased attention, the NAM 
would  like  to  focus  our  statement  on  the  issue  at  hand—100  percent  scanning  and 
how  it  relates  to  current  CBP  initiatives  such  as  the  so-called  Customs  10+2  pro-
posed rule. 

While  100  percent  scanning  remains  a  controversial  and  problematic  issue,  the 
NAM  believes  in  the  Congress’  approach  to  testing  100  percent  scanning  through 
a  serious  pilot  program  around  the  world  before  requiring  U.S.  manufacturers  to 
change  business  models  globally.  Real-world  testing  is  critical  for  new  programs  of 
this  magnitude.  The  100  percent  scanning  pilot  program  has  already  proven  useful 
as it has shown the government where the problems lie, what needs to be improved 
or  changed,  and,  most  importantly,  that  the  government  lacks  the  capacity  to  proc-
ess  the  breath  of  information  provided  by  100  percent  scanning.  Specifically,  CBP 
stated in May 2008 that the 100 percent scanning pilot program has already shown 
that the initiative is cost prohibitive for three reasons: (1) the cost of the necessary 
technology  is  extreme;  (2)  the  bandwidth  requirements  for  the  scanned  images  are 
too  great;  and  (3)  the  cost  of  the  personnel  to  review  the  images  and  run  the  pro-
gram is exorbitant. 

We  believe  the  100  percent  scanning  pilot  program  provides  an  excellent  prece-
dent for current CBP initiatives and strongly believe a real pilot program is needed 
for the proposed 10+2 rule. The proposed 10+2 rule will also drastically change the 
way U.S. manufacturers operate, even more so than the 100 percent scanning man-
date—entire  supply  chains  and  just-in-time  delivery  systems  will  be  undone  by  the 
proposed  rule.  Yet,  CBP  has  indicated  it  will  not  conduct  a  pilot  program  before  a 
final  rule  is  implemented.  We  are  aware  of  no  test,  including  the  Advance  Trade 
Data  Initiative  (ATDI),  that  is  being  run  that  tests  from  end  to  end  the  many  re-
quirements of the proposed rule. Failure to conduct a pilot program will have severe 
negative consequences to the U.S. economy and our national security. 

The NAM is not opposed to the intent of the proposed 10+2 rule. However, as cur-
rently  drafted  the  rule  not  only  fails  to  enhance  national  security,  it  also  fails  to 
facilitate  trade  by  greatly  increasing  the  cost  of  doing  business  for  U.S.  manufac-
tures—achieving  neither  of  CBP’s  dual  goals.  The  NAM  has  offered  to  CBP  several 
specific  ideas  to  improve  the  rule  including  testing  it  through  a  pilot  program  and 
providing  benefits  to  C–TPAT  members.  Our  recommendations  have  thus  far  not 
been heeded. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

48 

As  this  hearing  has  shown,  pilot  programs  are  critically  important.  NAM  mem-
bers  stand  ready  to  comply  with  10+2  and  to  invest  hundreds  of  billions  of  dollars 
to  change  their  operations.  However,  before  NAM  members  invest  the  money,  they 
would like to know that the program will not be changed 6 months after implemen-
tation to correct some of the deficiencies in the program. A pilot program would pre-
vent  manufacturers  and  the  government  from  having  to  make  multiple  changes  to 
their operations. Additionally, it would allow the government to address the security 
risks  that  will  arise  from  implementation  of  the  proposed  rule  (i.e.,  containers  sit-
ting in foreign ports for several days waiting to be loaded on vessels). 

In the Safe Port Act of 2006, Congress instructed CBP to develop a way to collect 
more  data  in  advance  of  lading  for  which  CBP  proposed  the  10+2  rule.  Then  in 
2007,  Congress  mandated  that  every  container  coming  into  the  U.S.  should  be 
scanned  to  provide  CBP  advanced  data  before  lading  by  2012.  Implementing  both 
programs  is  not  only  unnecessary  but  also  an  inefficient  use  of  limited  government 
resources. The NAM believes now is the time to evaluate rigorously all customs pro-
grams  and  to  take  a  holistic  approach  to  national  security.  Redundant  programs 
should not be implemented. 

The  NAM  supports  the  100  percent  scanning  pilot  program  and  believes  it  sets 
the  correct  precedent  for  real-world  testing  on  other  major  CBP  initiatives.  The 
NAM asks that the proposed 10+2 rule also be real-world tested before final imple-
mentation. Phased-in enforcement is no substitute for a pilot program. 

NAM members are committed to working with CBP to keep America secure from 
terrorist  threats.  However,  new  programs  and  initiatives  must  be  based  on  risk 
management  principles  in  order  to  enhance  national  security  and  facilitate  trade. 
National  security  and  economic  vitality  are  not  mutually  exclusive  and  the  NAM 
firmly believes the right balance can be struck to achieve the dual goals. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK. R. LAUTENBERG TO 

JAYSON AHERN 

Question 1. In your April report to the Appropriations Committee on the SFI pilot, 
you stated that over 13,000 data filed from the three operational ports had been suc-
cessfully  integrated,  transmitted  and  received.  This  is  no  small  feat  in  techno-
logically and you should be lauded for your progress in this area. What is that total 
number to date? 

Answer. Since October 2007, SFI has scanned 237,054 containers in Southampton, 

U.K., Port Qasim, Pakistan, and Porto Cortez, Honduras. 

The  scanned  images  and  associated  data  captured  by  SFI’s  integrated  scanning 
system at the foreign ports have been transmitted back to the National Data Center 
and  fused  with  trade  data  required  by  the  24  hour  rule  and  made  available  to  all 
Customs  and  Border  Protection  (CBP)  Officers  with  access  to  Automated  Targeting 
Systems ATS. CBP Officers stationed at SFI or CSI ports, the NTC-C, or at domes-
tic ports (ATU’s) are able to access the additional data when determining the poten-
tial risk of U.S. bound shipments from SFI locations. 

Question 2. In all of the pilot locations, you experienced significant concerns with 
labor  over  the  safety  of  scanning  equipment  and  concerns  about  potential  radiation 
exposure. While you mention the DHS has conducted extensive studies on the occu-
pational  safety  of  this  equipment,  is  your  research  and  findings  supported  by  the 
National Academy of Sciences or the National Institutes of Health? You mention in 
your  report  that  several  studies  have  been  conducted  on  this  issue,  can  you  please 
provide for the Committee what specific studies you are referring to? 

Answer. There have been several independent studies of health and safety issues 
related  to  the  SAIC  P–7500.  CBP  and  the  U.S.  Department  of  Defense  have  con-
cluded  that  the  drive-through  P–7500  does  not  pose  a  threat  of  radiation  exposure 
to  drivers,  operators  or  by-standers.  SAIC  has  also  conducted  tests  to  ensure  that 
its  equipment  is  within  the  radiation  dose  limits  set  by  the  International  Council 
of  Radiation  Protection.  Results  of  these  tests  have  been  published  and  presented 
to foreign governments. 

One of the hurdles in operating scanning equipment overseas has been the regula-
tions  pertaining  to  radiation  exposure  in  foreign  countries.  Upon  placing  imaging 
equipment in Southampton, U.K., CBP was informed that the P–7500 must comply 
with  the  United  Kingdom  Health  and  Safety  Ionizing  Radiation  Regulations  (IRR) 
of  1999.  To  comply  with  the  regulations,  a  Radiation  Protection  Advisor  was  con-
tracted  to  train  and  certify  four  CBP  officers  to  become  on-site  radiation  security 
officers.  Additionally,  an  independent  study  conducted  by  NUKEM  (the  designated 
U.K. radiation compliance company for Her Majesty’s Revenue and Customs and the 
Southampton  Container  Terminal),  evaluated  and  tested  the  P–7500.  Their  conclu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

49 

sions  mirrored  the  same  positive  conclusions  as  other  independent  studies  stated 
below. Her Majesty’s Revenue and Customs also posted a letter on a trade webpage 
describing the safety features of the P–7500, along with the radiation safety testing 
performed by NUKEM. This letter certified that the P–7500 does not pose any radi-
ation  hazard  to  truck  drivers,  operators,  or  bystanders  when  operated  and  main-
tained properly. 

Another  hurdle  in  using  scanning  equipment  overseas  has  been  the  safety  con-
cerns of the personnel operating the equipment. In Southampton, U.K., and Busan, 
Korea, truck drivers and their unions were concerned about possible exposure to ra-
diation  while  driving  through  the  non-intrusive  inspection  (NII)  equipment.  There-
fore, CBP published fact sheets describing the safe operation of the P–7500 and the 
numerous  tests  conducted  and  the  outcomes.  These  fact  sheets  were  distributed  to 
the  terminal  operators’  employees,  truck  drivers  and  their  unions.  To  further  prove 
that  there  is  no  radiation  risk  associated  with  the  P–7500,  CBP  health  physicists 
were commissioned to supply dosimeters to the CBP officers in Southampton. These 
dosimeters  are  rotated  through  Southampton  and  are  evaluated  in  Indianapolis  on 
a quarterly basis. 

To  date,  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  and  the  National  Institute  of  Health 

have not conducted any studies that would challenge the findings of our tests. 

Question  3.  In  your  testimony  you  stated  that  in  both  2005  and  in  2008  GAO  re-
ported  that  CBP’s  human  capital  plan  did  not  appropriately  determine  the  optimal 
number  of  CBP  officers  needed  at  each  CSI  seaport  to  effectively  carry  out  its  du-
ties.  Do  you  know  if  the  human  capital  plan  has  yet  been  modified  since  you  re-
leased your report on the CSI program in January? 

Answer.  CBP  completed  a  study  that  determined  the  optimum  number  of 
Targeters  for  each  CSI  port  based  on  the  volume  of  shipments  and  risk  consider-
ations.  The  total  number  of  CBP  personnel  who  can  be  stationed  at  the  overseas 
CSI locations is limited by a host of factors. i.e., the U.S. Department of State (DOS) 
determines  the  number  of  U.S.  personnel  that  can  be  stationed  abroad.  DOS  takes 
into  consideration  the  number  of  U.S.  personnel  that  are  already  stationed  abroad 
and  how  the  increase  in  the  numbers  would  benefit  the  U.S.  They  also  consider 
whether the host nation will request an equal number of their own government per-
sonnel  to  be  stationed  in  the  U.S.  receiving  the  same  Privileges  and  Immunities 
granted  to  U.S.  personnel.  The  staffing  allocation  model  has  been  adjusted  by  sta-
tioning  Targeters  at  the  National  Targeting  Center  to  support  CSI  operations  by 
pre-screening  and  targeting  shipments  that  cannot  be  handled  due  to  the  reduced 
number of Targeters actually stationed abroad. The Targeters at the NTC–C would 
be  screening  Bills  of  Lading  that  are  below  a  certain  threshold,  in  order  allow  the 
CSI  Targeters  to  concentrate  on  shipments  that  have  a  higher  score  on  the  ATS. 
This allows the CSI Targeter more time in developing additional information to sub-
stantiate or negate the risk of the targeted shipment. The GAO was presented with 
this Staffing Allocation Model on October 2007. This information is For Official Use 
Only (FOUO). 

Question  4.  What  is  the  national  policy  of  Canada  and  Mexico  with  respect  to 
scanning of inbound cargo containers? Does Canada and Mexico have a scanning re-
quirement to prevent weapons of mass destruction from entering their ports of entry 
in  cargo  containers?  If  either  nation  does  have  such  a  requirement,  is  it  stronger 
or  weaker  than  the  U.S.  requirements  for  the  scanning  of  inboard  container  cargo? 
Answer. Canada: Canada uses risk-management systems and processes to screen, 
scan  and  release  goods  rapidly  while  ensuring  safety  and  security.  Targeting  is  an 
approach  for  identifying  potentially  high-risk  goods  for  examination.  The  Canada 
Border Services Agency’s (CBSA) targeting activities are multi-faceted, multi-dimen-
sional  and  embedded  in  virtually  every  area  of  the  organization.  Goods  can  be  tar-
geted before they come to Canada, upon arrival, and in some cases, post-arrival. For 
example, under the Advanced Commercial Information (ACI) system, marine and air 
carriers  must  transmit  conveyance  and  cargo  reports  for  all  vessels  and  aircraft 
loaded  with  commercial  goods  destined  for  Canada.  Targeters  use  this  data  to 
search  for  health,  safety  and  security  threats  before  the  vessel  or  aircraft  arrive  in 
Canada.  Targeters  also  review  the  risk  scores  and  cross-reference  suspicious  cargo 
against a number of data bases to determine whether an examination should follow. 
If a container is selected for examination, Canada may elect to use a mobile Vehicle 
and  Cargo  Inspection  System  (VACIS)  to  detect  irregularities  in  the  shipment.  The 
mobile  VACIS  is  a  truck-mounted,  gamma-ray  scanning  system  that  captures  an 
image  of  a  marine  container,  rail  car  or  truck  contents.  Other  detection  equipment 
that  the  CBSA  employs  may  be  in  the  form  of  imaging  equipment,  explosive  detec-
tors and radiation detection technologies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

50 

Mexico: Through bi-national agreements allowing for the sharing of best practices 
with CBP, Mexico has developed a national policy very similar to that of the United 
States  in  that  it  utilizes  data  analyses  to  target  high  risk  shipments.  Under  this 
strategy,  Mexico  Customs  presently  runs  69  cargo  non-intrusive  inspection  (NII) 
equipment  sites  nationwide.  At  present  time,  100  percent  of  rail  shipments  and  90 
percent  of  all  empty  inbound  conveyances  are  scanned  at  Mexico’s  four  principal 
seaports.  The  ports  of  Veracruz  and  Altamira  are  located  along  the  Gulf  of  Mexico 
and Lazaro Cardenas and Manzanillo are located on the Pacific coast. Trade at the 
two  Pacific  coast  ports  is  growing  at  an  annual  rate  of  approximately  12  percent, 
partially  because  U.S.  west  coast  ports  are  at  capacity.  Altogether,  these  four  ports 
account for 92 percent of Mexican maritime trade. Mexico’s four major Seaports scan 
100 percent of all inbound shipments with VACIS imaging systems. Mexico has im-
plemented  a  24-Hour  Manifest  Rule  based  upon  the  U.S.  version.  The  Government 
of  Mexico  has  the  capacity  to  conduct  100  percent  imaging  on  inbound  shipments. 
Additionally,  at  the  port  of  Veracruz,  the  Mexican  government  installed  an  inte-
grated  scanning  lane  (a  VACIS  system  integrated  with  a  radiation  portal  monitor) 
to scan all exports. Under the Megaports Initiative, Mexico will cost-share with the 
Department  of  Energy  to  install  radiation  detection  equipment  to  scan  all  vehicle 
import  and  export  traffic  at  each  of  the  four  major  ports:  Veracruz,  Altamira, 
Manzanillo and Lazaro Cardenas. 

Canada:  Both  Canada  and  the  U.S.  have  signed  a  Mutual  Recognition  Arrange-
ment called the Customs-Trade Partnership Against Terrorism (C–TPAT) and Part-
ners in Protection (PIP) agreement, with the goal of securing the entry of goods into 
the  U.S.  and  Canada  by  preventing  terrorists  and  their  weapons  from  penetrating 
the global supply chain. 

In addition, the Canada Border Services Agency (CBSA) uses the latest technology 
to  help  prevent  contraband  and  dangerous  goods  from  entering  Canada  by  marine 
trade and other modes of transportation. Such technologies include radiation detec-
tion  equipment,  (VACIS),  and  Pallet  VACIS.  The  use  of  these  technologies  enables 
CBSA  officers  to  conduct  effective,  non-intrusive  inspections  and  allows  them  to 
focus on high-risk goods. 

Mexico:  Mexico  Customs  has  deployed  150  handheld?  radiation  detection  equip-
ment  systems  at  its  seaports  and  major  airports,  as  well  as  along  the  U.S.-Mexico 
border.  Mexico  Customs  presently  runs  69  cargo  non-intrusive  inspection  (NII) 
equipment sites nationwide scanning rail shipments, empty inbound seaport convey-
ances  and  inbound  seaport  shipments.  This  equipment  includes  operational  VACIS 
at the four major seaports. In 2007 the Mexico Ministry of Finance signed a memo-
randum of understanding (MOU) with the U.S. Department of Energy (DOE) for the 
implementation of the Megaports Initiative. When fully implemented, this initiative 
is intended to allow scanning by radiation detection equipment of 100 percent of the 
imports  and  exports  entering/exiting  the  port  by  truck  at  the  four  largest  Seaports 
(Veracruz, Manzanillo, Altamira, and Lazaro Cardenas). These four ports handle 92 
percent  of  all  seaport  cargo.  The  first  Mexican  Megaport—Veracruz—is  anticipated 
to be operational in February 2009. Under the MOU, Mexico will share information 
on detections or seizures of special nuclear and other radioactive materials made as 
a result of the equipment. 

Port 

Manzanillo 
Veracruz 
Lazaro Cardenas 
Altamira 

Totals 

Import 

Export 

Total 

494,620 
165,420 
80,654 
107,518 

425,302 
243,552 
81,314 
129,587 

919,922 
408,972 
161,968 
237,105 

848,212 

879,755 

1,727,967 

United  States:  U.S.  Customs  and  Border  Protection  (CBP)  has  developed  numer-
ous programs and systems to identify and select high-risk shipments as part of our 
multi-layered  enforcement  strategy.  While  CBP  cannot  physically  examine  all  con-
tainers, CBP does review virtually 100 percent of all shipments that arrive into the 
United States. This is accomplished by an electronic review of all shipments through 
the Automated Targeting System (ATS), which then sorts the shipments by level of 
risk. 

In  addition,  through  the  Container  Security  Initiative,  CBP  is  pushing  our  na-
tion’s  zone  of  security  beyond  our  physical  borders  by  working  with  nations  from 
around the world to target, screen, and inspect high-risk containers that are bound 
for the United States. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

51 

To further reduce the risk of weapons of mass destruction or illicit nuclear/radio-
logical  materials  that  could  be  smuggled  into  the  United  States,  CBP  launched  the 
Customs-Trade Partnership Against Terrorism (C–TPAT). As of September 17, 2008, 
approximately  8,596  certified  partners  have  joined  CBP  in  the  war  against  ter-
rorism. Under the C–TPAT initiative, CBP works with participating companies—i.e., 
carriers, importers, and other industry sectors—to substantially increase end-to-end 
supply chain security. 

At  our  land  borders,  CBP  currently  deploys  multiple  technologies  to  support  our 
multi-layered  inspection  process.  These  technologies  include  large-scale  non-intru-
sive inspection imaging systems, radiation portal monitors, radiation isotope identi-
fier devices and personal radiation detection devices. 

Risk assessment and targeting have played an important role in the U.S., Canada 
and  Mexico’s  commitment  to  safeguarding  North  America,  as  part  of  the  Security 
and  Prosperity  Partnership  (SPP).  At  the  SPP  Montebello  Summit  in  August  2007, 
the U.S., Canada and Mexico agreed to work together to establish risk-based screen-
ing  standards  for  goods  and  travelers  that  rely  on  technology,  information  sharing 
and  biometrics;  develop  and  implement  compatible  electronic  processes  for  supply 
chain security that use advance electronic cargo information to analyze risk and en-
sure quick and efficient processing at the border; develop standards and options for 
secure  documents  to  facilitate  cross-border  travel;  and  exchange  additional  law  en-
forcement liaison officers to assist in criminal and security investigations. 

Canada:  Canada’s  requirements  for  the  scanning  of  inbound  container  cargo  are 
similar  to  U.S.  requirements.  The  U.S.  works  closely  with  Canada  under  the  Con-
tainer  Security  Initiative  (CSI)  to  detect  and  deter  terrorist  use  of  maritime  con-
tainers  while  facilitating  the  movement  of  legitimate  trade.  CBP  officers  have  been 
assigned  to  three  major  ports  of  entry  in  Canada—Halifax,  Vancouver  and  Mon-
treal—to  screen  manifest  data  before  a  container  is  shipped  to  the  U.S.  by  cross- 
referencing  CBP  data  bases.  Canadian  host  government  officers  will  then  examine 
containers  which  pose  a  potential  risk  to  the  U.S.,  using  either  radiation  detectors 
or  large-scale  radiographic  imaging  machines  to  detect  potential  terrorist  weapons. 
Similarly,  Canadian  joint  task  officers  under  the  SPP  agreement  are  stationed  in 
Newark and Seattle to perform functions similar to those that CBP CSI officers per-
form  in  Canada,  in  an  effort  to  increase  security  for  containerized  cargo  destined 
to Canada. 

Mexico: Mexico has scanning requirements in place and strives to mirror those of 
the U.S., but has less experience in conducting risk assessment. Mexico Customs is 
in  the  process  of  establishing  its  own  National  Targeting  Center  (NTC)  similar  to 
the  one  CBP  currently  has.  CBP  will  play  a  key  role  in  assisting  Mexico  Customs 
to  stand  up  its  operations  and  then  to  develop  targeting  systems  modeled  after  the 
CBP systems. 

Question  5.  At  present,  do  cargo  containers  unloaded  off  ships  in  Canadian  and 
Mexican ports get transshipped by rail and truck to final destinations in the United 
States? 

Currently, what is the level of cooperation and coordination between U.S. and Ca-
nadian  authorities  and  U.S.  and  Mexican  authorities  to  ensure  that  these  trans-
shipped  U.S.-bound  cargo  containers  do  not  present  a  significant  risk  for  weapons 
of mass destruction? 

Does  Customs  and  Border  Protection  need  additional  authority  in  this  area,  for 

example with respect to international freight rail crossing at the U.S. border? 

Answer.  There  are  many  trade  lanes  available  which  an  importer  may  utilize 
while  importing  cargo  into  the  United  States.  Transshipping  cargo  by  rail/truck 
from  Mexico  or  Canada  is  a  viable  option  that  is  routinely  used.  Approximately  98 
percent  of  all  containers  entering  the  United  States  from  Mexico  or  Canada  are 
scanned by a RPM device upon entry regardless of their country of origin. 

Seaport  security  programs  in  place  in  Mexico  and  Canada  provide  an  additional 
layer  of  screening  and  scanning  of  transshipped  cargo.  As  was  discussed  above,  92 
percent  of  Mexican  maritime  trade  arrives  at  one  of  four  principal  ports.  The  Gov-
ernment of Mexico already has 100 percent imaging capacity for inbound shipments 
and, under the Megaports Initiative, is cost-sharing with the Department of Energy 
to install radiation detection equipment to scan all exports and imports arriving/de-
parting  by  truck  at  each  of  its  four  major  ports.  Under  a  pilot  program,  Mexico  in-
stalled  an  integrated  scanning  lane  (a  VACIS  co-located  with  a  radiation  portal 
monitor) at the Port of Veracruz to scan all exports. 

CBP has the authority to examine all cargo entering the United States, regardless 

of mode. 

Question  6.  As  you  know,  in  2012,  there  is  a  100  percent  scanning  requirement 
for  U.S.-board  cargo  containers.  Will  the  100  percent  scanning  requirement  apply 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

52 

to  cargo  containers  destined  for  Canada  and  Mexico  ports  which  are  subsequently 
transshipped by truck and rail to the United States? 

If  it  doesn’t  apply,  are  we  creating  a  loophole  that  could  potentially  be  exploited 
by  bad  actors?  If  it  does  apply,  would  the  scanning  have  to  be  performed  in  Cana-
dian and Mexican ports? 

Answer. Section 1701 of the 9/11 Act (H.R. 1, 110th Congress) amended the SAFE 
Port  Act  and  charges  DHS  with  achieving  full-scale  implementation  of  overseas 
scanning  by  July  1,  2012,  but  permits  extensions  by  certifying  to  Congress  that  at 
least  two  of  the  six  conditions  outlined  in  Section  1701(b)(4)  apply.  The  9/11  Act 
changed the dynamic of the ongoing pilot programs from exploring the feasibility of 
overseas scanning to developing real, practical solutions to meet the challenges that 
arise.  These  challenges  continue  to  be  significant.  The  extensions  permitted  under 
the  law  recognize  some  of  the  difficulties  that  may  occur  in  developing  an  overseas 
scanning  strategy,  including  the  impact  on  trade  capacity  and  the  flow  of  cargo, 
whether the systems can be integrated with existing systems, and the infrastructure 
restraints  of  foreign  ports.  We  continue  to  refine  and  develop  our  expansion  ap-
proach as we move toward the initial 2012 deadline. 

We  do  not  believe  any  loophole  exists  with  transshipped  containers  from  Mexico 
or  Canada.  Approximately  98  percent  of  all  containers  entering  the  United  States 
across  our  land  borders  are  currently  scanned  by  a  RPM  device  regardless  of  their 
original  country  of  origin.  We  continue  working  with  our  partners  in  Canada  and 
Mexico  to  provide  additional  layers  of  security  at  their  seaports  as  well  as  at  our 
land points of entry (POE). In fact, under the Megaports Initiative, DOE is working 
with  Mexico  to  equip  all  four  of  its  major  seaports  with  radiation  detection  equip-
ment  in  order  to  scan  all  import  and  export  traffic  arriving/departing  Mexico  by 
truck. 

Question  7.  There  has  been  considerable  concern  in  Congress  about  the  perform-
ance  capabilities  of  Advanced  Spectroscopic  Portal  Monitors  (ASP’s)  and  the  FY 
2007 DHS Appropriations Act required the Secretary of DHS to certify a significant 
increase  in  operational  effectiveness  prior  to  moving  forward  with  the  Administra-
tion’s proposal for full scale deployment. Has Secretary Chertoff concluded the addi-
tional testing of the ASP’s and provided his certification to Congress? Was the tech-
nology tested in the SFI pilot? If yes, what was the performance findings of the tech-
nology? 

Answer. The ASP is currently undergoing integration testing at Pacific Northwest 
National  Laboratories  (PNNL).  During  this  integration  period,  the  ASP  is  tested  in 
a mock CBP Port of Entry (POE) to ensure that the ASP can operate properly with 
all  of  CBPs  ancillary  systems  (i.e.,  traffic  control  mechanisms,  stop  lights,  gate 
arms, etc.). Upon successful completion of this testing, CBP will conduct a field vali-
dation of the ASP in four high volume POEs; Long Beach, CA, New York Container 
Terminal, Detroit, MI, and Laredo, TX. This validation test will be conducted in the 
stream of commerce at the Northern land border, Southern land border and seaport 
environments  to  ensure  the  ASP  is  robust  enough  to  operate  at  CBPs  POEs.  Upon 
successful completion of this test and validation, CBP, jointly with the Domestic Nu-
clear Detection Office (DNDO), will recommend certification by the Secretary of the 
Department of Homeland Security. 

The  ASP  is  currently  being  tested  in  the  SFI  port  of  Southampton,  U.K.  The  De-
partment of Energy (DOE) has purchased a limited number of ASP detection devices 
and deployed a unit at Southampton as part of an ongoing effort to gain both oper-
ational experience and insight into the viability of these units as radiation detection/ 
isotope  identification  devices  in  a  secondary  application.  The  ASP  is  undergoing  a 
DOE  field  test  and  is  not  used  for  official  adjudication  of  RPM  alarms.  If  a  U.S. 
bound container generates a radiation alarm at an RPM, it is subsequently scanned 
both  by  the  ASP  and  by  a  handheld  ORTEC  (a  radioisotope  identification  device). 
The DOE and DNDO are evaluating the robustness of the ASP, as well as the data 
transmitted to the United States. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK. R. LAUTENBERG TO 

DAVID HUIZENGA 

Question 1. In your testimony you state that NNSA has installed over 1,000 RPMs 
at  over  160  sites.  Are  you  procuring  and  installing  equipment  that  conforms  to  the 
technology performance standards that the United States has set for domestic scan-
ning equipment? 

Answer.  DOE  and  DHS  have  very  similar  performance  standards  for  radiation 
portal  monitors  (RPMs).  The  primary  difference  is  that  the  DOE  standards  are  de-
fined in terms of quantities of Special Nuclear Material (SNM) while DHS standards 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

53 

are  defined  in  terms  of  surrogate  materials.  The  advantage  of  defining  standards 
in  terms  of  surrogate  materials  is  that  these  materials  are  available  commercially 
and  RPM  vendors  can  evaluate  their  monitors  on  their  own.  The  disadvantage  of 
the surrogate materials is there are some slight differences in the radiation charac-
teristics compared to the SNM they represent. However, the differences between the 
standards have been thoroughly evaluated by DOE and DHS technical staff and are 
believed to be minor when evaluating monitor performance. 

Question  2.  In  your  testimony  you  state  that  the  goal  of  the  Megaports  Initiative 
is  to  equip  approximately  75  priority  ports  with  scanning  technology  by  2013,  at 
which  point  you  estimate  that  you  will  be  scanning  over  50  percent  of  global  ship-
ping traffic. Does this just cover the radiological detection equipments such as RPM 
or  would  this  also  include  the  non-intrusive  imaging  equipment  such  as  VACIS? 
What specific equipment are we talking about here? What do you estimate the cost 
to  be  to  the  U.S.  Government  to  achieve  this  goal?  What  do  you  estimate  the  cost 
to  be  to  our  trading  partners?  How  many  international  trade  agreements  will  you 
have to negotiate to achieve this goal? 

Answer.  The  mission  of  DOE’s  Megaports  Initiative  is  to  provide  partner  nations 
with  passive  radiation  detection  equipment  (i.e.,  radiation  portal  monitors  (RPMs 
and  handheld  detection  equipment),  communications  and  training  and  technical 
support  to  enhance  their  capacity  to  deter,  detect,  and  interdict  illicit  trafficking  of 
special nuclear and other radioactive materials through the global maritime system. 
DOE does not provide partner nations with non-intrusive imaging equipment. 

DOE’s  budget  request  from  FY  09  through  FY  13  is  $818  million  and  supports 
the  installation  of  radiation  detection  equipment  at  a  total  of  75  Megaports.  The 
Megaports  Initiative  is  also  working  with  partner  nations  to  develop  cost-sharing 
agreements.  To  date,  we  have  agreed  to  cost-sharing  agreements  for  ports  in  Hon-
duras,  Israel  (two),  Colombia,  Panama  (multiple),  Mexico  (multiple),  Belgium  and 
Spain (two). Cost-sharing is a high priority for us and estimates on number of ports 
that  will  cost-share  have  been  and  will  continue  to  be  incorporated  into  our  budget 
planning and requests. 

With  regard  to  anticipated  costs  to  our  trading  partners,  one  of  the  top  priorities 
of  the  Megaports  Initiative  is  to  install  our  equipment  in  a  manner  that  will  not 
interrupt  the  normal  flow  of  containers  through  a  port  and  thus  increase  costs. 
When designing an installation, the Megaports Initiative looks to place monitors at 
natural  chokepoints,  such  as  entry  and  exit  gates,  so  that  containers  are  scanned 
without deviating from their normal route. For container traffic that does not move 
through the gates, such as transshipped containers, DOE has deployed several new 
mobile  technologies,  including  a  radiation  detection  straddle  carrier  and  a  Mobile 
Radiation  Detection  and  Identification  System  (MDRIS).  DOE  is  also  active  in  fol-
lowing  and  evaluating  new  technologies  closely  to  determine  any  areas  where  im-
provements in scanning may be made. 

Our  partner  countries  are  responsible  for  staffing  the  radiation  monitoring  sys-
tems. In addition, after an initial period when maintenance costs for the deployment 
are provided by DOE, the partner country assumes the cost of maintaining and sus-
taining  the  equipment.  These  costs  vary  significantly  in  terms  of  the  number  of 
monitors deployed and the labor rates within a country. To date, the average annual 
cost  of  a  maintenance  contract  has  been  approximately  88K  USD  annually  and  it 
is assumed the partner country will incur similar costs when it takes over the main-
tenance  responsibility.  The  amount  of  additional  work,  and  hence  the  staffing  load 
that  a  radiation  detection  system  brings  to  a  port  is  dependent  on  several  factors. 
In  some  cases,  existing  staff  can  easily  absorb  the  amount  of  additional  work.  In 
other  cases,  additional  personnel  are  required,  perhaps  dedicated  fully  to  operating 
the  SLD-provided  equipment.  The  impact  on  staffing  is  estimated  based  on  oper-
ational  factors  such  as  number  of  lanes  with  installed  radiation  detection  equip-
ment, amount of traffic, and expected number of innocent alarms. 

DOE has not been involved in any international trade agreements with regard to 
the  installation  of  radiation  detection  equipment.  Typically,  DOE  signs  a  Memo-
randum  of  Understanding  (MOU)  or  a  Declaration  of  Principles  (DoP)  with  partner 
nations  to  implement  the  Megaports  Initiative.  However,  DOE  has  also  pursued 
other  arrangements,  such  as  letters  of  exchange  or  joint  press  releases,  with  Paki-
stan,  Hong  Kong,  Japan,  and  the  United  Kingdom.  To  date,  DOE  has  signed  24 
agreements  (MOUs  or  DoPs)  and  issued  the  aforementioned  four  additional  agree-
ments, representing work commitments at more than 40 seaports around the world. 
DOE will continue outreach efforts to negotiate additional agreements and meet the 
goal of 75 operational ports by 2013. 

Question  3.  Is  DOE  conducting  its  own  testing  of  the  ASP’s  at  the  Nevada  Test 
Site  and  if  so,  why?  Has  DOE  purchased  or  is  it  planning  to  purchase  any  ASP’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

54 

and if so where will they be deployed? How many have been purchased? Why would 
DOE purchase any before the second round of testing is complete and the Secretary 
of DHS has certified to the ASP’s effectiveness? 

Answer.  DOE  has  been  working  closely  with  DNDO  to  comprehensively  test  the 
ASP.  Specifically,  we  have  participated  in  Technical  Summits  to  establish  the  path 
forward  for  the  ASP  program,  conducted  a  significant  data  collection  effort  at  Los 
Alamos  National  Laboratory  using  special  nuclear  materials,  provided  technical  ex-
perts to perform data analysis during the current data collection at the Nevada Test 
Site, and will continue providing input into future test plans and the injection stud-
ies. 

In  addition  to  these  activities,  DOE  has  conducted  some  of  its  own  testing  of  the 
Thermo  Fisher  ASP  at  the  Los  Alamos  National  Laboratory  (LANL).  The  scope  of 
this testing is to define the concept of operations that may be suitable for secondary 
screening at international seaports. The scope of the testing is not intended to dupli-
cate  the  performance  testing  being  conducted  by  DNDO  but  to  supplement  DOE’s 
understanding of how best to deploy the equipment. 

DOE’s  Megaports  Initiative  purchased  12  ASPs  from  Thermo  Fisher  through  a 
DNDO  contract  in  2006.  Due  to  the  potential  advantages  for  more  efficient  cargo 
screening, DOE decided to purchase a limited number of ASPs to evaluate their per-
formance in operational settings for secondary inspections. DOE has deployed these 
units  for  secondary  inspections  both  to  operational  Megaports  (Southampton,  U.K. 
and  Antwerp,  Belgium)  and  to  the  laboratories  to  gather  further  data  of  the  ASPs 
performance  in  a  variety  of  settings.  Additional  units  are  planned  for  installation 
at  Colombo,  Sri  Lanka,  and  Manila,  Philippines,  Kaohsiung,  Taiwan  and  Port 
Klang, Malaysia. These systems are currently operated in tandem with existing sec-
ondary  screening  protocols,  including  inspection  with  handheld  radiation  isotope 
identification devices, until the ASPs have been shown to operate reliably and effec-
tively in the field. 

Overall,  DOE  has  been  closely  involved  in  the  testing  conducted  with  DNDO  on 
the  ASP  and  has  developed  its  own  test  plans  to  further  evaluate  the  performance 
of the ASP. The testing completed by the labs combined with the data we are receiv-
ing  from  our  operational  testing  and  evaluation  of  the  ASP  units  we  have  in  the 
field will provide valuable technical and operational insight for future deployments. 
As  we  move  forward  with  testing  and  evaluation,  it  is  our  expectation  that  we  will 
continue to work closely with our DHS counterparts. 

Question  4.  I  was  interested  to  read  about  the  technology  you  are  testing  for  mo-
bile  radiological  detection  platforms  on  straddle  carriers  in  the  Bahamas.  You  indi-
cate  that  over  730,000  containers  have  been  successfully  scanned.  Over  what  time 
period  is  that  metric  based?  Has  this  technology  performed  well?  And,  again,  just 
to clarify, that is only a radiological scan, not an NII? 

Answer.  Yes,  the  radiation  detection  straddle  carrier  (RDSC)  deployed  in  the  Ba-
hamas  only  scans  containers  for  radiation  and  does  not  have  a  non-intrusive  imag-
ing  component.  The  Megaports  Initiative  deployed  a  prototype  RDSC  to  the  Baha-
mas  in  2005  for  testing.  This  unit  became  officially  operational  in  June  2006.  This 
unit  was  designed  specifically  to  address  the  configuration  of  the  Port  of  Freeport, 
which  exclusively  uses  straddle  carriers  for  moving  and  stacking  cargo  containers, 
up  to  three  high,  around  the  lay-down  yard  in  rows.  To  address  this  terminal  con-
figuration, the Megaports Initiative modified one standard straddle carrier by strip-
ping  it  of  its  lifting  mechanisms  and  equipping  it  with  both  portal  monitors,  which 
detect the presence of radiation, and spectroscopic detectors, which can identify the 
source of radiation causing an alarm. The RDSC traverses container rows, scanning 
containers stacked in the lay-down yard. The unit is also equipped with a global po-
sitioning  system  (GPS)  and  a  wireless  communications  system  to  give  precise  loca-
tion data and to transmit information generated from scan to a Central Alarm Sta-
tion  (CAS)  where  alarms  are  assessed  and  adjudicated  by  Bahamian  Customs  Offi-
cers. 

The  unit  has  performed  very  well  with  over  800,000  containers  scanned  at  the 
Port of Freeport from June 2006 through August 2008. On average, the straddle car-
rier  has  scanned  approximately  85  percent  of  containers  passing  through  Freeport. 
The  RDSC  has  also  demonstrated  one  solution  to  the  challenge  of  transshipment 
containers  (i.e.,  those  containers  that  move  from  one  ship  to  another  without  every 
passing through an entry or exit gate) faced by the Megaports Initiative, by allowing 
containers to be scanned in the lay-down yard as they await movement to their next 
destination.  Based  on  the  success  of  the  RSDC,  DOE  has  recently  awarded  a  com-
mercial contract for the design and manufacture of additional straddle carrier units, 
which  will  be  deployed  to  other  straddle  carrier  ports  in  the  future.  The  initial 
RDSC  produced  under  the  new  contract  is  expected  to  undergo  acceptance  testing 
in late FY 2009. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

STEPHEN L. CALDWELL 

55 

Question  1.  What  are  the  national  policies  of  Canada  and  Mexico  with  respect  to 
scanning of inbound cargo containers? Does either Canada or Mexico have scanning 
requirements  to  prevent  weapons  of  mass  destruction  from  entering  their  ports  of 
entry  in  cargo  containers?  If  either  nation  does  have  such  a  requirement,  is  it 
stronger  or  weaker  than  the  U.S.  requirements  for  the  scanning  of  inbound  con-
tainer cargo? 

Answer. While GAO has not performed audit work examining the national policies 
of  Canada  or  Mexico  with  respect  to  the  scanning  of  inbound  cargo  containers,  or 
reviewed  whether  their  requirements  are  stronger  or  weaker  than  those  of  the 
United  States,  we  have  some  information  on  Canada  Border  Services  Agency 
(CBSA) efforts to prevent weapons of mass destruction from entering Canada. 

Canada  employs  a  risk-management  system  for  identifying  high-risk  container 
cargo bound for Canadian seaports. In particular, CBSA receives advanced informa-
tion for all marine vessels destined to arrive at ports in Canada and uses a system 
which  generates  a  risk  score.  This  risk  score  is  then  forwarded  to  Canadian 
targeters  for  review.  Marine  vessel  targeting  is  divided  by  risk  level,  with  the  Na-
tional  Risk  Assessment  Center  (which  CBSA  officials  describe  as  being  similar  to 
the  U.S.  National  Targeting  Center)  looking  for  threats  for  national  security  (e.g., 
weapons  of  mass  destrction  and  radioactive  materials).  Regional  targeters  focus  on 
contraband,  environmental  contaminants  (e.g.,  pine  beetles,  chemicals,  etc.)  and 
other threats. NRAC targeters review risk scores for each shipment and conduct an 
in-depth assessment of the shipments identified as posing a potential national secu-
rity  threat.  If  the  CBSA  officers  identify  a  suspicious  shipment,  they  may  issue  a 
‘‘do not load’’ or ‘‘do not unload’’ order and the cargo is examined either in a foreign 
port or upon arrival depending on the nature of the threat. 

The Canadian government has also initiated the Partners-in-Protection (PIP) pro-
gram to enlist the cooperation of companies involved in interational commerce in en-
hancing  border  security,  combating  terrorism,  and  helping  to  detect  and  prevent 
contraband  smuggling.  Participating  companies  sign  a  Memorandum  of  Under-
standing with CBSA, which focuses on the security of the trading companies’ cross- 
border  operations  (particularly  the  security  of  its  supply  chain),  information  ex-
changes, and joint training activities. This program is similar to the U.S. Customs- 
Trade  Partnership  Against  Terrorism  (C–TPAT)  program.  Additionally,  since  2001, 
the  Canadian  government  has  deployed  new  inspection  equipment,  such  as  Vehicle 
and  Cargo  Inspection  System  (VACIS)  machines  and  x-ray  scan  trailers.  In  a  2005 
report,  CBSA  anticipated  that  it  would  have  the  capacity  to  conduct  radiation 
checks  on  almost  all  marine  containers  arriving  at  the  ports  of  St.  John,  Halifax, 
Montreal and Vancouver which together receive nearly all container traffic arriving 
at Canada’s marine ports of entry. 

Question  2.  At  present,  do  cargo  containers  unloaded  off  ships  in  Canadian  and 
Mexican ports, get transshipped by rail and truck to final destinations in the United 
States?  Currently,  what  is  the  level  of  cooperation  and  coordination  between  U.S. 
and  Canadian  authorities  and  U.S.  and  Mexican  authorities  to  ensure  that  these 
transshipped U.S.-bound cargo containers do not present a significant risk for weap-
ons  of  mass  destruction?  Do  Customs  and  Border  Protection  and  NMSA  need  addi-
tional  authority  in  this  area,  for  example  with  respect  to  international  freight  rail 
crossing at the U.S. border? 

Answer. While GAO has not reviewed cargo container operations at Mexican sea-
ports, based on prior audit work we know that some container cargo arriving at Ca-
nadian  seaports  is  transported  to  the  United  States.  For  example,  on  a  visit  to  the 
Port  of  Halifax,  Nova  Scotia  in  2006,  CBSA  officials  told  us  that  a  portion  of  the 
container cargo arriving at the port is loaded on to trains for delivery to the United 
States. Regarding coordination efforts to ensure that this cargo bound for the United 
States does not pose a security risk, U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) de-
ploys  targeters  to  ports  in  Vancouver,  Montreal,  and  Halifax  as  part  of  the  Con-
tainer Security Initiative (CSI). These targeters review automated targeting system 
(ATS)  information  and  work  with  CBSA  officials  to  identify  containers  that  may 
pose  a  security  risk.  Similarly,  Canadian  targeters  located  at  the  ports  in  Newark 
and Seattle review marine containers arriving at U.S. ports destined for Canada by 
rail  or  by  truck.  At  these  U.S.  seaports,  CBP  officials  assess  all  shipments  for  na-
tional  security  threats,  while  Canadian  targeters  concentrate  on  identifying  contra-
band  smuggling.  If  the  Canadian  targeters  wish  to  refer  a  container  for  examina-
tion,  they  submit  a  formal  request  to  U.S.  authorities  to  conduct  the  examination 
at the port of entry. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

56 

GAO has not performaed any audit work regarding the issue of whether CBP and 
NMSA  need  additonal  authority  regarding  transshipped  rail  cargo  bound  for  the 
United  States.  We  leave  it  up  to  those  respective  agencies  to  comment  on  whether 
they believe their current authority is sufficient. 

Question  3.  As  you  know,  in  2012  there  is  100  percent  scanning  requirement  for 
U.S.-bound  cargo  containers.  Will  the  100  percent  scanning  requirement  apply  to 
cargo  containers  destined  for  Canada  and  Mexico  ports  which  are  subsequently 
transshipped by truck and rail to the United States? If it doesn’t apply, are we cre-
ating  a  loophole  that  could  potentially  be  exploited  by  bad  actors?  If  it  does  apply, 
would the scanning have to he performed in Canadian and Mexican ports? 

Answer.  The  statutory  requirement  for  100  percent  scanning  does  not  expressly 
include  or  exclude  cargo  containers  destined  for  Canadian  or  Mexican  ports  which 
are  subsequently  transshipped  by  truck  or  rail  to  the  United  States.1 In  our  audit 
work  to  date,  we  have  not  obtained  an  official  position  from  CBP  as  to  whether  it 
intends  to  apply  the  100  percent  scanning  requirements  to  such  cargo  containers. 
As our audit work continues, we will continue to seek an official position from CBP. 
This  issue  is  particularly  important  since  Canada  has  recently  expanded  some  of 
its seaports with the intent to then ship containers into the United States over land 
borders.  These  include  the  expansion  of  the  seaport  in  Vancouver  and  the  building 
of a new container terminal in Prince Rupert at a cost of approximately one billion 
U.S. dollars. However, CBP does receive advanced information for cargo that arrives 
in  Canada  via  ship  and  is  then  transported  to  the  United  States  via  rail.  Two  rail 
carriers,  CN  and  CP,  carry  such  containers  to  the  United  States  and  both  are  C– 
TPAT  approved  carriers.  Rail  carriers  transmit  electronic  data  to  CBP  2  hours  in 
advance  of  the  cargo’s  arrival  at  the  U.S./Canadian  border.  CBP  officers  assess  the 
cargo  data  and  determine  whether  a  threat  exists.  If  they  determine  it  is  a  risk  or 
threat,  they  will  place  a  ‘‘hold’’  on  the  container  for  the  carrier  with  instructions  to 
‘‘set  out’’  the  container  for  examination.  When  the  train  arrives  at  the  border,  CBP 
conducts VACIS inspection of all cars on the train. 

Æ 

1 See  Section  1701(a)  of  the  Implementing  Recommendations  of  the  9/11  Commission  Act  of 

2007 (Pub. L. No. 110–53, § 1701(a), 121 Stat. 266,489–90). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:19 Apr 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\80493.TXT JACKIE

